CLIMATE  SCIENCE:  EMPOWERING  OUR 

RESPONSE  TO  CLIMATE  CHANGE 

S.  HRG.  111–366 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  ELEVENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MARCH  12,  2009 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

52–159 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  ELEVENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia,  Chairman 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 
TOM  UDALL,  New  Mexico 
MARK  WARNER,  Virginia 
MARK  BEGICH,  Alaska 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 
JOHNNY  ISAKSON,  Georgia 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
SAM  BROWNBACK,  Kansas 
MEL  MARTINEZ,  Florida 
MIKE  JOHANNS,  Nebraska 

ELLEN L.  DONESKI,  Chief  of  Staff 
JAMES REID,  Deputy  Chief  of  Staff 

BRUCE H.  ANDREWS,  General  Counsel 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on March 12, 2009  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Begich  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Udall  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Warner  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................

WITNESSES 

Dr.  Tim  Killeen,  Assistant  Director,  Geosciences  Division,  National  Science 
Foundation  ............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Katharine Jacobs, Executive Director, Arizona Water Institute  .........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sean  Dilweg,  Commissioner  of  Insurance,  State  of  Wisconsin  on  Behalf  of 
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners  .....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Frank Alix, CEO, Powerspan Corp.  .......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted to Dr. Tim Killeen by: 

Hon. Kay Bailey Hutchison  .............................................................................
Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Katharine Jacobs by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Frank Alix by: 

Hon. Mark Warner  ...........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
4 
4 
5 
35 
37 
40 
44 
46 
47 
49 

5 
8 
12 
14 

18 
20 
23 
25 

59 
61 

63 

64 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

CLIMATE  SCIENCE:  EMPOWERING  OUR 

RESPONSE  TO  CLIMATE  CHANGE 

THURSDAY,  MARCH  12,  2009 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller 
IV, Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

The CHAIRMAN. The hearing will come to order. 
I thank our witnesses for joining us today. You’ve come from var-
ious places. From across the country, am I right? We’re here to dis-
cuss  climate  change,  which  is  a  very  big  part  of  the  work  of  the 
Commerce Committee, which a lot of people don’t know, but they’re 
going to. 

There  are  some  in  this  room  who  believe  that  climate  change  is 
for real and that I think it’s for real. I come from a coal state. Not 
everybody  likes  to  hear  what  I  have  to  say  about  it,  but  I  love  my 
grandchildren.  One  of  the  questions  I’m  going  to  ask  some  of  you 
is, When do you think the irreversibility factor becomes impossible 
to overcome? 

There  are  also  some  that  are  a  little  less  convinced  of  that.  Not 
necessarily  in  this  room,  but  certainly  across  the  country  and  in 
some energy circles. For me, I believe the science is overwhelming. 
I think science determines everything—like Sir Isaac Newton said, 
‘‘Follow the truth wherever it takes you,’’ and you never move your 
nose  from  that  direction.  The  danger  of  getting  this  wrong  is  very 
great, and therefore, we’ve got to act. 

This Committee has a terrific jurisdiction on climate change, and 
I  want  people  to  be  very  clear  about  that,  everything  from  ocean 
policy  to  science  and  technology  policy,  estuaries,  transportation, 
and  consumer  affairs,  just  an  enormous  number  of  things.  Each  of 
the  hearings  we’re  going  to  have  on  climate  change  are  sort  of 
going to build upon the previous one. So, this is the base. 

Today’s hearing will be dominated by an area under the Commit-
tee’s  jurisdiction  which  people  don’t  pay  enough  attention  to,  and 
that  is  something  called,  ‘‘science.’’  The  quality  of  our  Nation’s  re-
search in science is the single most important factor in meeting the 
challenges  of  climate  change,  it’s  the  single  most  important  factor 
in  acting  intelligently.  If  we’re  going  to  have  a  strong  climate 
change  policy,  it  requires  strong  climate  science  and  our  reaction 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

to that science. For science to be effective, it must be moved outside 
the  laboratory  so  that  the  stakeholders  can  make  use  of  it,  so  it’s 
not  just  the  knowledge  itself,  it’s,  How  do  you  use  the  knowledge? 
Is it ready to be used? 

The purpose of the hearing today is first, to provide an overview 
of the current state of climate change science, and second, to exam-
ine  how  science  informs  our  response  to  climate  change  and  what 
we do about its adaption and mitigation strategies, and third, high-
light  challenges  and  knowledge  gaps.  What  don’t  we  know?  What 
do we need to know? What do we know about parts of science, but 
not how to make it adaptable to the stakeholders, to the American 
people? 

So, again, I think the time for arguing whether carbon emissions 
is a factor which affects the health of the Earth or whether our sea 
level is rising from global warming is, and must be, over. And until 
it is over, there will be a small drag on our momentum, but I think 
our momentum in the Congress is very strong on this. 

We must address solutions now. We have to tackle the challenges 
very  directly  and  intelligently.  Those  are  two  very  different  mat-
ters. 

Today’s hearing is about taking science out of the laboratory and 
into our communities in order to help people see how climate varia-
bility  and  climate  change  are  impacting  their  lives  every  single 
day,  whether  they  know  it  or  not.  From  clean  air  and  water  to  ac-
tually impacting our economy. 

Climate  affects  every  aspect  of  our  economy.  Over  one-third  of 
our Nation’s gross domestic product is sensitive to weather and cli-
mate.  Weather  is  a  large  part  of  what  we  do.  And  that  fits  very 
much into the science of prediction and all the rest of it. Where you 
build  levees  and  where  you  do  not,  where  will  the  sands  increase, 
crops cease to grow? Science determines the types of crops that we 
grow, where we grow them; it affects where we live, where we build 
our roads, where we build our homes and our schools; and it deter-
mines  the  amount  of  energy  that  we  need.  And  it  affects  our 
health. 

Make  no  mistake,  climate  change  is  affecting  our  world  in  ways 
we  are  only  beginning  to  understand.  We  have  to  let  go  of  the  ‘‘it 
isn’t  happening,  because  I  can’t  see  it.’’  Well,  actually  you  can  see 
it.  You  just  have  to  look  up  into  the  skies.  But,  we  have  to  let  go 
of that and understand that it’s for real, before we can really move 
ahead effectively. 

Climate  change  is  affecting  our  world  in  ways  that  are  dan-
gerous.  Warmer  temperatures  bring  longer  growing  seasons,  in 
some  regions  increasing  agriculture  production.  We’ve  seen  severe 
storms  that  threaten  coastal  ecosystems.  People  think  severe 
storms  are  acts  of  God  or,  you  know,  happenstance,  or  something 
that’ll  happen  this  5  years,  but  not  the  next  5  years.  Wrong.  It’s 
all a part of climate change. 

Public health crises are very much involved in all of this, rapidly 
evolving through increased infectious and respiratory illnesses and 
weather-related mortality. The list goes on. 

The  economic  consequences  of  climate  change  are  equally  grave. 
These issues are particularly important because of the serious chal-
lenges  facing  our  economy.  I  know  many  Americans  believe  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

addressing  climate  change  may  have  a  negative  impact  on  jobs,  so 
let’s consider that for a moment. However, the cost of inaction will 
be much, much worse than the economic impact of action. More im-
portantly,  action  on  climate  change  will  produce  new  jobs  and 
make our economy stronger. 

In  this  crucial  time  in  our  Nation’s  history,  dangerous  time,  the 
decisions  we  make  now  can  and  will  set  the  course  for  many  gen-
erations  to  come.  We  have  the  ability  to  improve  our  economy  and 
the climate at the same time. 

Through  the  decisions  we  make  today,  we  can  resolve  to  transi-
tion  to  a  low-carbon  economy,  and  increase  sound  climate  science. 
That will drive effective decisionmaking, enhance stakeholder-driv-
en  climate  science  that  directly  addresses  public  needs  and  con-
cerns  and  improve  our  ability  to  mitigate  response  and  adapt  to 
change. Anyway, the time to act is now. 

Our  Ranking  Member,  Kay  Bailey—Senator  Kay  Bailey 
Hutchison,  will  arrive  shortly,  and  when  she  does,  I  will  ask  her 
to  speak,  obviously.  But,  in  the  meantime,  I  look  forward  to  hear-
ing from our witnesses. They’re going to talk about how we can im-
prove  climate  science  programs  within  the  Federal  Government  to 
make  them  more  stakeholder-driven  and  more  responsive  to  the 
needs of society. I want to say a word about them. 

Dr. Tim Killeen, with the National Science Foundation, will pro-
vide  us  with  an  update  of  the  current  state  of  climate  change 
science,  including  research  and  data  needs,  gaps,  what  we  don’t 
know, and challenges to addressing those gaps and needs. 

Dr. Kathy Jacobs, Executive Director of the Arizona Water Insti-
tute,  works  to  connect  science  and  decisionmaking—makes  you  a 
star—and  engage  stockholders  to  use  climate  change  and  climate 
variability  information  for  water  management,  which  is  her  work. 
She’s  also  Chair  of  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  Panel  on 
Adapting to Impacts of Climate Change. 

Commissioner Sean Dilweg is the Wisconsin Commissioner of In-
surance  and  former  head  of  the  National  Association  of  Insurance 
Commissioners  Climate  Change  Task  Force.  This  is  an  industry 
beset  with  a  lot  to  worry  about.  The  insurance  industry  is  one  of 
the  greatest  financial  sectors  in  the  United  States,  and  climate 
change will impact nearly every single segment of what they do, in-
cluding health and life insurance, property damage, and on and on. 
Dr. Jacobs and Commissioner Dilweg will help us understand the 
tangible link between science and its use. Reducing and stabilizing 
the  concentration  of  carbon  dioxide  in  the  atmosphere  will  require 
a  broad  portfolio  of  solutions.  A  lot  of  people  think  that  can’t  hap-
pen.  Well,  one  of  our  witnesses,  Mr.  Alix,  disagrees  with  that,  and 
can prove it. 

Mitigation  strategies,  such  as  carbon  capture  and  storage,  or  se-
questration,  is  important  in  decoupling  climate-change-altering 
emissions  from  continued  coal  use.  Now,  this  isn’t  a  coal  job, 
Frank. I don’t want you to worry. But, you know, we’re 70 percent 
now, and the question is, How do we get down to as low as we can? 
And  you’re  going  to  have  some  very  interesting  things  to  tell  us. 
And  there’s  the  whole  question  of,  How  do  you  close  the  gap?  If 
it’s a big pie, and you’ve got renewables, right now at about 7 per-
cent;  you  want  to  use  atomic  energy,  that’s  another  20  percent,  if 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

you want to do that; you’ve got weatherization, you’ve got all kinds 
of  things.  But,  basically,  you  can’t  escape  coal.  It’s  the  source  for 
51  percent  of  our  electricity.  And,  in  fact,  in  New  Hampshire  sev-
eral  years  ago,  it  was  literally  51  percent.  West  Virginia  Coal  was 
51 percent of their electricity energy. 

So,  mitigation  strategies  such  as  carbon  capture  and  storage  are 
important in decoupling all of this with respect to coal use, creating 
a bridge to a low-carbon economy. Is that possible? Well, our fourth 
witness, Frank Alix, CEO of Powerspan Corp., will discuss how car-
bon capture and storage can help us bridge that in a very dramatic 
way. 

So, I will now call upon our first witness, Dr. Killeen. 
And here she is. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator HUTCHISON. Mr. Chairman, I do apologize. I had an un-
usually large constituent coffee this morning, and so, I am late, and 
I will not take any more of your time, because I know I’m late, but 
just  to  say  that  this  is  a  very  important  issue  to  me.  I  think  we 
need to do more in this area, and that’s why I’m very appreciative 
that the Chairman has called this hearing so that we can move for-
ward on really addressing the weather issues more clearly, and the 
scientific  base  for  that.  We  need  to  know  more.  And  I  appreciate 
your  calling  this  hearing,  and  I  will  certainly  ask  questions,  but  I 
don’t want to take any more time right now. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Hutchison follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 
Thank you, Senator Rockefeller. I am pleased to join you in conducting this hear-
ing  on  climate  science.  This  Committee  has  a  long  history  of  advancing  and  pro-
moting laws that are based on sound science. 

Our  Nation  spends  nearly  $5  billion  per  year  on  climate  change  activities.  Given 
the  current  fiscal  challenges  to  our  country,  it  is  important  to  ensure  that  these 
funds are allocated wisely. While conducting this research is important, it is equally 
important  that  this  research  is  presented  in  a  form  that  is  useful  to  stakeholders 
and decisionmakers. 

Accurate  climate  and  weather  science  can  have  substantial  benefits  for  both  the 
private  sector  and  local  communities.  It  can  help  local  communities  plan  future  de-
velopment  and  protect  against  natural  disasters.  As  my  home  state  of  Texas  con-
tinues  to  rebuild  after  Hurricane  Ike,  climate  science  can  help  us  to  make  better 
decisions to prepare against future hurricanes. 

Climate  and  weather  science  can  also  help  us  to  develop  new  renewable  energy 
technologies.  Last  Congress  I  introduced  the  Creating  Renewable  Energy  through 
Science and Technology Act in order to promote renewable energy research and de-
velopment  in  the  areas  of  wind,  wave,  solar,  geothermal,  and  biofuels  production. 
Not  only  is  a  strong  science  program  essential  to  developing  these  technologies  the 
private  sector  needs  a  strong  understanding  of  the  environment  to  deploy  these 
technologies  efficiently.  Understanding  weather  patterns  is  crucial  when  deploying 
wind  and  solar  energy  technology.  Understanding  ocean  currents  is  necessary  for 
making decisions of where to site wave and tidal energy technologies. We must use 
sound  science  to  encourage  innovation,  and  cost  effective  clean  energy  technologies 
that  can  help  America  reduce  greenhouse  gases  and  reduce  our  dependence  on  for-
eign oil. 

We  must  also  increase  our  efforts  in  weather  modification  research.  In  2003,  the 
National Research Council recommended the establishment of a coordinated Federal 
program  of  atmospheric  research  on  cloud  dynamics,  cloud  modeling,  and  cloud 
seeding,  which  would  focus  on  fundamental  research  questions  that  currently  im-
pede  progress  and  understanding  of  intentional  and  inadvertent  weather  modifica-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

tion. In order to establish a coordinated Federal weather modification program I in-
troduced  legislation  in  both  the  109th  and  110th  Congresses.  This  Congress  I  plan 
to  introduce  the  Weather  Mitigation  Research  and  Development  Policy  Authoriza-
tion  Act  of  2009,  which  I  hope  will  lead  to  expanded  weather  modification  research 
at  both  the  Federal  and  local  level.  I  urge  my  colleagues  to  support  this  legislation 
as it comes before this Committee. 

The  National  Science  Foundation  currently  spend  about  $7  million  per  year  on 
weather modification research but this pales in comparison to the economic costs of 
severe  weather  events.  While  we  will  not  be  able  to  stop  Mother  Nature  entirely, 
we  may  be  able  alter  her  course,  changing  the  weather  in  small,  yet  significant 
ways.  Weather  modification  programs  in  Texas  and  other  states  are  trying  to  use 
the latest technology to reduce the impacts of droughts by extracting more precipita-
tion out of clouds. Many political subdivisions, like water conservation districts and 
county commissions, have embraced the technology of rain enhancement as one ele-
ment  of  long-term,  water  management  strategy.  Research  in  weather  modification 
will not only help us to mitigate severe weather events but will also help us to un-
derstand how weather impacts our Nation. 

So  as  we  look  to  research  what  the  weather  impacts  of  climate  change  will  be  in 
the future, we cannot sit idly by and wait. We must also conduct research into what 
and how we may be able to modify the weather of that time. I know as well as any-
one that weather modification is a long-term investment, but given what’s at stake, 
we have no other choice but to make the investment. 

Our Nation needs to invest more in basic scientific research, math and education. 
Many  of  our  greatest  challenges,  such  as  understanding  climate  change,  weather 
patterns,  and  developing  additional  sources  of  domestic  energy,  will  require  signifi-
cant  additional  funding  and  effort  to  answer  some  of  the  unresolved  questions  that 
have plagued policymakers. 

I look forward to hearing the testimony of the witnesses. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSERY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  make  a  request. 
And I so much appreciate the fact that you are holding this hearing 
concerning the critical question that faces us. And I wonder wheth-
er it’s possible for those of us who have been here now—it’s 10:20— 
to  make  a  short  statement,  not  more  than  5  minutes,  before  the 
witnesses start. I’m very interested in what they have to say. These 
are  an  excellent  group  of  witnesses.  But,  I  think,  in  fairness,  we 
might  be  able  to  get  our  statements  out  and  come  back  to  them, 
at the appropriate time, to be able to ask the questions. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Lautenberg,  at  the  beginning  of  our  or-
ganizing,  I  made  it  very  clear,  as  did  the  Ranking  Member,  that 
if we had a lot of people here, it would get very difficult and time- 
consuming  to  hear  full  statements,  and  people  want  to  hear  what 
the  witnesses  have  to  say.  You  can  work  your  statement  into  your 
questions,  but  we  agreed  that  the  two  of  us  would  speak  and  then 
we  would  go  directly  to  the  witnesses,  and  then  we  would  go  di-
rectly to questions. 

So, Dr. Killeen, I call on you. 

STATEMENT OF DR. TIM KILLEEN, ASSISTANT DIRECTOR, 
GEOSCIENCES DIVISION, NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION 
Dr. KILLEEN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. Is this work-
ing?  Chairman  Rockefeller  and  Ranking  Member  Hutchison  and 
Members of the Committee, I’m honored to speak to you—with you 
today on the state of climate change science. And I want to particu-
larly  thank  you  for  your  opening  remarks  on  the  part  of  the  sci-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

entific  community,  and  the  leadership  that  you’re  demonstrating 
here and by the mechanism of this Committee. 

My  name  is  Tim  Killeen.  I’m  the  National  Science  Foundation’s 
Assistant Director for the Geosciences. I’m also the former Director 
of  the  National  Center  for  Atmospheric  Research  and  the  past 
President of the American Geophysical Union, which is the world’s 
largest  organization  of  geoscientists.  My  academic  background  in-
cludes teaching and research in atmospheric, space, and earth-sys-
tem sciences. 

Today’s  topic  is  of  tremendous  importance  to  the  understanding 
of  our  planet  and  to  our  stewardship  of  it.  And  I’d  like  to  make 
three simple, but fundamental, points in my testimony: 

First,  the  science  of  climate  change  has  advanced  to  where  we 
now  understand,  quantitatively,  the  basic  drivers  of  both  the  ob-
served  natural  and  manmade  changes,  which  is  a  supreme  accom-
plishment of modern science and the scientific method. 

Number  two,  we  are  now  poised  to  take  that  knowledge  and  ex-
pand it in order to develop the tools, precisely those that you were 
alluding to, Mr. Chairman, that policymakers require for future ef-
fective  decisionmaking,  predications  of  future  change  at  the  tem-
poral and spatial scales of relevance to people’s lives. 

Third point is that the U.S. scientific and engineering community 
can and must retain world leadership, both intellectual and techno-
logical,  and  continue  to  push  scientific  frontiers  that  will  allow  us 
to predict climate and weather on scales relevant to human activi-
ties and endeavors. 

So,  I’d  like  to  begin  with  some  of  the  things  that  we  do  know, 
representing  the  fruits  of  research  by  the  hundreds  of  climate  sci-
entists,  many  of  whom  are  from  the  U.S.,  many  of  whom  were  in-
volved  in  the  recent  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change, 
or  the  IPCC,  the  fourth  assessment,  as  authors  and  reviewers. 
Their famous phrase from the most recent assessment summarizes 
it  well,  ‘‘Warming  of  the  climate  system  is  unequivocal,  as  is  now 
evident from observations in global average air and ocean tempera-
tures,  widespread  melting  of  snow  and  ice,  and  rising  global  aver-
age sea level.’’ 

So, we know many things. We know that the Earth is warming— 
it’s  warmed,  over  our  whole  lives,  everybody  in  this  room;  the 
strength and pace of this warming is unprecedented—this warming 
is linked to human activities, especially the release of carbon diox-
ide and other greenhouse gases, but also deforestation; that signifi-
cant continued warming is unavoidable, and we will be adapting to 
that;  and  that  changing  climates  have  already  significantly  im-
pacted people, infrastructure, and ecosystems across the globe; and 
that these impacts will increase in extent and severity. 

The  surplus  heat  energy  in  the  oceans  means  that  atmospheric 
warming  will  continue  into  the  future.  The  rate  of  warming  and 
the possibility for stabilization of the climate system will depend on 
human choices over the next years and decades. 

The investigation of global warming is a story of scientific accom-
plishment.  We’re  proud  of  that.  It  was  forecast  well,  back  in  the 
previous  century.  Current  models  capture  the  evolution  and  global 
patterns  of  recent  climate  change  remarkably  well  over  the  last 
century.  And  projections  for  the  long-term  centennial  climate  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

credible.  Our  observing  systems,  though  incomplete,  monitor 
changes  in  the  global  environment  with  unprecedented  accuracy 
and precision. 

These  research  efforts  are  interdisciplinary,  intergovernmental, 
and 
international.  Scientific  understanding  of  global  climate 
change  is  growing  rapidly.  The  knowledge  from  the  fourth  assess-
ment  from  the  IPCC  is  invaluable,  but  it’s  based  on  research  that 
was conducted more than 5 years ago. The IPCC’s estimates of the 
pace  and  severity  of  global  change  were  probably  conservative. 
Global  emissions  of  greenhouse  gases  and  their  consequences  are 
increasing faster than had been predicted or projected at that time. 
And  we  recognize  now  that  natural  systems  have  thresholds  that 
could  result  in  rapid  changes,  that  identifying  and  understanding 
those thresholds remains a scientific challenge. 

Today,  we  know  that  the  Earth  functions  as  a  system,  affecting 
ice,  carbon,  rainfall,  nitrogen  cycles,  ecosystem  responses,  and  the 
likelihood of extreme weather events. But, we still lack the full de-
tailed  predictive  understanding  of  that  system  and  its  many  rich 
interactions. The science of climate change is not over, it’s just get-
ting to a new threshold. 

In  my  written  testimony,  I’ve  provided  various  examples  of  spe-
cific current research challenges, because you asked for gaps in our 
knowledge, and I won’t reiterate them in my oral remarks, but we 
recognize  that  being  able  to  provide  decisionmakers  with  useful 
predictions  means  that  public  policy,  economic  development,  and 
human behavior must be taken into account, as well as the biologi-
cal  and  physical  sciences.  We  have  entered  a  new,  exciting,  but 
very  challenging,  scientific  world,  where  traditional  national 
science—natural  science,  social  science,  and  policy  sciences  must 
intersect. 

Society  must  find  a  way  to  deal  with  the  impacts  of  continued 
warming, but a rational basis for mitigation and adaptation choices 
in  assessing  their  potential  consequences  must  be  established  and 
must be informed by the very best science and engineering we can 
muster.  And  this  knowledge  must  continue  to  be  improved  over 
time.  And,  Mr.  Chairman,  you  made  that  very  point  in  your  open-
ing remarks. 

We’ve  reached  a  point  where  the  required  detailed  predictions 
are  within  reach  because  of  the  scientific  advances  over  the  past 
few years, but scientists must also find new ways to convey to non-
specialists  the  uncertainties  of  their  predictions  and  to  develop 
tools that allow decisionmakers to incorporate relevant information 
into the decision process. 

The predictive knowledge base to inform sound and effective pol-
icy—and  this  is  my  personal  opinion—is  perhaps  the  most  impor-
tant gift science will ever yield to humanity. 

The  U.S.  leads  the  world  in  research  in  the  natural  and  social 
sciences  and  engineering  disciplines  today.  The  significance  of  the 
climate problem demands that the U.S. take a lead in its solution. 
And  the  U.S.  scientific  community  is  poised  to  take  up  that  chal-
lenge. 

Mr. Chairman, I appreciate the opportunity to appear before the 
Committee  and  speak  with  you  on  this  important  topic.  And  I 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  may  have,  to 
the best of my ability. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Killeen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. TIM KILLEEN, ASSISTANT DIRECTOR, 

GEOSCIENCES DIVISION, NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee, I am honored to speak with you today on the state of climate change science. 
My  name  is  Tim  Killeen,  and  I  am  the  National  Science  Foundation’s  Assistant 
Director  for  Geosciences.  I  am  also  the  former  Director  of  the  National  Center  for 
Atmospheric  Research,  and  the  Past  President  of  the  American  Geophysical  Union 
(AGU).  My  academic  background  includes  a  professorship  at  the  University  of 
Michigan,  where  I  taught  and  conducted  research  programs  in  atmospheric,  space, 
and Earth system sciences for many years. 

The topic of this hearing is of tremendous importance to our understanding of the 
planet  on  which  we  live  and  to  the  stewardship  of  our  world.  I  wish  to  make  three 
simple but fundamental points: (1) the science of Earth’s climate and climate change 
has advanced to the point where we now understand the basic drivers of the natural 
and  man-made  changes  in  the  Earth’s  climate  system—this  is  a  supreme  accom-
plishment  of  modern  science  and  the  scientific  method;  (2)  we  stand  poised  to  ex-
pand  that  understanding  and  to  begin  to  develop  the  detailed  knowledge  policy-
makers  require  for  effective  decisions  that  will  surely  shape  our  world  for  genera-
tions to come; and (3) the U.S. scientific and engineering, community can and must 
retain  world  leadership  through  our  intellectual  and  technological  capabilities  to 
continuously  improve  predictions  of  climate  changes  on  the  temporal  and  spatial 
scales relevant to human endeavors. 
What We Know 

The many hundreds of climate scientists involved in the Intergovernmental Panel 
on Climate Change (IPCC) summarized the situation in their famous phrase: ‘‘Glob-
al warming is unequivocal’’ (IPCC AR4). We know that: 

• the Earth is warming (more than 1 degree Celsius since 1860). 
• the  strength  and  pace  of  this  warming  is  unprecedented  in  at  least  the  past 

ide and other ‘‘greenhouse gases.’’ 

• significant continued warming is unavoidable. 
• changing  climates  have  already  significantly  impacted  people,  infrastructure, 
and ecosystems throughout the globe, and these impacts will increase in extent 
and severity as climate changes continue. 

1,000 years. 

• this warming is linked to human activities, especially the release of carbon diox-

While global warming represents a profound challenge to Earth’s people, its inves-
tigation is a story of scientific accomplishment. Global warming was forecast by sim-
ple  theories  and  models  well  back  into  the  previous  century.  Our  current  models 
capture  the  evolution  and  global  patterns  of  climate  change  over  the  past  century 
remarkably  well,  and  they  make  credible  and  reproducible  projections  for  the  long- 
term climate outcomes of greenhouse warming. At the same time our observing sys-
tems, although incomplete, monitor changes in the global environment with unprec-
edented accuracy and precision. 

Our  knowledge  is  expanding.  Driven  by  intense  research  efforts  that  are  inter-
disciplinary, inter-governmental, and international, scientific understanding of glob-
al  climate  change  is  growing  rapidly.  Recent  advances  build  on  the  understanding 
contained in the IPCC 4th Assessment (AR4, 2007), which is based on research con-
ducted  more  than  5  years  ago.  We  now  know  more  about  how  the  Earth  functions 
as  a  system—the  role  of  ice,  carbon,  rainfall  and  nitrogen  cycles;  ecosystem  re-
sponses;  the  likelihood  of  extreme  event  occurrence  (e.g.,  wildfires  and  heat  waves) 
and  more.  A  body  of  recent  research  compiled  in  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science 
Program’s  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Products  (SAP)  has  been  very  helpful  in  ex-
panding our regional knowledge in these areas. 

Because  of  the  accumulation  of  surplus  heat  energy  in  the  ocean,  atmospheric 
warming  will  continue  long  into  the  future,  but  the  rate  of  this  warming  and  any 
possibility  for  ultimate  stabilization  of  this  system  will  be  dependent  on  how  hu-
mans  adjust  concentrations  of  atmospheric  greenhouse  gases  over  the  next  years 
and decades. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

What We Need to Know 

As the pace of global change has accelerated, so has the demand from the public, 
business  leaders,  resource  managers,  and  decisionmakers  for  climate  predictions, 
not  just  a  century  ahead  but  over  the  next  five,  ten,  or  fifteen  years,  and  not  just 
globally, but regionally and locally. Led by U.S. researchers, the scientific enterprise 
can  meet  this  demand,  but  must  first  fill  fundamental  gaps  in  our  understanding 
of the Earth system and build new technologies for Earth-system prediction. Tradi-
tional research in fields like meteorology, oceanography, geology, glaciology, biology, 
and  the  social  sciences  must  be  linked  to  construct  an  understanding  of  the  Earth- 
system including the impact of, and on, its human inhabitants. Underpinning all of 
this is the need for a comprehensive, high accuracy, high-spatial and high temporal 
resolution,  stable,  continuous,  sustained  global  climate  observing  system  that  in-
cludes  physical,  biological,  and  social  observations  not  only  to  monitor  climate 
change but for use in research and modeling. 

Results of interdisciplinary research efforts must then be used in developing com-
putational  models  with  verifiable  predictive  skill.  These  next-generation  predictive 
models will need to be run on our most powerful computers that can store, display, 
and  analyze,  and  similarly  handle  the  ever-growing  volumes  of  observational  data 
used  to  further  refine  the  models.  New  computational  methods  are  needed  to  make 
the  best  possible  use  of  our  computing  power.  Finally,  new  knowledge  and  tech-
niques  in  mathematics,  statistics,  information  sciences  and  cyber-infrastructure  are 
crucial in converting model results to quantifiable statements about the various im-
pacts and risks posed by climate change. 
What Are Some of the Leading Scientific Challenges? 
Regional Climate Change 

While our understanding of average global climate change and the large-scale fac-
tors  driving  it  are  fairly  well  understood,  we  have  yet  to  develop  the  capability  to 
predict  accurately  how  climate  will  change  on  a  regional  basis.  Some  parts  of  the 
globe,  such  as  the  Antarctic  Peninsula,  are  warming  much  faster  than  others  and 
the  factors  driving  these  local  variations  are  not  well  understood.  A  key  challenge 
to the research community is to identify and understand these smaller scale factors 
and to incorporate them into models that will predict reliably how communities and 
specific parts of the globe will be impacted by climate change. 
Ice Sheet Changes and Rising Sea Levels 

Rising sea levels are a major consequence of global warming. As the oceans warm, 
their  waters  expand.  This  effect  is  comparatively  well  understood  and  predictable. 
What  is  less  understood  and  less  predictable  is  the  behavior  of  ice  sheets  and  the 
possibility  of  great  and  rapid  rises  in  sea  level  due  to  melting  ice  caps.  The  ice 
sheets  of  Greenland  and  Antarctica  hold  vast  volumes  of  water.  Because  of  uncer-
tainties  surrounding  the  behavior  of  ice  sheets,  their  impact  on  sea  level  rise  was 
not  adequately  addressed  in  the  last  IPCC  assessment.  Recent  observations  includ-
ing  increasing  areas  of  summer  melt  on  the  surface  of  the  Greenland  icecap  and 
space-based  observations  of  decreasing  ice-sheet  mass  suggest  the  potential  for  a 
0.6–1.9 feet rise in sea level this century (SAP 3.4). Low lying regions, vital coastal 
wetlands and, in the developing world, densely populated agricultural regions could 
be inundated as a result of rapid sea level rise. 

In  the  U.S.  alone,  protecting  coastal  infrastructure  against  such  a  rise  could  re-
quire  continuing  investments  of  billions  of  dollars.  At  present,  however,  we  cannot 
make  reliable  statements  on  the  likelihood  of  a  disastrous  rise  in  sea  level  because 
of  our  limited  knowledge  of  how  ice  sheets  work.  Recent  research  suggests  that 
some previously unknown or neglected processes, such as the lubrication of ice flow 
by surface meltwater which reaches the base of the ice sheet through crevasses, are 
important,  but  we  are  not  yet  at  the  point  of  incorporating  these  effects  into  pre-
dictive  models  (SAP  3.4).  Other  recent  results  suggest  the  importance  of  increasing 
ocean  temperatures  on  the  retreat  of  Greenland  outlet  glaciers  and  the  diminish-
ment of the ice sheet. Finally, the impact of sea level rise on coastal ecosystem may 
be significant and likely will have far reaching consequences to inland-oceanic proc-
esses, including freshwater quality and availability. 
Water Scarcity 

Three  decades  ago,  climate  modeling  pioneer,  Sukyuro  Manabe,  predicted  that 
global warming would lead to reductions in rainfall in some of the Earth’s most pro-
ductive  agricultural  regions.  The  increased  frequency  of  drought  in  places  such  as 
the southwest U.S. suggests that this trend may be underway (SAP 3.4). While mod-
els  generally  agree  that  the  planet’s  subtropical  dry  zones  are  expanding,  there  is 
great disagreement among them in regard to the pace and severity. Within the trop-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

ics,  the  uncertainty  is  greater.  For  example,  there  is  nearly  perfect  disagreement 
among  models  as  to  whether  the  Sahel  region  of  Africa  will  become  wetter  or  drier 
in  this  century.  In  the  monsoon  regions  of  South  Asia  a  layer  of  haze,  air  pollution 
from  industry  and  household  fires,  causes  more  sunlight  to  be  absorbed  within  the 
atmosphere and less at Earth’s surface. Some models predict that this change could 
result in a weakening of the Asian monsoon and more frequent failures of monsoon 
rains, but once again, the pace and strength of this effect is highly uncertain. 

While  our  current  models  can  address  the  global  scale,  they  have  not  yet  been 
fully adapted to regional and local scales. The water used by people, however, comes 
from local sources (e.g., wells, lakes and rivers recharged by rain and snow). At this 
stage,  our  models  provide  little  information  on  these  scales,  which  are  small  when 
viewed  globally  but  critically  important  to  a  farmer  or  a  water  manager.  Models 
that can provide information on the scales that users need are coming, but they are 
still in their infancy. 
Ocean Acidification 

Roughly  one  third  of  the  carbon  dioxide  humankind  has  released  from  burning 
fossil fuels has gone into Earth’s oceans (IPCC AR4). While ocean uptake has slowed 
the pace of global warming, it has been harmful to living things in the ocean. When 
carbon  dioxide  dissolves  in  the  ocean,  it  makes  seawater  more  acidic.  Observations 
verify  that  the  ocean  has  become  more  acidic,  and,  as  this  trend  continues,  it  will 
make the ocean environment less and less hospitable for many key organisms, espe-
cially those that build hard shells, such as corals. While the basic chemistry of this 
problem  is  well  understood,  there  are  many  questions  we  cannot  yet  answer:  How 
will ocean ecosystems respond to increased acidity? How does ocean circulation, and 
its  potential  changes  in  a  changing  climate,  affect  how  much  carbon  dioxide  is  ab-
sorbed  and  how  rapidly  the  ocean  acidifies?  What  are  the  implications  of  ocean 
acidification  on  marine  ecology  and  the  sustainability  of  fisheries  and  how  might  it 
affect  the  capacity  of  the  ocean  to  continue  to  absorb  carbon-dioxide?  Ocean  acidifi-
cation is but one example of how questions about climate change extend beyond tra-
ditional  climate  science  into  other  parts  of  the  Earth  system.  In  this  case,  a  com-
plete  and  coupled  understanding  of  marine  ecology  along  with  climate  physics  is 
needed. 
Methane Gas 

Even  when  we  look  to  the  past,  we  are  confronted  by  questions  about  the  inter-
relationships  between  greenhouse  gases  and  other  environmental  phenomena.  For 
example,  from  ice  cores  drilled  in  Greenland  and  Antarctica,  we  know  that  in 
Earth’s  recent  geologic  past  (hundreds  of  thousands  of  years)  the  concentrations  of 
two  greenhouse  gases,  carbon  dioxide  and  methane,  have  varied  nearly  in  lockstep 
with Earth’s temperature (IPCC AR4). The changes in greenhouse gases must have 
played  a  significant  role  in  the  temperature  changes,  while,  at  the  same  time,  and 
by  mechanisms  we  still  do  not  fully  understand,  changes  in  temperature  caused 
changes in levels of greenhouse gases. We do not know if the processes that caused 
carbon  dioxide  and  methane  to  change  naturally  in  the  past  could  still  function 
today in a warmer climate. If they do, the implications for global warming are pro-
found,  as  they  would  function  as  a  positive  feedback  loop,  increasing  the  rate  of 
global  warming.  Great  quantities  of  methane  are  sequestered  in  Arctic  permafrost. 
This  methane  may  be  released  to  the  atmosphere  as  Earth  warms  and  the  perma-
frost melts, but we do not know how much or how fast (SAP 3.4). 
Extreme Events 

Researchers  have  already  observed  that  an  increasing  portion  of  the  rainfall 
comes  in  intense  events.  Two  general  implications  of  this  trend  are  that  the  risk 
of flooding is increasing and that the fraction of rainfall that runs off may be great-
er.  Recent  modeling  results  suggest  that  as  the  Earth  warms  severe  local  storms 
and the damages from flash floods and high winds will increase (SAP 3.3). Further, 
the  time  between  rainstorms  may  increase  (SAP  3.3),  which  could  lead  to  greater 
fire  risk  and  water-stress  to  crops.  Currently,  our  ability  to  make  quantitative  and 
precise  statements  about  these  risks  that  would  be  useful  to  emergency  planners, 
farmers,  and  flood-control  engineers  is  limited.  Once  again,  the  limitation  comes 
from  the  scales  of  our  models.  The  present  generation  of  global  climate  models  is 
far  from  being  able  to  represent  a  locally  severe  thunderstorm  or  the  time  between 
storms. 
Biodiversity and Ecosystem Function 

The Earth’s climate and related life support systems are changing today at highly 
accelerated  rates  that  are  markedly  different  from  those  experienced  by  living  sys-
tems in the recent geological history. The processes associated with climate change, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

as well as the mechanisms available to mitigate it, are largely biological—every part 
of the Earth is affected by the seemingly endless ability of living organisms to trans-
form  the  world  around  them.  The  relationship  between  the  Earth’s  ability  to  func-
tion  as  a  set  of  interconnected  ecosystems  and  the  biodiversity  within  and  among 
those  interacting  systems  is  an  area  of  incomplete  knowledge  and  critical  impor-
tance.  Research  that  builds  a  mechanistic  understanding  of  carbon,  nutrient  and 
water cycles and the connections with living systems; that connects carbon and nu-
trient cycles to land use changes; and that identifies likely continental sinks of CO2 
is  necessary  to  fill  gaps  in  the  climate  change  picture  and  directly  relevant  to 
human well being. Finally, achieving an understanding of the linkages between the 
biological  and  physical  Earth  systems  and  social  systems  is  needed.  Maintaining  a 
healthy  planetary  ecosystem  depends  on  both  the  maintenance  of  the  Earth’s  bio-
diversity and its ability to respond to changing conditions. 
Human Health 

In the summer of 1995 a heat wave in Chicago caused 521 deaths; the European 
heat wave of 2003 killed 35,000 people. Careful statistical and modeling studies in-
dicate  that  the  European  heat  wave  was  probably  related  to  global  warming  (IPCC 
AR4).  As  the  global  temperature  rises,  the  risk  of  severe  heat  waves  is  expected  to 
increase.  Yet  we  are  limited  in  our  ability  to  predict  future  heat  waves  and  their 
impacts on people. Our models are not yet able to represent the complex urban envi-
ronment where heat waves are most severe. Further, the impacts of heat waves de-
pend  on  the  vulnerability  of  urban  populations  and  how  they  and  community  lead-
ers respond when the thermometer spikes. 

Heat  waves  are  but  one  example  of  how  global  climate  change  can  influence 
human  health.  Others  include  the  spread  of  disease  agents  and  vectors  into  new 
areas,  such  as  from  tropical  to  temperate  regions  and  to  higher  latitudes  and  alti-
tudes.  Other  examples  include  key  findings  from  SAP  4.6  which  include:  (1)  Hurri-
canes, extreme precipitation resulting in floods, and wildfires also have the potential 
to  affect  public  health  through  direct  and  indirect  health  risks;  (2)  The  impacts  of 
higher  temperatures  in  urban  areas  and  likely  associated  increases  in  tropospheric 
ozone  concentrations  can  contribute  to  or  exacerbate  cardiovascular  and  pulmonary 
illness if current regulatory standards are not attained; and (3) There will likely be 
an increase in the spread of several food and water-borne pathogens among suscep-
tible  populations  depending  on  the  pathogens’  survival,  persistence,  habitat  range 
and transmission under changing climate and environmental conditions. 

In  all  of  these  cases,  a  useful  estimate  of  the  risk  depends  on  more  than  pre-
dicting  changes  in  the  physical  climate,  even  if  we  can  do  so  at  the  small  scales  of 
a  city  neighborhood.  Biology,  ecology,  and  human  physiology  come  into  play,  and, 
even  more  importantly,  human  responses.  We  must  better  understand  the  human 
and  social  dimensions  of  climate  change  if  we  are  to  address  the  wide  range  of  cli-
mate  change  problems,  but  the  scientific  study  of  these  human  factors  is  in  early 
stages. 
Smart Adaptation and Smart Mitigation 

It  is  imperative  that  society  adapts  to  the  impacts  of  continued  warming  of  the 
climate. The extent to which we will need to adapt will depend substantially on fu-
ture  emissions  and  the  success  of  mitigative  efforts.  Anticipating  the  magnitude  of 
potential impacts is complicated by other factors such as population growth, urban-
ization, the availability and implementation of new technologies, the health and re-
silience  of  natural  systems  and  human  communities,  and  pollution,  which  can  am-
plify or exacerbate the impacts due to changing climate. Current climate projections 
are  based  largely  on  scenarios  that  assume  no  particular  climate  polices  with  re-
spect  to  greenhouse  gases  (IPCC  AR4),  however,  policy  choices  will,  in  fact,  affect 
how natural and human systems respond, perhaps in unexpected ways. 

Society  will  need  to  pursue  a  mix  of  smart  adaptation  and  mitigation  strategies. 
Identifying  the  best  sets  of  options  requires  tools  that  allow  us  to  understand  how 
the  Earth’s  physical,  biological  and  human  systems  will  respond  to  various  adapta-
tion  and  mitigation  strategies  and  the  tradeoffs  with  respect  to  effectiveness  and 
cost.  Factors  of  politics,  economic  development,  and  human  behavior  and  health 
must be taken into account. These requirements bring us into a new and very chal-
lenging  realm  where  traditional  natural  science,  social  science,  and  policy  sciences 
all intersect. 
Potentially Disruptive Climate Change 

Studies of ancient climate change have shown evidence of dramatic changes in the 
Earth’s  climate.  Much  new  work  focuses  on  possible  ‘‘tipping  points’’  or  thresholds, 
at  which  a  system  undergoes  rapid  and  dramatic  change.  Such  events  occur  rarely, 
but  carry  high  consequences  when  they  do.  For  example,  during  the  1990s,  Alaska 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

experienced the largest outbreak of spruce bark beetles in the world. This outbreak 
was  associated  with  a  threshold  response  to  milder  winters  and  warmer  tempera-
tures  that  allowed  more  beetles  to  survive  the  winter  (SAP  4.2)  The  concept  also 
applies  to  social  and  economic  systems.  Identifying  potential  tipping  points  in  our 
natural and social systems is challenging because many systems are nonlinear, but 
fully  informed  decisionmaking  by  policymakers  will  need  to  take  the  possibility  of 
tipping points into account. 
Dealing with Uncertainty 

No  matter  how  sophisticated  our  models  and  predictive  capabilities  there  will  al-
ways be uncertainties in the projections and the risks of adopting particular strate-
gies cannot be fully known. Scientists must find new ways to convey to non-special-
ists the uncertainties of their predictions and develop tools that allow decision-mak-
ers to incorporate the information into the decision process. 
The Ultimate Goal 

The  goal  of  climate  change  science  is  to  make  verifiable  quantitative  predictions. 
We need this predictive capability for two reasons. First, and most importantly, soci-
eties  need  them  to  respond  intelligently  to  the  challenges  posed  by  a  changing  cli-
mate.  At  the  same  time,  as  scientists,  we  know  our  understanding  can  be  tested 
only  by  making  predictions  and  comparing  them  with  what  actually  happens—this 
is  as  true  today  for  global  climate  change  as  it  was  for  predicting  the  orbits  of  the 
planets  in  the  days  of  Kepler  and  Newton.  Getting  to  a  useful  predictive  capacity 
requires scientific understanding of the myriad processes and interactions that com-
prise  the  Earth  system.  It  requires  constructing  computational  models  that  incor-
porate  our  understanding.  It  requires  access  to  our  best  supercomputer  hardware 
and  the  development  of  computational  methods  to  implement  these  models.  It  re-
quires  observations  of  all  aspects  of  the  Earth  system,  including  its  human  dimen-
sions,  that  can  be  used  as  the  starting  points  for  model  predictions  and  as  data  for 
testing the accuracy of models. And it requires the human and cyber infrastructure 
to deliver model results to people in forms and media that they can use. 

As  noted  previously  the  scientific  community  has  made  remarkable  progress  in 
gaining  an  understanding  of  climate  relevant  processes  and  the  ability  to  model 
these  processes  to  give  a  realistic  representation  of  the  current  climate  system  on 
a global scale and how human activities have begun to impact climate. There really 
is  no  longer  a  question  of  humankind’s  perturbation  of  the  climate.  The  question 
now is the timing and the magnitude of climate change that will occur in the future. 
Conclusion 

Society  cannot  avoid  the  need  to  adapt  to  the  impacts  of  continued  warming  of 
the  climate  due  to  past  emissions  of  greenhouse  gases,  but  policy  and  decision-
makers  need  a  rational  basis  for  deciding  how  to  proceed  and  an  understanding  of 
the  potential  consequences  of  their  choices.  Climate  Science  has  progressed  to  the 
point  where  the  detailed  predictions  required  are  within  reach,  once  a  set  of  defin-
able  scientific  challenges  is  overcome.  The  predictive  knowledge  base  to  inform 
sound and effective policy is perhaps the most important gift science will ever yield 
to humanity. 

The U.S. leads the world in research in the natural and social sciences and engi-
neering disciplines and in developing computing hardware and computational tools. 
The  significance  of  the  climate  problem  demands  that  the  U.S.  take  the  lead  in  its 
solution. The U.S. science community is poised to take on this challenge. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Committee  to 
speak  to  you  on  this  important  topic.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions 
that you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Ms. Jacobs. 
STATEMENT OF KATHARINE JACOBS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ARIZONA WATER INSTITUTE 

Ms.  JACOBS.  Chairman  Rockefeller,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison, 
Members of the Committee, thank you so much for the opportunity 
to  speak  with  you  today  as  you  consider  how  best  to  prepare  this 
country for the impacts of climate change. 

The  current  and  potential  impacts  are  undeniably  of  concern. 
Drought and unreliable water supplies, more intense storm events, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

sea-level  rise,  and  large  wildfires  are  already  attributed  to  global 
warming,  and  are  predicted  to  increase  over  time.  While  the  focus 
to  date  has  primarily  been  on  reducing  carbon  emissions,  adapta-
tion issues need more attention. 

My  name  is  Katharine  Jacobs,  and  I  am  the  Executive  Director 
of  the  Arizona  Water  Institute,  which  is  a  consortium  of  Arizona’s 
three State universities focused on water sustainability. 

For  23  years,  I  was  a  Water  Manager  for  the  Arizona  Depart-
ment of Water Resources, and I’m currently a Professor at the Uni-
versity  of  Arizona.  I’ve  worked  on  drought  planning,  water  con-
servation,  groundwater  management,  climate  change  and  Colorado 
River  issues,  and  I  currently  chair  a  National  Academy  Panel  on 
Adapting to the Impacts of Climate Change. 

Though we’ve made great strides in understanding climate varia-
bility  and  climate  change  from  a  scientific  perspective,  much  of 
that information is lost on the American public and on water man-
agers  who  need  it.  I  have  been  in  countless  meetings  where  this 
gap between science and society has been lamented, but, with a few 
notable  exceptions,  very  little  progress  has  been  made  in  address-
ing this problem. 

Our current ability to connect science and decisionmaking is woe-
fully  inadequate,  and  a  big  part  of  this  problem  is  communication. 
At  a  very  basic  level,  the  science  and  management  communities 
often  fail  to  understand  each  other’s  vocabulary  and  their  motiva-
tion. 

An associated problem is that, to a layperson, the messages that 
come from scientists and science agencies often appear to be in con-
flict.  Climate  change  information  has  been  highly  politicized,  lead-
ing people to incorrect conclusions about the quality of the informa-
tion  and  the  degree  of  certainty  that  does  exist.  This  means  that 
the  context  for  building  the  proposed  National  Climate  Service  is 
especially challenging. 

Possibly the biggest challenge is funding. A minute portion of the 
Federal  science  budget  is  spent  on  translating  that  science  into 
useful  decision-support  tools  and  timely,  relevant  sources  of  infor-
mation. There is a lot of focus, especially within NOAA and NASA, 
on  buoys,  satellites,  and  massive  computing  capacity.  All  of  these 
investments  have  dramatically  improved  the  understanding  of 
science;  however,  to  truly  translate  data  into  information,  and  in-
formation into knowledge, requires a larger investment in decision- 
support tools, data access, training, and capacity-building. 

The only way that the new National Climate Service will succeed 
is if it empowers a multitude of regional support networks and cen-
ters to engage the public and decisionmakers at local scales, where 
decisions affected by climate are made on a regular basis. 

Fortunately,  we  do  have  examples  of  successful  bridging  organi-
zations, such as the NOAA Regional Integrated Science Assessment 
Program,  with  which  I  have  been  associated  for  some  years.  But, 
this network will have to be informed by a well-coordinated Federal 
science team, and the network itself will need to be well supported 
by Federal money. 

Based  on  recent  national  and  international  reports,  the  water 
supplies  of  the  West  are  seriously  threatened  by  climate  change. 
This  is,  in  part,  because  higher  temperatures  alone  have  dramatic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

impacts  on  the  hydrologic  cycle,  drying  soils,  reducing  runoff  into 
rivers,  causing  more  evaporation  from  reservoirs,  and  increasing 
the demand for water for people and for ecosystems. 

Recent  climate-model  information  suggests  that  the  Southwest 
will  likely  also  experience  reduced  precipitation.  The  result  could 
be  relatively  dire  for  the  Colorado  River,  including  a  potential  20- 
percent decrease in flows by the year 2050. This is not a happy cir-
cumstance for the nearly 30 million people who depend on its flows. 
But,  most  water  managers  do  not  even  know  about  the  Climate 
Change Science Program. It is clear that coherent messages regard-
ing climate science are not penetrating into arenas where they can 
best  be  used.  Significant  restructuring  of  the  program  will  be  re-
quired  so  that  regional  issues,  like  water-supply  reliability  in  the 
Colorado River Basin, can be effectively addressed. 

In  the  written  version  of  my  testimony,  I  have  outlined  what  I 
believe are the key ingredients of a successful Climate Service that 
will  connect  science  and  decisionmaking.  In  the  interest  of  time,  I 
will just say that the Climate Service needs to have a broad, inclu-
sive  vision;  that  the  engagement,  training,  capacity-building,  and 
coordination functions need to be expanded and adequately funded; 
that  it  should  address  both  climate  variability  and  climate  change 
at  multiple  time  and  space  scales;  and  that  it  will  require  strong 
leaders who have the authority to either encourage or force the in-
tegration of Federal science capacity to support decisions. 

By some accounts, the U.S. Government has spent more than $30 
billion in the last 8 years on climate science, and perhaps $100 bil-
lion total. Given the magnitude of this investment, it is clearly time 
to  take  stock  of  what  we  do  know,  and,  though  we  haven’t  an-
swered  every  question,  empower  decisionmakers  to  access  and  use 
that information with full understanding of its limitations. 

Clearly,  we  need  to  keep  investing  in  research  on  both  climate 
variability  and  on  climate  change,  but  it  is  time  to  get  more  value 
out of the investments we’ve already made. 

Thank you very much for the opportunity to comment on this ex-
tremely  important  topic.  If  you  have  any  questions,  I  would  be 
happy to respond. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Jacobs follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KATHARINE JACOBS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ARIZONA WATER INSTITUTE 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  Members  of  the  Committee, 
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you  today  as  you  consider  how  best  to 
prepare  this  country  for  the  impacts  of  climate  change.  Many  in  this  country  still 
do  not  consider  this  topic  a  ‘‘front-burner’’  issue.  But  the  current  and  potential  im-
pacts  of  climate  change  are  undeniably  of  concern:  drought  and  unreliable  water 
supplies,  more  intense  storm  events,  sea  level  rise,  large  wildfires  and  devastating 
bark-beetle damage to forests across the west already are attributed to global warm-
ing and are predicted to increase over time. 

My  name  is  Katharine  Jacobs,  and  I  am  the  Executive  Director  of  the  Arizona 
Water Institute, a consortium of Arizona’s three state universities focused on water 
sustainability. Since 2003, I have been a Professor in the Department of Soil, Water 
and  Environmental  Science  at  the  University  of  Arizona  in  Tucson.  For  the  prior 
23 years I was a Water Manager for the State of Arizona, and for 14 of those years 
I  was  Director  of  the  Tucson  regional  office.  I  also  briefly  managed  Arizona’s 
drought  planning  program,  and  have  worked  extensively  on  water  conservation, 
groundwater  management,  climate  change,  western  water  policy,  and  the  Colorado 
River. In collaboration with a wide range of Federal and university experts, I wrote 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

the water sector chapter for the first National Assessment of the impacts of climate 
change, published in 2000. I currently chair a National Academy panel on Adapting 
to the Impacts of Climate Change. 

My  comments  are  directed  toward  adaptation  to  climate  impacts,  rather  than  on 
limiting carbon emissions. Although these activities need to be considered in tandem 
to  avoid  unanticipated  consequences  and  to  optimize  investment,  conversations 
about  mitigation  have  been  ongoing  for  some  time.  Discussions  of  adaptation  are 
long overdue. 

Translating scientific information into useful knowledge for decision-makers is my 
particular interest. I am focused on climate science, because better use of this infor-
mation  would  be  of  enormous  benefit  to  society  in  general,  and  water  managers  in 
particular. Two important observations: (1) although we have made great strides in 
understanding  climate  variability  and  climate  change  from  a  scientific  perspective, 
much of that information is lost on the American public and on the water managers 
who  urgently  need  it  to  reduce  risk  and  increase  economic  opportunities,  and  (2) 
most  scientists  have  a  limited  understanding  of  the  information  needs  of  decision- 
makers. I have been in countless meetings where this gap between science and soci-
ety  has  been  lamented,  but  with  a  few  notable  exceptions,  very  little  progress  has 
been made in addressing this problem. 

I would like to emphasize three key points in my testimony: 

1.  Our  current  ability  to  bridge  the  gap  between  science  and  decision-making 
is  woefully  inadequate,  and  despite  billions  of  dollars  spent  on  the  Federal  cli-
mate program, it has not been as effective as it would have been if it were more 
focused on building adaptive capacity. 
2. Adaptation decisions are made at the state, regional and local levels—and the 
magnitude  of  the  climate  change  challenge  is  so  great  that  new  mechanisms  of 
engagement are required to build local and regional capacity to respond. 
3.  The  climate  service  needs  to  have  a  broad,  inclusive  vision;  be  adequately 
funded;  address  both  climate  variability  and  climate  change  at  multiple  time 
and  space  scales;  and  have  the  authority  to  either  encourage  or  force  the  inte-
gration of Federal science capacity to support decisions 

Connecting Science and Decision-Making 

In  2001–2002  I  had  the  good  fortune  to  take  a  sabbatical  from  the  Arizona  De-
partment  of  Water  Resources  to  work  for  what  at  the  time  was  NOAA’s  Office  of 
Global  Programs  (now  the  Climate  Office).  While  there,  I  worked  on  the  issue  of 
why Federal climate science often does not get used by water managers or decision- 
makers  more  generally.  I  spent  some  of  that  year  interviewing  both  climate  sci-
entists and people who studied the use of scientific information, and concluded that 
although  all  of  the  scientists  and  the  agencies  for  which  they  worked  had  good  in-
tentions,  a  variety  of  factors  accounted  for  the  failure  to  connect  science  and  deci-
sion-making.  I  wrote  a  workbook  based  on  my  findings  called  Connecting  Science, 
Policy  and  Decision-Making:  A  Handbook  for  Researchers  and  Science  Agencies.  I 
have provided copies to your staff. 

A big part of the bridging problem is communication: failure of scientists to under-
stand  how  the  information  they  generate  can  best  be  used,  and  failure  to  under-
stand  the  political,  institutional  and  economic  context  of  decisions.  Meanwhile,  re-
source  managers  lack  trust  in  ‘‘academic,  ivory-tower’’  information  or  mistrust  the 
government  in  general;  and  they  often  are  reluctant  to  innovate  and  use  data  and 
tools  from  new  sources.  At  a  very  basic  level  the  science  and  management  commu-
nities often fail to understand each other’s vocabulary and motivations. 

A  second  concern  is  that  scientists  aren’t  always  that  good  at  talking  with  each 
other. They come from different disciplinary backgrounds (hydrologists, atmospheric 
scientists,  oceanographers,  etc.),  and  often  ‘‘stick  with  their  own  kind.’’  Because  cli-
mate issues are by nature interdisciplinary, this can be a serious problem. 

A third big problem is that to a layperson, the messages that come from scientists 
and  science  agencies  often  appear  to  be  in  conflict.  In  the  case  of  climate  change, 
information has been highly politicized, leading people to incorrect conclusions about 
the  quality  of  the  information  and  the  degree  of  certainty  that  does  exist.  For  rea-
sons  that  are  unclear,  people  are  willing  to  tolerate  high  degrees  of  uncertainty  in 
most  other  aspects  of  their  lives,  but  the  bar  is  set  exceedingly  high  for  climate  in-
formation.  This  means  that  the  context  for  building  the  proposed  national  climate 
service is especially challenging. 

A  fourth  challenge,  possibly  the  biggest,  is  funding:  a  minute  portion  of  the  Fed-
eral science budget is spent on translating that science into useful decision support 
tools  and  timely,  relevant  sources  of  information.  There  is  a  lot  of  focus,  especially 
within  NOAA  and  NASA,  on  buoys,  satellites  and  massive  computing  capacity.  All 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

of  these  investments  have  dramatically  improved  the  understanding  of  underlying 
processes, atmospheric physics, land surface-atmospheric interactions, etc. However, 
translating data to information, and information to knowledge, requires a larger in-
vestment in decision support tools, data access, training and capacity building. 

Like  many  other  scientific  topics,  climate  science  is  complicated.  Climate  change 
presents  so  many  scientific  and  social  challenges,  across  regions  and  economic  sec-
tors,  at  multiple  scales  of  time  and  space,  that  building  more  capacity  to  translate 
climate  information  for  specific  applications  is  a  daunting  task.  The  only  way  that 
the  new  national  climate  service  will  succeed  is  if  it  empowers  a  multitude  of  re-
gional  support  networks  and  centers  to  engage  the  public  and  decisionmakers  at 
local scales—where decisions affected by climate are made on a regular basis. Fortu-
nately, we do have examples of successful bridging organizations, such as the NOAA 
Regional Integrated Science Assessment program, which are university partnerships 
focused on supporting the use of climate information. As has been shown in multiple 
cases,  products  that  are  developed  collaboratively  between  stakeholders  and  re-
searchers are more likely to be ‘‘owned’’ and used by the stakeholders—so the proc-
ess  of  network-building,  though  time-intensive,  brings  multiple  rewards.  But  this 
network  will  have  to  be  informed  by  a  well-coordinated  Federal  science  team—and 
the network itself will need to be well supported by Federal money. 
Building  Regional  Capacity  to  Respond:  Western  Water  and  Climate 

Change 

During the last week I heard the result of a large-scale assessment of public opin-
ion: less than half of Americans believe that climate change is a serious threat, and 
even in California roughly half connect climate change with water supply problems, 
though water supply impacts may be the most critical aspect of climate change and 
California  is  in  the  grip  of  a  large-scale  drought.  According  to  the  Pew  Center  for 
People  and  the  Press,  only  30  percent  of  Americans  consider  global  warming  to  be 
a priority. In a recent meeting in Arizona, water utility staff noted that their elected 
officials  show  very  little  interest  in  climate  change,  but  water  supply  reliability  is 
an issue that ‘‘keeps them awake at night.’’ Connecting the dots between cause and 
effect needs to be part of the ‘‘climate literacy’’ effort as we work to improve adapt-
ive capacity. 

Based on the findings of the International Panel on Climate Change, and the most 
recent  reports  from  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP),  the  water 
supplies  of  the  west  are  seriously  threatened  by  climate  change.  This  is  in  part  be-
cause  higher  temperatures  alone  have  dramatic  impacts  on  the  hydrologic  cycle— 
drying  soils,  reducing  runoff  into  rivers,  causing  more  evaporation  from  reservoirs, 
significantly  increasing  the  demand  for  water  for  ecosystems,  landscaping,  power 
generation  and  agriculture.  In  addition  to  higher  temperatures,  recent  climate 
model  information  suggests  that  the  southern  portions  of  the  American  Southwest 
and northern Mexico will also experience reduced precipitation. The result could be 
dire  consequences  for  the  Colorado  River  (the  current  best  estimate  by  a  team  of 
climate  scientists  from  universities  all  over  the  west  is  a  20  percent  reduction  in 
runoff  by  2050).  Given  rapid  growth,  increasing  demands  for  water,  and  the  over- 
appropriation  of  Colorado  River  water  rights,  this  prediction  is  not  a  happy  one  for 
the nearly 30 million people who depend on the Colorado. 

But  most  water  managers  do  not  even  know  about  the  CCSP  or  the  21  Science 
and  Assessment  Products  that  have  been  developed  in  the  last  couple  of  years.  It 
is clear that the 13 Federal science agencies that make up the CCSP do not coordi-
nate with each other particularly well, and coherent messages regarding their work 
are  not  penetrating  into  arenas  where  they  can  best  be  used.  If  we  are  to  have  an 
effective  and  efficient  climate  science  program  and  climate  service,  significant  re-
structuring of the program will be required so that regional issues like water supply 
availability in the Colorado River basin can be addressed. 
Ingredients of Successful Climate Services 

• User-centric  problem  definition:  to  provide  the  most  effective  services,  there 
must  be  an  ongoing  effort  to  identify  the  key  decisions  where  climate  informa-
tion  is  needed,  and  to  frame  at  least  some  portion  of  the  Federal  research  pro-
gram  around  those  decisions.  This  does  not  mean  that  we  should  halt  invest-
ment  in  basic  understanding  of  the  climate  system;  it  does  mean  that  we  need 
to  measure  our  progress  in  terms  of  improving  our  adaptive  capacity,  limiting 
risk,  improving  quality  of  life  and  building  economic  advantages  by  developing 
more problem-focused climate information. 
• Information at the time and space scales that decisions are made: an important 
component  of  providing  services  that  will  actually  be  used  is  building  a  system 
that provides answers at the scale of decisions, for example, focused on reservoir 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

operations at the watershed scale. Resource managers across the board are frus-
trated  that  climate  model  projections  are  at  such  a  large  scale  that  they  have 
little  utility  for  actual  decision-making.  Although  ‘‘downscaling’’  efforts  are 
being  initiated,  including  within  my  own  research  partnership,  we  are  a  long 
way from answering their questions. 

• Credibility  of  information:  A  lot  is  riding  on  the  decisions  associated  with  cli-
mate predictions, in some cases billions of dollars in infrastructure investments; 
in other cases these decisions may make or break a family or a business. Users 
need  to  trust  the  source  of  this  information.  Trust  comes  from  long-term  rela-
tionships  between  scientists  and  decision-makers;  building  these  relationships 
requires  a  long-term  commitment  of  funding  that  is  not  tied  to  the  politics  of 
individual administrations. 

• Adequate  funding  and  independent  budget  authority:  Because  the  problem  re-
quires  building  decision  support  infrastructure  (training  programs,  data  access 
systems,  monitoring  and  assessment  capacity,  etc.),  it  does  not  lend  itself  well 
to an ad-hoc funding source that is based on the good will of individual decision-
makers  within  the  13  Federal  science  agencies.  There  needs  to  be  significant, 
centralized coordination with budget authority to ensure that structural support 
is built and that outcomes are delivered. There will also need to be priority-set-
ting based on risk and vulnerability (among other considerations) and the proc-
ess  of  priority  setting  will  need  to  be  de-politicized.  Every  sector  and  every  re-
gion has needs, but we will not be able to meet all of the needs that are identi-
fied. 

• Clear  leadership  and  authority  focused  on  management  for  societal  outcomes: 
Because this assignment is so daunting and will involve so many people at var-
ious  scales,  there  needs  to  be  central  leadership  that  is  empowered  to  achieve 
outcomes that are valued by decision-makers and can cause agencies to engage 
through  incentives  and  if  necessary,  through  clear  articulation  of  expectations 
at  a  high  level.  Leaders  of  this  program  will  need  to  have  the  courage  to  take 
bold  steps,  including  harvesting  science  outcomes  that  may  not  be  viewed  by 
some as ‘‘ready for prime time’’ and testing their utility for improving decisions. 
• Buy-in,  coordination  and  engagement  of  Federal  agencies  beyond  NOAA:  Al-
though the roles of the various Federal agencies in the climate service have not 
been  identified,  NOAA  clearly  cannot  and  should  not  try  to  create  the  climate 
service on its own. Whatever coordination and management system is developed 
will  need  to  provide  incentives  for  all  of  the  agencies  to  work  together  toward 
common  goals.  There  is  no  time  and  no  money  for  turf  battles  over  the  compo-
nents  of  this  system.  NOAA  will  play  a  key  role,  but  this  project  will  require 
a variety of innovative partnerships with local and regional entities and univer-
sities as well as functional partnerships between Federal agencies. The capacity 
to do all of this coordination does not currently exist within NOAA. 

• A  central  portal  for  information  (clearinghouse  function/informatics):  Because 
providing  decision  support  that  is  timely,  relevant  and  credible  at  a  range  of 
time and space scales will be very expensive, we must harness information tech-
nology  to  provide  the  tools  that  local,  regional,  state,  tribal  and  sectoral  deci-
sion-makers  need.  In  many  cases,  providing  better  tools  over  the  Internet  and 
more  useful  ways  to  manipulate  and  visualize  data  may  move  us  a  long  ways 
forward. Major investments are required in the ‘‘cyberinfrastructure’’ of the cli-
mate service. Significant progress is being made along these lines in the context 
of the National Integrated Drought Information System (NIDIS) and at the Na-
tional Climate Data Center. 

• Adequate interface with communities, states, sectors, regions, tribes, etc.: The en-
gagement strategy needs to include ways to entrain, leverage and expand exist-
ing  operational  capacity  (including  the  NOAA  Regional  Integrated  Science  As-
sessment  Programs;  science  translation  capacity  within  universities,  including 
the  Cooperative  Extension  Programs;  natural  resources  management  NGO’s 
and a variety of private sector interests, and local and regional jurisdictions and 
interest groups). This interface needs to be managed on an ongoing basis to en-
sure  we  are  answering  the  right  questions,  that  there  is  two-way  communica-
tion,  and  that  there  is  ongoing  assessment  of  progress  (in  terms  of  both  out-
comes and process). 

• Capacity building and training programs: Because there are few people who are 
qualified  to  do  science  translation  for  specific  policy  applications,  a  deliberate 
effort to expand the community of people who can tailor science information for 
specific  applications  is  needed.  This  will  involve  partnerships  with  universities 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

as  well  as  training  programs  for  scientists,  resource  managers  and  elected  offi-
cials. 
• Enhanced, strategic observation and modeling capability: Despite my strong ad-
vocacy for more focus on engagement and decisions, there is a major disconnect 
between adaptation in regions and sectors and the types of monitoring that are 
currently  underway.  Although  we  have  made  great  progress  in  remote  sensing, 
and  satellites  can  provide  reams  of  new  information  at  very  useful  scales,  our 
ground-truthing  capacity  is  totally  inadequate.  One  of  the  biggest  travesties  is 
the  disintegration  of  the  USGS  stream  gage  program  at  exactly  the  point  in 
time  when  we  need  more  and  better  gaging  information.  We  also  need  more 
snow  monitoring  sites,  more  soil  moisture  measurements,  etc.  Strategic  design 
of  the  monitoring  program  to  focus  on  answering  important  management  ques-
tions and to detect trends in real time is critical to better adaptive capacity. 
• Avoiding maladaptive decisions: Many past decisions have increased our vulner-
ability  to  climate  events  (e.g.,  allowing  construction  in  floodplains  and  in  low- 
lying  coastal  areas,  subsidies  for  agricultural  activities  that  increase  demands 
for water and power without providing commensurate benefits, etc.). In the con-
text  of  the  stimulus  bill  we  are  engaging  in  building  significant  quantities  of 
new  infrastructure.  A  critical  feature  of  adaptation  is  learning  from  past  mis-
takes: let’s make sure that this new infrastructure is designed for changing cli-
mate conditions, including using new engineering standards that recognize non- 
stationarity  in  the  climate  system  and  the  already-evident  increase  in  extreme 
events such as flooding, coastal erosion and storm surges. 

Conclusions 

By  some  accounts,  the  U.S.  Government  has  spent  more  than  $30  billion  in  the 
last 8 years on climate science, and perhaps $100 billion total. Given the magnitude 
of this investment, it is clearly time to take stock of what we do know, and though 
we  haven’t  answered  every  question,  empower  decisionmakers  to  access  and  use 
that  information  with  full  understanding  of  its  limitations.  Improvements  in  fore-
cast skill will always be welcome, but lack of skill is not the real reason that climate 
information is under-used. If provided with the tools to assess the quality of the in-
formation,  and  with  access  to  ‘‘science  translators,’’  the  resource  managers  of  this 
country  will  make  their  own  judgments  about  the  types  of  information  that  could 
be  useful  to  them.  They  are  eager  to  have  more  tools  at  their  disposal.  Clearly  we 
need  to  keep  investing  in  research  on  both  climate  variability  and  on  climate 
change—but it is time to get more value out of the investments that we have made. 
Thank you very much for the opportunity to comment on this extremely important 
topic.  After  having  worked  on  this  subject  for  years,  it  is  gratifying  to  see  that  we 
are  on  the  brink  of  making  significant  progress  in  this  arena  and  of  joining  forces 
with  the  rest  of  the  world  to  limit  the  impacts  of  climate  change  through  building 
adaptive  capacity  as  well  as  by  limiting  this  country’s  contributions  to  greenhouse 
gas emissions. 

If you have any questions I would be very happy to respond. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Dr. Jacobs. 
Sean Dilweg. 

STATEMENT OF SEAN DILWEG, COMMISSIONER OF 

INSURANCE, STATE OF WISCONSIN ON BEHALF OF THE 

NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMMISSIONERS 
Mr. DILWEG. Thank you, Chairman Rockefeller, Ranking Member 
Hutchison,  and  Members  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science, 
and Transportation. 

My  name  is  Sean  Dilweg.  I  am  the  Insurance  Commissioner  for 
the State of Wisconsin, and I’m here on behalf of all the Insurance 
Commissioners  for  the  National  Association  of  Insurance  Commis-
sioners. 

Today, I will focus on our position and perspective on the poten-
tial  insurance-related  impacts  of  climate  change.  I  will  also  offer 
suggestions for insurance-regulator action to protect consumers and 
address  insurance  solvency,  recognizing  that  climate-change-re-
lated risk continues to grow. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

The  insurance  sector  is  uniquely  positioned  between  the  causes 
and the impacts of climate change. Last year, I chaired our Climate 
Change  Task  Force  and  spent  a  lot  of  time  with  industry  and  con-
sumer advocates crafting a white paper, that was adopted by all of 
my  fellow  Commissioners,  that  is  outlined  and,  I  know,  presented 
to the Committee, called ‘‘The Potential Impact of Climate Change 
on  Insurance  Regulation.’’  We  have  also  been  pursuing  disclosure 
requirements  on  our  insurance  companies.  This  would  be  the  first 
mandatory disclosure survey on any industry in the U.S. 

I  want  to  touch  on  a  few  different  areas,  and  I’ll  start  by  speak-

ing to insurance investments. 

It  is  imperative  regulators  examine  how  climate  change  will  im-
pact  the  investments  insurers  hold  and  establish  applicable  regu-
latory standards for investment practices of insurers. Direct and in-
direct  investments  in  real  estate  represent  a  portion  of  all  assets 
held by insurers. Many of these properties are located within coast-
al  areas  with  increasing  risk  from  climate-change-influenced 
weather  perils,  like  hurricanes  and  flooding.  As  investors  in  these 
properties, insurers may be exposed to greater investment risk. In-
surance  regulators  need  to  recognize  the  risk  of  weather-related 
losses  on  real  estate  is  complex.  It  can  arise,  not  only  from  declin-
ing asset values, but also the costs of fortification, physical damage 
to structures, and associated business interruption. 

As  regulators  of  one  of  the  largest  American  industries,  it  is  es-
sential  that  insurance  regulators  assess,  and,  to  the  extent  pos-
sible, mitigate, the impacts of climate change while encouraging in-
surers  to  incentivize  sustainable  practices.  As  such,  insurers  have 
historically  played  a  role  in  the  mitigation  of  losses.  For  example, 
as the result of fire disasters in the late 1800s, insurers led the ef-
fort  to  improve  building  codes  and  develop  new  building  and  loss 
mitigation techniques to reduce the effect of fire. You could say the 
modern-day city is heavily influenced by insurers. When you think 
about  cities  back  in  the  late  1800s,  you  had  a  lot  of  wooden  build-
ings, a lot of candles, a lot of gaslight. And finally the insurers just 
started saying, ‘‘Look, you need a fire station every five blocks. You 
need a water system put in place.’’ And that is what occurred, and 
that’s  what  we  have  today.  Today,  insurers  can  also  help  mitigate 
the impact of climate change by promoting the adoption of vigorous 
enforcement of uniform building codes throughout the Nation. 

The  task  force  heard  from  software  developers  on  catastrophic 
modeling  as  it  exists  today.  We  heard  from  EQECAT  and  AIR 
Worldwide  regarding  the  insurer’s  ability  to  make  the  use  of  so-
phisticated  catastrophe  modeling.  These  models  provided  insurers 
with  the  ability  to  assess  risk  and  price  their  products  with  a  de-
gree  of  accuracy.  These  models,  however,  only  have  a  short-term 
focus—generally,  5  years  or  less.  Climate  change  modeling,  how-
ever,  takes  a  much  longer  view—50  years  or  more—and  attempts 
to  evaluate  the  risk  impact  of  gradual  changes  on  climate,  instead 
of  measuring  the  risk  associated  with  swift  and  severe  events,  as 
well  as  the  frequency  of  those  events.  Our  task  force  heard  from 
the  scientists  working  at  the  National  Center  for  Atmospheric  Re-
search, where climate change modeling is evolving. In light of this, 
the  task  force  recognizes  that  the  science  behind  climate  modeling 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

as  it  evolves  is  appropriate  for  the  approach  that  regulators  take 
with respect to climate change to evolve, as well. 

We  also  pursued,  this  year,  a  forward-looking  disclosure  ap-
proach  to  provide  investors,  consumers,  and  regulators  with  eight 
reporting questions that will be phased in over the next few years. 
It  represents  a  good  first  step  in  showing  how  the  risks  of  climate 
change occur on our insurers every day. I expect this to be adopted 
by the NAIC next week. 

It is clear to regulators that, whatever the cause, be it manmade 
or  natural,  climate  change  is  occurring.  From  intensified  hurri-
canes  off  the  coast  of  Africa  to  the  dryness  or  extreme  wetness  of 
a  Midwest  summer,  climate  change  has  an  effect  on  our  insurable 
interests,  and  thereby  the  companies  and  policyholders  that  each 
state  regulates.  The  NAIC  supports  State  and  Federal  tools  to  in-
crease  the  accuracy  of  climate  science  as  a  basis  for  product  pric-
ing.  It  also  supports  increased  climate  science  research  funding  to 
speed relevant climate change information to market. 

We look forward to working with the Committee and Congress on 
this issue as the science continues to evolve. Thank you for holding 
this  hearing  and  for  inviting  me  here  today.  I  look  forward  to  an-
swering any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Dilweg follows:] 

THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SEAN DILWEG,  COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE,  STATE OF 
INSURANCE 

WISCONSIN ON BEHALF OF
COMMISSIONERS 
Chairman  Rockefeller,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, thank you for the opportunity to 
testify  today.  My  name  is  Sean  Dilweg.  I  am  the  Insurance  Commissioner  for  the 
State of Wisconsin and I am here on behalf of the National Association of Insurance 
Commissioners.  In  my  testimony,  I  will  focus  on  the  NAIC’s  position  and  thinking 
on  the  potential  insurance  related  impacts  of  climate  change,  I  will  also  offer  sug-
gestions for insurance regulator action to protect consumers and address insurer sol-
vency, recognizing climate change related risk continues to grow. 

Let me begin first by stating that the most important duty of an Insurance Com-
missioner  is  to  protect  insurance  consumers.  It  is  the  primary  job  of  any  insurance 
regulator  to  ensure  that  insurance  companies  remain  solvent  so  that  they  can  pay 
claims as they become due, and to ensure that insurance customers’ and claimants’ 
rights and interests are protected. 
Investments 

It  is  imperative  regulators  examine  how  climate  change  will  impact  the  invest-
ments  insurers  hold  and  establish  applicable  regulatory  standards  for  the  invest-
ment  practices  of  insurers.  Direct  and  indirect  investments  in  real  estate  represent 
a portion of all assets held by insurers. Many of these properties are located within 
coastal  areas  with  increasing  risk  from  climate  change  influenced  weather  perils 
like  hurricanes  and  flooding.  As  investors  in  these  properties,  insurers  may  be  ex-
posed  to  greater  investment  risk.  Insurance  regulators  need  to  recognize  that  the 
risk  of  weather-related  losses  on  real  estate  is  complex.  It  can  arise  not  only  from 
declining  asset  values,  but  also  the  costs  of  fortification,  physical  damage  to  struc-
tures, and associated business interruption. 

Historically, and from a viewpoint of social construct, insurance has helped shape 
towns and cities as an essential financial security tool for individual and community 
economic  development,  with  a  corollary  that  availability  and  affordability  are  also 
essential. It is clear that loss mitigation and loss prevention are the most viable so-
lutions  to  both  current  marketplace  problems  and  the  growing  threat  of  climate 
change and global warming. It is the only way to moderate and reduce the incidence 
and severity of catastrophe events. 

Accordingly, it is vitally important that insurers begin to assess and take into ac-
count  the  effects  of  climate  change  on  all  lines  of  insurance,  from  intensified  hurri-
canes  off  of  the  coast  of  Africa  to  the  dryness  of  a  Midwest  summer.  Changes  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

climate have a direct effect on our insurable interests and the companies and policy-
holders that each state regulates. 
Mitigation 

Insurance regulators must assess and, to the extent possible, mitigate the impact 
that climate change will have on insurance and encourage insurers to provide incen-
tives  for  policyholders  to  engage  in  practices  that  will  ultimately  strive  to  limit 
losses.  As  such,  insurers  have  historically  played  a  leading  role  in  loss  mitigation 
efforts.  For  example,  as  a  result  of  fire  disasters,  insurers  led  the  effort  to  improve 
building  codes  and  develop  new  building  and  loss  mitigation  techniques  to  reduce 
the effects of fire. Insurers in coastal regions are often leading proponents of better 
land  use  policies  and  mitigation  efforts,  such  as  roof  strapping  and  storm  shutters. 
Likewise,  insurers  can  help  mitigate  the  impact  of  climate  change  by  promoting 
adoption and vigorous enforcement of uniform building codes. They can also promote 
building code upgrades and retrofits of existing structures by offering premium dis-
counts  for  proven  loss  mitigation  building  techniques,  and  by  advocating  for  lender 
or government sponsored low interest loans for these mitigation activities. 

Some insurers have developed new products that provide coverage for green build-
ings.  Fireman’s  Fund  Insurance  Company  has  introduced  Certified  Green  Building 
Replacement  and  Green  Upgrade  coverage,  a  new  coverage  specifically  for  green 
commercial buildings that addresses the unique risks that come along with sustain-
able building practices. 
CAT Modeling 

The NAIC heard from several catastrophe modeling firms who explained how cli-
mate  change  factors  into  risk  modeling  techniques.  Catastrophe  models  provide  in-
surers  with  the  ability  to  assess  risk  and  price  their  products  with  some  degree  of 
accuracy.  However,  these  models  tend  to  have  a  short-term  focus  of  generally  5 
years  or  less,  while  climate  change  modeling  takes  a  much  longer  view—10  years 
or  more—and  attempts  to  evaluate  the  risk  impact  of  gradual  changes  in  climate 
instead of measuring the risk associated with swift and severe events as well as the 
frequency  of  those  events.  The  NAIC  also  heard  from  scientists  working  at  the  Na-
tional  Center  for  Atmospheric  Research  (NCAR)  who  indicated  that  climate  change 
modeling  is  relatively  new  and  still  evolving.  In  light  of  this,  the  NAIC  recognizes 
that  as  the  science  behind  climate  modeling  evolves,  it  will  provide  better  tools  for 
companies and regulators and could increasingly factor into insurance decision-mak-
ing. 
NAIC Climate Change Task Force And White Paper 

In  2007,  the  GAO  reported  that  climate  change  was  an  emerging  high  risk  area 
with long-term growth in exposure to private and Federal insurers but that the two 
sectors  were  responding,  assessing  and  incorporating  the  potential  long-term  finan-
cial impacts differently. As an initial step in addressing the issue, the NAIC formed 
the  Climate  Change  and  Global  Warming  (EX)  Task  Force.  The  Task  Force  was 
charged with, among other duties, the responsibility of drafting a white paper docu-
menting the potential insurance related impacts of climate change on insurance con-
sumers,  insurers  and  insurance  regulators.  The  Task  Force  recommended  its  white 
paper,  The  Potential  Impact  of  Climate  Change  on  Insurance  Regulation,  and  the 
NAIC adopted it on June 2, 2008. 

In  sum,  the  Task  Force  white  paper  discusses  investment  issues  facing  insurers 
and  notes  that  some  investment  opportunities  will  arise.  It  encourages  insurers  to 
evaluate the geographic spread of the risks they are insuring and encourages insur-
ers  to  develop  contingency  plans.  The  White  paper  also  emphasizes  the  importance 
of  greater  disclosure.  It  encourages  insurers  to  become  involved  in  strengthening 
building  codes  and  advocating  for  sound  land-use  planning  and  become  more  in-
volved  in  loss  prevention  and  mitigation.  It  also  recognizes  the  impact  of  demand 
surge,  post-event  living  expense  increases,  and  issues  with  business  interruption 
coverages and suggests that new solvency regulatory tools are needed. 

The  NAIC  Task  Force  also  provides  a  forum  to  bring  together  all  interested  par-
ties  for  a  transparent  discussion  and  development  of  required  information  stand-
ards, innovative product ideas, and evolving technologies. The Task Force has been 
involved in a number of key efforts: 

• Presentations  by  the  U.S.  Green  Building  Council  (USGBC)  on  Green  Building 
Standards and the environmental impact of building green. Topics included the 
impact of commercial and residential building on our environment; the environ-
mental, lifestyle, and business advantages of building green; and information on 
USGBC’s educational offerings. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

• Discussions  on  innovative  ‘‘Green’’  insurance  products  offered  by  Fireman’s 
Fund.  Representatives  from  Fireman’s  Fund,  a  subsidiary  of  Allianz,  spoke 
about  their  variety  of  ‘‘green’’  insurance  products,  such  as  providing  insurance 
coverage  for  certified  green  buildings  and  upgrades  of  traditional  buildings  fol-
lowing a loss, and a ‘‘green’’ homeowners policy (available to Illinois as of June 
1,  2008  and  many  other  states  starting  in  July  2008).  Homeowners  products 
have  taken  a  lead  from  the  commercial  products,  and  both  have  been  well  re-
ceived in all regions nationwide. 
• Presentation on CALSTRS Green Investment Strategy by its CEO, Jack Ehnes. 
Subjects  included  the  incorporation  of  the  United  Nations’  Principles  for  Re-
sponsible  Investments  (PRI)  that  integrates  active  ownership  and  environ-
mental, social, and governance issues into ownership policies and practices; the 
readiness,  preparedness,  responsiveness  of  the  U.S.  insurance  industry  for  Cli-
mate Change; the current vagueness and lack of voluntary disclosure of climate 
risk;  and  requiring  questions  that  would  allow  for  better  understanding  of  po-
tential impacts on affordability of insurance and insurers’ financial health. 
• A  presentation  on  the  California  perspective  on  Climate  Change  by  Lisbeth 
Landsman-Smith  of  the  California  Department  of  Insurance,  and  Max  Moritz 
of Environmental Science, Policy, and Management, from U.C. Berkeley. Topics 
included  development  of  a  more  comprehensive  plan  for  handling  the  implica-
tions of fire hazards; refinement of Fire Hazard Severity Zone (FHSZ) mapping 
and  a  more  risk-based  approach;  and  an  increase  of  equitability  and  reduction 
of uncertainties, in addition to assessing fees and research funding. 
• The  Climate  Risk  Disclosure  Working  Group  met  in  Boulder,  Colorado  at  the 
National Center for Atmospheric Research (NCAR) on September 11, 2008. Dur-
ing the meeting, the Working Group: 
» Heard  from  three  scientists  regarding  current  climate  change  research  and 

modeling. 

» Heard a presentation from Risk Management Solutions (RMS) examining cur-

rent hurricane model capabilities and reliability; 

» Discussed the August 15, 2008 draft Climate Risk Disclosure Proposal, includ-

ing verbal comments from interested parties. 

• Presentations  from  EQECAT  and  AIR  regarding  how  climate  is  considered  in 

hurricane catastrophe models. During the presentations the regulators: 
» Discovered  that  there  are  issues  related  to  merging  atmospheric  data  with 
historical  hurricane  data,  particularly  with  projections  in  the  1–10  year 
range.  To  compensate,  modelers  are  beginning  to  use  multiple  models  with 
varying  assumption  methods  (both  historical  and  a  blend  of  historical  and 
predictive). However, the modelers agree that there will be relatively more in-
tense hurricanes with more rainfall, with intensity increasing dramatically by 
approximately 2020. 

» Learned  that  modelers  are  less  certain  regarding  projections  about  the  num-
ber  of  hurricanes  that  will  make  landfall  in  the  U.S.  due  to  the  conflicting 
hurricane scenarios between the Atlantic and Pacific Coasts. 

• Presentation  from  Henry  Fox  (Fox  Consulting)  providing  an  update  on  the  de-
velopment of climate trend data. He discussed his research on historical weath-
er  trends  in  separate  weather  zones  throughout  the  U.S.  over  a  50-year  period 
in an effort to forecast future weather trends. His patented forecasting methods 
are  unique  in  that  they  place  a  heavier  weighting  on  more  recent  years.  His 
findings  suggest  that  some  zones  show  increases  in  average  temperature  or 
rainfall  while  other  zones  show  decreases.  He  did  not  believe  his  findings  sup-
port  the  overall  global  warming  theories.  He  suggested  that  his  work  could  be 
used  by  the  insurance  industry  and  American  businesses  to  better  understand 
long-term weather-related risks in the weather zones examined. 
• A  presentation  from  3C,  a  company  that  provides  carbon  neutral  services,  re-
garding how the European Union and U.S. carbon trading markets function. 3C 
also  provided  information  to  the  Task  Force  about  a  joint  venture  product  in-
volving 3C and Allianz called, ‘‘Ecomotion.’’ 
• Discussions on pay as you drive insurance. 
Additionally, looking forward at 2009, we anticipate that the Task Force will look 
at hosing a possible climate change summit, and consider development of a guidance 
document  aiding  insurers  in  how  they  should  respond  to  the  Insurer  Climate  Risk 
Disclosure Survey, referenced below. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Disclosure 

23 

It is challenging for regulators to determine how well-prepared the industry is for 
the challenges of climate change. U.S. Insurers lag in SEC disclosure that relate to 
climate change. Only 15 percent of U.S. insurers surveyed discussed climate change 
in 10K filings, compared to 100 percent of electric utilities and 78 percent of oil com-
panies. There was also a poor response to the Carbon Disclosure Project where only 
30  percent  of  U.S.  insurers  responded,  compared  to  70  percent  in  Europe  and  62 
percent in the rest of the world. 

The  NAIC  has  taken  a  forward  looking  approach  to  developing  assessment  tools 
that identify the potential impact climate change has on insurers and how insurers 
are  assessing  those  risks.  The  Insurer  Climate  Disclosure  Survey  is  the  first  of  its 
kind  in  any  industry  and  could  serve  as  a  model  for  financial  institutions  to  gain 
insight into the impact of climate change on their industries. 

The  Insurer  Climate  Risk  Disclosure  Survey  is  a  mandatory  public  survey  docu-
ment  that  will  be  phased  in  over  the  next  few  years.  It  represents  a  good  first  ap-
proach to climate change so that regulators, consumers and companies can begin to 
understand  how  climate  change  is  affecting  the  risks  that  are  underwritten  every-
day. The Disclosure Survey is meant to be a starting point and the Task Force rec-
ognizes  that  as  the  science  behind  climate  modeling  evolves,  so  must  the  approach 
of regulators. 

The  Disclosure  Survey  standardizes  climate  risk  disclosure  information  to  make 
it  easy  for  companies  to  provide  that  information.  Given  the  infancy  of  this  issue, 
the  Disclosure  Survey  has  been  kept  to  eight  general  reporting  questions  for  insur-
ers  that  meet  certain  premium  thresholds.  However,  it  still  provides  some  measure 
of transparency so that investors and regulators can better identify risks. 

The  questions  seek  general  information  from  insurers  about  things  they  have 
done  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  (GHG)  emissions  in  their  operations,  whether  they 
have a climate change statement of policy, whether they consider climate change as 
they choose investments and what they have done to encourage policyholders to re-
duce losses caused by climate influenced events. Further questions delve deeper into 
insurer  use  of  climate  computer  simulation  modeling,  analysis  of  climate  change’s 
impact on an insurer’s investment portfolio and how the insurers are engaging their 
constituencies on the topic of climate change. 

Insurance  regulators  believe  this  is  the  first  step  of  many  in  assessing  insurance 
industry efforts to measure the impact of climate change on insurer operations and 
policyholders. 

Regulators  also  have  a  role  to  play  in  ensuring  that  environmental  benefits 
claimed by insurers are authentic and reasonably quantified to lend validity to these 
efforts. 

The  NAIC  supports  efforts  to  increase  the  exactness  of  climate  science  as  a  basis 
for  more  accurate  product  pricing  and  in  more  climate  science  research  funding  to 
speed the delivery of relevant climate change information to market. 

We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  and  Congress  on  this  issue  as 
the science continues to evolve. Thank you for holding this hearing, for inviting me 
here  today,  and  for  your  continued  interest  and  leadership.  I  am  happy  to  answer 
any questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, sir. 
Mr. Alix. 

STATEMENT OF FRANK ALIX, CEO, POWERSPAN CORP. 

Mr. ALIX. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for the opportunity to share 
my  perspective  on  how  science  informs  climate  mitigation  strate-
gies. 

My  testimony  today  will  focus  on  the  importance  of  carbon  cap-
ture and sequestration as a climate change mitigation strategy, the 
prospects for commercial deployment of carbon capture technologies 
on  coal-fired  power  plants,  and  the  actions  the  government  can 
take to accelerate CCS deployment. 

We all know that coal is abundant and cheap. It supplies 50 per-
cent  of  the  electricity  in  the  U.S.  and  80  percent  in  China.  The 
economies of the Midwest, South, Southwest, and Plains States de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

pend heavily on low-cost electricity from coal. Therefore, CCS is the 
most  important  climate  change  mitigation  strategy  we  can  pursue. 
According  to  the  EIA,  36  percent  of  U.S.  CO2 emissions  in  2006 
came  from  coal  consumption.  Broadly  deploying  CCS  with  90-per-
cent  capture  efficiency  could  reduce  those  emissions  to  4  to  5  per-
cent. 

Since  the  transportation  sector  accounts  for  another  34  percent 
of  U.S.  CO2 emissions,  transforming  this  sector  with  electric  vehi-
cles  powered  by  low-carbon  electricity  could  reduce  our  CO2 emis-
sions by another 20 to 30 percent. Therefore, CCS could potentially 
provide  over  half  of  the  emission  reductions  required  to  meet  our 
climate change mitigation goals. 

Powerspan  has  been  developing  and  commercializing  advanced 
clean  coal  technology  since  1994.  Our  approach  to  CO2 capture  is 
a  post-combustion  process  designed  to  capture  90  percent  of  CO2 
emissions.  The  technology  is  suitable  for  retrofit  to  the  existing 
coal-fired generating fleet and for new coal plants. 

Pilot-scale  testing  of  our  ECO2 technology  began  in  December 
2008  at  FirstEnergy’s  Burger  Plant  in  Southeastern  Ohio,  right 
across  from  Moundsville,  West  Virginia.  The  ECO2 plant  was  de-
signed  to  treat  a  1  megawatt  flue-gas  stream  and  capture  20  tons 
of CO2 per day. Initial testing has demonstrated 80-percent capture 
efficiency,  which  is  a  promising  start.  We  recently  completed  two 
minor  design  modifications  that  we  expect  will  increase  the  CO2- 
capture rate to 90 percent. 

The pilot plant was built using the same type of equipment that 
we  plan  to  use  in  commercial  systems.  Therefore,  successful  oper-
ation of the pilot unit will confirm our design assumptions and cost 
estimates  for  large-scale  CCS  projects.  Although  commercial-scale 
CCS projects still have some risk, that risk is manageable, because 
the  major  equipment  used  in  the  ECO2 process  has  been  used  in 
other commercial applications at the scale required for CCS. 

Our experience in the emerging market for commercial-scale CCS 
projects  supports  our  optimism.  In  2007,  Basin  Electric  Power  Co-
operative conducted a competitive solicitation for a post-combustion 
CO2-capture  technology  to  retrofit  their  Antelope  Valley  Station, 
which is a coal-fired power plant located in Beulah, North Dakota. 
The  Antelope  Valley  Project  will  install  CO2-capture  equipment  on 
a  120-megawatt  flue-gas  slipstream  taken  from  a  450-megawatt 
unit.  Basin  Electric  has  targeted  90-percent  capture  efficiency  to 
provide  1  million  tons  of  CO2 annually  for  enhanced  oil  recovery. 
Six  of  the  leading  vendors  of  CO2-capture  technology  responded  to 
the  solicitation.  And  after  a  detailed  evaluation,  Basin  Electric  se-
lected  Powerspan.  This  commercial  CCS  project  is  scheduled  to 
start up in 2012. 

Since  being  selected  for  the  project,  a  feasibility  study  has  con-
firmed that there are no technical limitations to deploying ECO2 at 
the plant. The study estimated costs of less than $40-per-ton for 90 
percent CO2 capture and compression. A similar study of ECO2 re-
cently  conducted  for  a  760-megawatt  supercritical  coal  plant  esti-
mates CO2-capture costs of under $30 per ton. A third engineering 
study focused on ECO2 scaling risk determined that our pilot plant 
will  provide  sufficient  design  information  to  confidently  build  com-
mercial-scale systems up to 760 megawatts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Despite  the  promise  indicated  by  the  Basin  Electric  project, 
strong government action is needed to ensure timely deployment of 
CCS  technology  to  support  our  climate  change  mitigation  goals. 
Government  action  should  focus  on  three  areas:  (1)  a  strong  mar-
ket-based cap on greenhouse gas emissions; (2) a CO2 emission per-
formance  standard  for  new  coal-fired  power  plants,  and  (3)  early 
deployment incentives for commercial-scale CCS systems. 

Incentives  are  needed  to  ensure  early  deployment  of  CCS,  be-
cause  CO2-capture  technology  is  not  yet  commercially  proven  and 
early  CO2 prices  will  not  be  sufficient  to  offset  CCS  costs.  To  be 
most  effective,  these  incentives  must  provide  long-term  CO2 price 
certainty  to  facilitate  project  financing  and  must  be  awarded  com-
petitively, preferably by a reverse auction, in order to minimize the 
costs while providing a market signal on the real cost for early CCS 
installations. 

Early  deployment  of  CCS  technology  will  also  create  jobs  and 
promote  economic  growth.  These  projects  require  3  to  4  years  to 
implement and create significant economic activity over their dura-
tion. 

In  addition,  by  incenting  early  deployment  of  CCS,  the  U.S.  can 
assume a leading position in this critical technology sector and cre-
ate  a  thriving  high-tech  export  business,  and  the  quality  jobs  that 
come with it. 

In  summary,  CO2-capture  technology  is  commercially  available 
from  several  qualified  vendors  with  standard  commercial  guaran-
tees. Independent studies show that early commercial installations 
of CO2-capture technology are likely to be successful. The most im-
portant  reason  to  promote  early  deployment  of  CCS  is  that  post- 
combustion CO2-capture technologies will preserve the huge invest-
ment  in  existing  coal-fired  power  plants  and  allow  us  to  use  effec-
tively the abundant low-cost coal reserves in the U.S. and in devel-
oping nations, even in a climate-constrained world. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Alix follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRANK ALIX, CEO, POWERSPAN CORP. 

Good morning, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. Thank you for the 
opportunity to share my perspective on how science informs climate change mitiga-
tion  strategies.  My  name  is  Frank  Alix  and  I  am  CEO  of  Powerspan  Corp.,  which 
is a clean energy technology company headquartered in New Hampshire. 

My testimony today will focus on the importance of carbon capture and sequestra-
tion (CCS) as a climate change mitigation strategy, the prospects for commercial de-
ployment  of  carbon-capture  technologies  on  coal-fired  power  plants,  and  the  actions 
the government can take to accelerate CCS deployment. 

We all know that coal is abundant and cheap. It supplies 50 percent of electricity 
generated  in  the  U.S.  and  80  percent  in  China.  The  economies  of  the  Midwest, 
South,  Southwest,  and  Plains  States  depend  heavily  on  low-cost  electricity  from 
coal.  Therefore,  CCS  is  the  most  important  climate  change  mitigation  strategy  we 
can pursue. 

According  to  the  EIA,  36  percent  of  U.S.  CO2 emissions  in  2006  came  from  coal 
consumption. Broadly deploying CCS with 90 percent capture efficiency could reduce 
those emissions to 4–5 percent. EIA predicts that CCS will have to provide at least 
30  percent  of  CO2 emission  reductions  needed  worldwide  to  stabilize  GHG  con-
centrations  in  the  atmosphere.  Since  the  transportation  sector  accounts  for  another 
34  percent  of  U.S.  CO2 emissions,  transforming  this  sector  with  electric  vehicles 
powered  by  low-carbon  electricity  sources  could  reduce  our  CO2 emissions  by  an-
other 20–30 percent. Therefore, CCS could potentially provide over half of the emis-
sion reductions required to meet our climate change mitigation goals. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Powerspan  has  been  developing  and  commercializing  advanced  clean  coal  tech-
,  is 
nology  since  its  inception  in  1994.  Our  approach  to  CO2 capture,  called  ECO2
a post-combustion process for conventional power plants designed to capture 90 per-
cent  of  CO2 emissions.  The  technology  is  suitable  for  retrofit  to  the  existing  coal- 
fired  generating  fleet  and  for  new  coal-fired  plants.  ECO2 is  a  regenerative  process 
that uses an ammonia-based solution to capture CO2 in the flue gas. Once the CO2 
is  captured,  the  solution  is  regenerated  to  release  CO2 in  a  form  that  is  ready  for 
compression and pipeline transport for geological storage. 

Pilot  scale  testing  of  our  ECO2

technology  began  in  December  2008  at 
FirstEnergy’s  Burger  Plant  in  Southeastern  Ohio.  The  ECO2 pilot  was  designed  to 
treat a 1-megawatt (MW) flue gas stream and produce 20 tons of CO2 per day. Ini-
tial  testing  has  demonstrated  80  percent  CO2-capture  efficiency,  which  is  a  prom-
ising  start.  We  recently  completed  two  minor  design  modifications  that  we  expect 
will increase the CO2-capture rate to 90 percent. 

The  ECO2 pilot  plant  was  built  using  the  same  type  of  equipment  that  we  plan 
to  use  in  commercial  systems.  Therefore,  successful  operation  of  the  pilot  unit  will 
confirm  our  design  assumptions  and  cost  estimates  for  large-scale  carbon  capture 
and sequestration (CCS) projects. Although commercial scale CCS projects still have 
some  risk,  that  risk  is  manageable  because  the  major  equipment  used  in  the  ECO2 
process—large  absorbers,  pumps,  heat  exchangers,  and  compressors—have  all  been 
used  in  other  commercial  applications  at  the  scale  required  for  CCS.  The  advanced 
technology  in  ECO2 is  innovative  process  chemistry.  Commercial  application  of  this 
unique  technology  holds  no  special  challenges  and  therefore  has  a  high  probability 
of commercial success. 

Our  experience  in  the  emerging  market  for  commercial-scale  CCS  projects  sup-
ports our optimism. In 2007, Basin Electric Power Cooperative conducted a competi-
tive solicitation for a post-combustion CO2-capture technology to retrofit their Ante-
lope Valley Station, which is a coal-fired power plant located adjacent to their Great 
Plains Synfuels Plant in Beulah, North Dakota. Their synfuels plant currently hosts 
the largest CCS project in the world, with three million tons of CO2 captured annu-
ally  and  sold  for  enhanced  oil  recovery  (EOR)  in  the  Weyburn  fields  of  Saskatch-
ewan. The Antelope Valley project will install CO2-capture equipment on a 120–MW 
flue gas slipstream taken from a 450–MW unit. Basin Electric has targeted 90 per-
cent  CO2-capture  efficiency  to  provide  an  additional  1  million  tons  of  CO2 annually 
for EOR. Six of the leading vendors of CO2-capture technology responded to the An-
telope  Valley  solicitation  and  after  a  detailed  evaluation,  Basin  Electric  selected 
Powerspan. This commercial CCS project is scheduled to start up in 2012. 

Since  being  selected  for  the  Antelope  Valley  project,  a  feasibility  study  has  con-
firmed  that  there  are  no  technical  limitations  to  deploying  ECO2 at  the  plant.  The 
study estimated ECO2 costs of less than $40 per ton for 90 percent CO2 capture and 
compression  (in  current  dollars,  with  +/¥  30  percent  accuracy).  A  similar  study  of 
ECO2 recently conducted for a new 760–MW supercritical pulverized coal plant esti-
mates CO2-capture costs of under $30 per ton, including compression. A third engi-
neering  study  focused  on  ECO2 scaling  risk  determined  that  the  ECO2 pilot  plant 
will  provide  sufficient  design  information  to  confidently  build  commercial  scale  sys-
tems  up  to  760–MW,  supporting  that  ECO2 technology  scaling  risk  is  manageable. 
Independent  engineering  firms  led  the  feasibility,  cost,  and  scaling  studies  for  our 
prospective  customers.  As  a  sign  of  our  confidence  in  commercial  deployment  of 
ECO2 systems,  we  will  back  our  installations  with  industry  standard  performance 
guarantees. 

Despite the promise indicated by the Basin Electric project, strong government ac-
tion  is  needed  to  ensure  timely  deployment  of  CCS  technology  to  support  climate 
change  mitigation  goals.  Government  actions  should  focus  on  three  areas:  (1)  a 
strong, market-based cap on GHG emissions, (2) a CO2 emission performance stand-
ard  for  new  coal-based  power  plants,  and  (3)  early  deployment  incentives  for  com-
mercial  scale  CCS  systems.  Due  to  limited  time,  I  will  only  elaborate  on  my  third 
point, the need for CCS incentives. 

Incentives  are  needed  to  ensure  early  deployment  of  CCS  because  CO2-capture 
technology is not yet commercially proven and early CO2 prices will not be sufficient 
to  offset  CCS  costs.  To  be  most  effective,  CCS  incentives  must  provide  long-term 
CO2 price  certainty  to  facilitate  project  financing,  and  must  be  awarded  competi-
tively,  preferably  by  reverse  auction,  in  order  to  minimize  cost  while  also  providing 
a  market  signal  on  the  real  costs  for  early  CCS  installations.  Knowing  actual  CCS 
costs  is  extremely  important  to  plant  owners,  investors,  technology  developers,  and 
regulators  in  evaluating  future  investment  and  regulatory  decisions.  Competitively 
awarding  CCS  incentives  is  also  consistent  with  how  renewable  portfolio  standards 
are normally administered. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Early  deployment  of  CCS  technology  will  also  create  jobs  and  promote  economic 
growth.  CCS  projects  require  3  to  4  years  to  implement  and  create  significant  eco-
nomic activity over their duration. For example, a single CCS project would cost be-
tween  $250–750  million  in  capital  expense  and  create  up  to  500  jobs  at  its  peak, 
with  the  majority  of  materials  and  labor  sourced  in  the  U.S.  However  the  govern-
ment’s  cost  of  the  CCS  incentive  program  would  not  be  incurred  until  CO2 seques-
tration  begins  upon  project  completion.  In  addition,  by  incenting  early  deployment 
of  CCS,  the  U.S.  can  assume  a  leading  position  in  this  critical  sector  and  create  a 
thriving, high-tech export business, and the quality jobs that come with it. 

In summary, CO2-capture technology is commercially available from several quali-
fied  vendors  with  standard  commercial  guarantees.  Independent  studies  show  that 
early commercial installations of CO2-capture technology are likely to be successful. 
The  cost  of  widespread  deployment  of  technologies  such  as  ECO2 appears  manage-
able,  particularly  when  compared  to  the  cost  of  other  low-carbon  electricity  solu-
tions.  And  once  we  gain  commercial  CCS  experience,  future  costs  will  no  doubt  de-
crease substantially. 

The most important reason to promote early deployment of CCS is that post-com-
bustion CO2-capture technologies will preserve the huge investment in existing coal- 
fired  power  plants  and  allow  us  to  effectively  use  abundant,  low  cost,  coal  reserves 
in  the  U.S.  and  developing  nations,  even  in  a  climate  constrained  world.  If  we  are 
not  successful  in  commercializing  CCS  technology  in  the  near-term,  it  will  be  dif-
ficult for the world to meet its long-term goals for climate change mitigation. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I would be pleased to answer any questions. 

APPENDIX A 

ECO2

 Technology for CO2 Capture 

from Existing and New Coal-Fired Power Plants 

Summary 

Powerspan  Corp.’s  CO2-capture  process,  called  ECO2

,  can  be  applied  to  both  ex-
isting  and  new  coal-fired  electric  power  plants  to  capture  90  percent  CO2 from  the 
flue gas. The process is designed as an add-on system that could be deployed when 
needed  and  is  particularly  advantageous  for  sites  where  ammonia-based  scrubbing 
of  power  plant  emissions,  such  as  our  ECO  multi-pollutant  control  technology,  is 
employed.  The  technology  is  currently  being  piloted  on  a  1-megawatt  (MW)  slip-
stream  at  a  power  plant  in  Ohio.  The  ECO2 pilot  unit  employs  the  same  type  of 
equipment that will be used in commercial systems. Because the innovation of ECO2 
is in its process chemistry, not in new industrial equipment, the risk in scaling from 
the  pilot  scale  to  commercial  scale  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  (CCS)  projects 
is  manageable.  Commercial  scale  ECO2 demonstrations  (120–MW;  one  million  tons 
of  CO2 capture  annually)  are  planned  to  be  online  in  2012,  with  the  captured  CO2 
to be used for enhanced oil recovery operations. 
Technology Description 

ECO2 is  a  scrubbing  process  that  uses  an  ammonia-based  (not  amine)  solution  to 
capture  90  percent  CO2 from  the  flue  gas.  The  CO2 capture  takes  place  after  the 
nitrogen  oxides  (NOX),  sulfur  dioxide  (SO2),  mercury  and  fine  particulate  matter  is 
captured  using  ECO  technology  or  other  air  pollution  control  system.  Once  CO2 is 
captured,  the  resulting  solution  is  regenerated  to  release  CO2 and  ammonia.  The 
ammonia  is  recovered  and  returned  to  the  scrubbing  process,  and  the  CO2 is  proc-
essed  into  a  form  that  is  sequestration  ready.  Ammonia  is  not  consumed  in  the 
scrubbing process, and no separate by-product is created. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

Incorporation  of  Powerspan’s  ECO2
multi-pollutant control ECO  process. 
Technology Development 

 carbon  capture  process  with  the  commercially  available 

Powerspan has been developing the CO2-capture process since 2004 in conjunction 
with the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) National Energy Technology Laboratory 
under  a  cooperative  research  and  development  agreement.  In  December  2007, 
Powerspan announced it exclusively licensed a patent for the process from the DOE. 
The patent granted to the DOE represents the only patent issued in the U.S. to date 
covering  a  regenerative  process  for  CO2 capture  with  an  ammonia-based  solution. 
Powerspan has conducted extensive bench-scale testing to establish the effectiveness 
of  the  process  for  CO2 capture,  and  has  made  improvements  to  the  subject  patent. 
The  testing  has  also  established  the  design  parameters  for  the  ECO2 pilot  unit  in 
operation at FirstEnergy’s R.E. Burger Plant in Shadyside, Ohio. 
ECO2 Pilot Project 

Commissioning  was  completed  and  ECO2 pilot  testing  began  at  FirstEnergy’s 
Burger  Plant  in  December  2008.  The  ECO2 pilot  processes  a  1–MW  slipstream 
drawn  from  the  outlet  of  the  50–MW  Burger  Plant  ECO  unit.  It  is  designed  to 
produce  approximately  20  tons  of  sequestration-ready  CO2 per  day  while  achieving 
a 90 percent capture rate. The pilot system is expected to run through 2009. 

The  ECO2 pilot  will  demonstrate  CO2 capture  through  integration  with  the  ECO 
multi-pollutant  control  process.  Operation  of  the  pilot  will  confirm  process  perform-
ance and energy requirements. The pilot program will also provide the basis for cost 
estimates  while  preparing  the  technology  for  the  commercial  scale  CCS  demonstra-
tions planned to be online in 2012. 
Scalability of ECO2 to Commercial Scale Projects 

Although the ECO2 process is new and proprietary, the innovation is in its process 
chemistry. The equipment required for operation of commercial ECO2 systems (e.g., 
large  absorber,  regenerator,  heat  exchangers,  pumps,  gas  dryer,  etc.)  are  commer-
cially  available  at  the  required  scale.  Therefore,  once  the  pilot  scale  demonstration 
of  the  ECO2 process  is  completed,  the  scale  up  risk  to  commercial  size  systems  is 
manageable. An independent engineering study focused on ECO2 scaling risk deter-
mined  that  the  ECO2 pilot  plant  will  provide  sufficient  design  information  to  con-
fidently build commercial scale systems up to 760–MW, supporting that ECO2 tech-
nology scaling risk is manageable. 
ECO2 Commercial Demonstration Projects 

Basin  Electric  Antelope  Valley  Station—In  March  2008,  Basin  Electric  Power  Co-
operative  and  Powerspan  announced  the  selection  of  the  ECO2 process  for  a  120- 
MW  commercial  demonstration  at  Basin  Electric’s  Antelope  Valley  Station  located 
near  Beulah,  North  Dakota.  The  selection  of  the  ECO2 process  is  the  result  of  the 
first competitive solicitation process for a CO2-capture demonstration at a coal-fired 
power plant in the U.S. The Antelope Valley project is designed to capture approxi-
mately one million tons of CO2 annually which will be fed into an existing CO2 com-
pression  and  pipeline  system  owned  by  Basin  Electric’s  wholly-owned  subsidiary, 
Dakota Gasification Company. Dakota Gasification Company is the only company in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
X
I
L
A
2
1
3

29 

the U.S. that captures CO2 from coal and delivers it for enhanced oil recovery oper-
ations. Since 2000, Dakota Gasification has been delivering CO2 from its coal gasifi-
cation  facility,  the  Great  Plains  Synfuels  Plant,  to  oil  producers  in  Saskatchewan, 
Canada. 

In  June  2008,  Powerspan  successfully  completed  a  feasibility  study,  which  con-
firmed that there are no technical limitations in deploying the ECO2 process at the 
plant. In January 2009, the project was approved for up to a $300 million loan from 
a USDA Rural Utilities Service program for early CCS demonstration. Based on suc-
cessful  completion  of  detailed  engineering  studies  and  obtaining  of  necessary  per-
mits, the Antelope Valley project is expected online in 2012. 

NRG  Energy  WA  Parish  Plant—In  November  2007,  NRG  Energy,  Inc.  and 
Powerspan  announced  their  memorandum  of  understanding  to  commercially  dem-
onstrate the ECO2 process at NRG’s WA Parish plant near Sugar Land, Texas. The 
125–MW  equivalent  CCS  demonstration  will  be  designed  to  capture  and  sequester 
about one million tons of CO2 annually. The ECO2 demonstration facility will be de-
signed  to  capture  90  percent  of  incoming  CO2 and  the  captured  CO2 is  expected  to 
be used in enhanced oil recovery in the Houston area. The Parish plant is expected 
to be online in 2012. 
About Powerspan and ECO Multi-Pollutant Control Technology 

Powerspan  Corp.,  based  in  New  Hampshire,  has  been  developing  and  commer-
cializing  advanced  clean  coal  technology  since  its  inception  in  1994.  Powerspan’s 
most  significant  technology  success  to  date  has  been  the  development  and  commer-
cialization of its patented Electro-Catalytic Oxidation (ECO) technology, which is an 
advanced  multi-pollutant  control  technology  to  reduce  emissions  of  sulfur  dioxide 
(SO2),  nitrogen  oxides  (NOX),  mercury  (Hg),  and  fine  particulate  matter  (PM2.5)  in 
a single system. 

For over 5 years, Powerspan has successfully operated a 50–MW scale ECO com-
mercial  unit  at  FirstEnergy’s  R.E.  Burger  Plant  in  Ohio.  This  unit  has  dem-
onstrated  that  the  ECO  process  is  capable  of  achieving  outlet  emissions  below  cur-
rent  Best  Available  Control  Technology  standards  for  coal-fired  power  plants.  The 
ECO  process  also  produces  a  valuable  fertilizer  product,  avoiding  the  landfill  dis-
posal  of  flue  gas  desulfurization  waste.  Furthermore,  the  ECO  system  uses  less 
water because it requires no wastewater treatment or disposal. 

In  June  2007,  American  Municipal  Power-Ohio  (AMP-Ohio)  announced  its  com-
mitment  to  install  our  ECO-SO2 multi-pollutant  control  technology  on  its  proposed 
1,000–MW American Municipal Power Generating Station in southern Meigs Coun-
ty, Ohio. In January 2009, AMP-Ohio announced the selection of Bechtel as its engi-
neering,  procurement  and  construction  firm,  and  granted  the  firm  a  limited  notice 
to  proceed  on  the  project.  AMP-Ohio  will  use  our  ECO–SO2 technology  as  an  SO2, 
mercury, and fine particulate matter control option for its strong environmental per-
formance and potential to add our ECO2 carbon capture technology. 

APPENDIX B 

Principles for CCS Incentives 

1.  Competitive  Award:  CCS  incentives  should  be  awarded  competitively  based  on 
a  reverse  auction  (incentives  awarded  to  the  low-cost  bidders  per  ton  of  CO2 cap-
tured and sequestered) for the following reasons: 

• This  would  preserve  the  primary  objective  of  a  cap  and  trade  program,  which 
is  to  minimize  cost  of  compliance,  while  also  providing  a  market  signal  on  the 
real costs for early CCS installations. 
• Current  climate  legislation  proposals,  which  arbitrarily  set  CCS  incentive 
prices,  would  result  in  less  cost-effective  CCS  technologies  being  subsidized, 
while  plant  owners/developers  and  regulators  gain  little  or  no  information  on 
what real CCS costs are. 
• Arbitrarily  setting  CCS  incentive  prices  would  distort  the  market  and  support 
technologies  that  may  not  otherwise  survive  in  a  non-subsidized  market.  It 
would also create a windfall profit opportunity for the lowest cost CCS solutions 
and unnecessarily increase the cost of CCS incentives to the government. 
• Knowing  actual  CCS  costs  is  extremely  important  to  plant  owners,  technology 
developers, investors, and regulators in evaluating future investment and regu-
latory decisions. 
• Competitively  awarding  CCS  incentives  is  consistent  with  how  renewable  port-
folio  standards  are  normally  administered.  Market  participants—power  sup-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

pliers,  regulated  distribution  companies,  and  state  regulators—understand  this 
process. States set a standard for the amount and type of renewable energy de-
sired, and the potential suppliers respond to competitive solicitations to provide 
the renewable energy. The Federal Government could effectively implement the 
same type of approach for CCS projects/incentive awards. 

2.  Long-term  Price  Certainty,  Factoring  in  CO2 Emission  Allowance  Value:  CCS 
incentives  need  to  provide  long-term  price  certainty  and  factor  in  the  value  of  CO2 
emissions allowances because: 

• CCS projects will likely be financed over 15 to 30 years. Current climate legisla-
tion  proposals  award  CCS  incentives  over  a  fixed  period  of  time  (i.e.,  10  years) 
that is too short to finance most projects. 

• CCS  incentives  would  be  most  economical  for  the  government  if  they  factor  in 

the increasing value of CO2 emission allowances over time. 
» For  example,  if  the  CCS  project  developer  needs  to  assure  a  price  of  $40  per 
ton  of  CO2 over  20  years  to  finance  the  project,  the  government  could  guar-
antee that price as an annual subsidy over the required term, after the value 
of avoided CO2 emissions are subtracted. As the value of CO2 emissions allow-
ances  rise,  the  amount  of  annual  CCS  subsidy  the  government  is  required  to 
pay  would  decrease,  while  the  project  developer  would  still  obtain  the  re-
quired price assurance to finance the project. 

• As  the  value  of  CO2 emission  allowances  rises  over  time,  the  percentage  of  al-
lowance  auction  proceeds  received  by  the  government  that  are  needed  to  sup-
port the CCS incentives will decrease. 
• Current climate legislation proposals do not account for the added value of CO2 
emission allowances created by the CCS project or the fact that emission allow-
ance  values  would  be  increasing  over  time.  This  approach  creates  a  potential 
windfall  profit  opportunity  for  the  early  CCS  adopters  and  unnecessarily  in-
creases the cost of CCS incentives to the government. 

3.  CCS  Project  Size:  The  primary  objective  of  CCS  incentives  is  to  demonstrate 
CCS  technology  at  commercial  scale  to  accelerate  market  acceptance  and  deploy-
ment. In order to demonstrate CCS as commercially viable, a minimum project size 
criteria should be established: 

• Experts  such  as  MIT,  DOE,  and  EPRI  have  established  a  minimum  size  of 
1,000,000  tons  of  CO2 per  year  for  CCS  projects  to  be  considered  ‘‘commercial 
scale.’’  Once  the  minimum  CCS  project  size  is  met,  preference  should  be  given 
to larger projects. 

4. CO2 Capture Rate: In order to meet the objective of stabilizing GHG concentra-
tions  in  the  atmosphere,  large  stationary  CO2 sources  will  need  to  capture  and  se-
quester a high percentage of their CO2 emissions (i.e., ≥ 90 percent). Therefore, CCS 
incentives  should  establish  a  minimum  standard  for  CO2 capture  (e.g.,  80  percent) 
and should favor projects that capture higher percentages of CO2. 

• Available technology from leading suppliers has shown the ability to capture 90 
percent  CO2.  Therefore  establishing  a  minimum  CO2 capture  rate  as  high  as 
80–90 percent is technically feasible and commercially acceptable. 
• CCS  projects  will  normally  require  3–4  years  to  implement.  An  incentive  pro-
gram that encourages CCS to be demonstrated in sequential steps (e.g., 50 per-
cent then 80 percent) would unnecessarily delay deployment of the high capture 
rate  CCS  projects  needed  to  combat  climate  change  and  increase  the  cost  of 
CCS incentives to the government. 

5.  Amount  of  CCS  Incentives;  Timing  of  Auctions;  Technology  Diversity:  The 
amount  of  CCS  incentives  in  tons  of  CO2 should  be  based  on  the  following  factors: 
• The need to demonstrate CCS at commercial scale in a number of different con-
figurations  for  both  plant  type  and  geological  storage  type.  All  large  industrial 
sources  of  CO2 should  be  considered  equally.  However,  the  government  should 
not try to pick technology winners and losers. The primary driver in CCS incen-
tive awards should be lowest cost per ton, with at least three different CO2-cap-
ture technologies selected to promote technology diversity. This would facilitate 
the  creation  of  a  competitive  supplier  market  of  the  most  cost-effective  tech-
nologies. 
• The need to avoid early market responses to a CO2 emission cap, such as a rush 
to  gas-fired  power  generation,  which  may  not  be  sustainable  after  CCS  is  com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

mercially  proven  and  CO2 allowance  prices  rise  to  where  CCS  would  be  de-
ployed without incentives. 
• The  need  to  spread  out  incentives  so  that  multiple  CCS  projects  are  awarded 
each  year  for  at  least  5  years  as  the  current  pace  of  technology  evolution  is 
great and the CCS incentive program should take advantage of and benefit from 
this rapid pace of improvement. 

• The  near-term  need  to  stimulate  the  economy.  CCS  projects  normally  require 
3–4  years  to  implement  and  create  a  great  deal  of  economic  activity  over  their 
entire duration. However the cost of the CCS incentive program does not begin 
until  CO2 sequestration  is  started  upon  project  completion.  For  example,  a 
5,000,000-ton  per  year  CCS  project  could  cost  $750  million  in  capital  expense 
to implement over the first 4 years. However, with a $20 per ton net CCS incen-
tive, it would only require government support of $100 million beginning in year 
5 and decreasing annually from there. 

6. Qualifying Criteria: Projects that apply for CCS incentives should meet certain 

qualifying criteria. Qualifying projects should: 

• Be  new  (existing  projects  that  capture  and  sequester  CO2 should  not  qualify). 
• Certify  that  they  have  all  required  permits  or  will  have  within  12  months  of 

• Certify  that  they  have  all  required  financing  or  will  have  within  12  months  of 

award. 

award. 

• Certify that they are scheduled to break ground within 12 months of award and 

have scheduled project completion within 4 years after ground breaking. 
» Projects  that  receive  CCS  incentive  awards  but  are  not  able  to  complete  per-
mitting,  financing,  and  groundbreaking  within  12  months  of  award  should 
forfeit the CCS incentive (but may apply again). 

• Not be in any way disadvantaged by having received other types of government 

support such as loan guarantees, grants, and tax incentives. 

7.  Sequestration  Issues:  Existing  CO2 pipelines  used  for  enhanced  oil  recovery 
(EOR) operations can support several new, large-scale CCS projects. The CCS incen-
tives should be structured so as not to disadvantage these opportunities in any man-
ner as they will likely be the lowest-cost and nearest-term projects available to dem-
onstrate  commercial  scale  CCS.  However,  in  order  to  incentivize  broader  CCS  de-
ployment, the following sequestration issues need to be resolved: 

ards for measurement, monitoring, and verification (MMV). 

• Legal and permitting requirements for geological sequestration including stand-
• Long-term liability for sequestered CO2. 
• Incentivizing CO2 pipeline construction at optimum scale. CO2 pipelines benefit 
from economies of scale up to about 24 inches in diameter. This size would pro-
vide  CO2 capacity  for  3–4  large-scale  CCS  projects  (nominally  about  15  million 
tons  per  year;  equivalent  to  ∼2,000  MW  capacity  at  90  percent  CO2 capture). 
Therefore preference should be given to CCS projects that create extra capacity 
by constructing pipelines or other infrastructure that could be used by multiple 
CCS projects. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
I’ll  start  with  questioning,  for  5  minutes,  and  we’ll  go  in  order, 
which  will  be  Senator  Hutchison,  Senator  Begich,  Senator  Kerry, 
Senator Snowe, Senator Klobuchar. 

Dr. Killeen, is climate change reversible? 
Dr. KILLEEN. Climate change over long periods is reversible. The 
Earth  has  experienced  changes,  that  are  natural  changes,  that 
have  been  large  in  the  geologic  record;  however,  in  terms  of  the 
human  experience,  generations,  we’re  going  to  be  living  in  an  era 
where the sea levels are going to be rising for centuries, and that— 
the  global  mean  temperatures  are  going  to  be  rising  to  some  level 
that’s  going  to  be  determined  by  our  societal  actions.  So,  revers-
ibility on the time scales of societal decisionmaking is probably not 
on the cards. So, that’s why we talk about smart adaption science, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

because  we  are  going  to  have  to  adapt  to  the  changing  cir-
cumstances  that  are  already  built  into  the  system.  And  we  talk 
about  smart  mitigation  science,  which  speaks  to  the  ultimate  sta-
bilization  or  least  restrictions  are  the  most  severe  outcomes  that 
could occur over the next few centuries. 

Returning—reversing  to  the  pre-existing  climate  would  require, 
not just reduced emissions, but going back to the concentrations of 
greenhouse  gases  in  the  atmosphere.  And  that’s  why  mitigation 
science  is  actually—mitigation  pathways  are  difficult,  because  it’s 
not enough to reduce emissions—that slows down the process—you 
have to—— 

The CHAIRMAN. So, I take your answer—— 
Dr. KILLEEN.—deal with concentration. 
The CHAIRMAN.—not to be yes, but to be no. 
Dr. KILLEEN. No, in terms of practical considerations—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.  OK.  Now,  explain  to  me  a  little  bit  more  why. 
Some  people  say  that  once  you  put  carbon  dioxide  in  the  air,  it’s 
up  there  for  30  years;  others  suggest  that  carbon  dioxide  due  to 
human  activities  stays  in  the  atmosphere  for  1,000  years.  Now,  I 
don’t care which it is; it’s horrendous. 

Dr. KILLEEN. It’s—— 
The CHAIRMAN. Why is it irreversible? 
Dr.  KILLEEN.  It’s  actually  both.  The  estimates  are  that  about  20 
percent  of  the  carbon  that’s  in  the  atmosphere  due  to  anthropo-
genic human-induced emissions will reside sort of the order of mag-
nitude  of  thousands  of  years.  Other  components  of  the  reservoir 
will  cycle  more  rapidly  through  the  ocean  and  uptake  in  the  land. 
There  are  some  significant  scientific  questions  about  the  degree  to 
which the ocean and the land can continue to absorb as much car-
bon  as  they  have  been  absorbing  over  the  last  century.  That’s  one 
of the scientific questions that I allude to in my—— 

So, it’s a—it is a complex, but not over—not impenetrable, set of 
scientific  questions.  We’re  dealing  with  a  relatively  simple  mol-
ecule,  three  atoms.  We’re  dealing  with  an  atmosphere.  We’re  deal-
ing with a relative balance. The thermodynamics is pretty well un-
derstood. The residence times are dependent on a lot of factors, in-
cluding  weather  factors.  But,  notably,  the  uptake  of  carbon  by  the 
living biosphere and the oceans—and there are some indications in 
recent papers that that may be plateauing, at least. So, there may 
be some diminution of the ability of the rest of the system to reab-
sorb carbon from the atmosphere. 

So,  when  we’re  looking  at  long-term  records,  it’s  very  important 
to  crack  that  scientific  problem.  Where—how  fast  can  carbon  be 
taken  back  out  of  the  atmosphere  and  stored  in  other  repositories, 
in  the  ocean  and  in  agricultural  processes?  And  for  how  long  will 
that  carbon  be  sequestered  there?  There  are  some  open  scientific 
questions that need to be addressed. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  My  time’s  running  out.  You  say  30  or  1,000,  ei-
ther  one  could  be  true.  I  talked,  in  my  opening  statement,  about 
gaps  in  scientific  knowledge.  I’d  like  you  to  address  that.  We,  the 
Commerce Committee, have jurisdiction over the National Weather 
Service;  they  have  a  lot  to  say  about  whether  you’re  going  to  get 
a 20-percent drying-up of rivers in Arizona and other places in the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

Colorado  River.  But,  what  is  it  that  we  don’t  know,  scientifically, 
that we need to know? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  We  need  to  know  the  rate  at  which  carbon  will  be 
taken  out  of  the  atmosphere  and  absorbed  in  the  ocean  and  in  the 
land  matter  over  the  future  decades.  We  need  to  know  that  num-
ber. It’s a critical number for looking at the long-term outcome. 

Right  now—what  matters  is  the  concentration  of  greenhouse 
gases  in  the  atmosphere;  it’s  how  many  there  are,  how  many  mol-
ecules there are in the atmosphere. Every molecule plays a role in 
warming  the  planet.  So,  it’s  a  quantity  of  carbon  dioxide.  That’s 
controlled  by  two  factors:  emissions  in  and  sinks  out.  And  so,  it’s 
a balance between the emissions and the sinks. And right now, the 
average  rate  of  accumulation  of  the  quantity  of  greenhouse  gases 
in the atmosphere is about 2 percent per year over the last decade. 
We  need  to  get  that  number  down.  And  that  number  is  going  to 
be a factor of both the emissions in and the sinks/sources out. And 
there are scientific uncertainties that we need to address, in terms 
of  the  role  of  the  oceans,  the  Earth’s  oceans,  which  take  up  one- 
third,  today,  of  the  carbon  that’s  put  into  the  atmosphere  is  ab-
sorbed  in  the  oceans—a  full  third  of  it—and  that  leads  to  ocean 
acidification—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Acidification problems. 
Dr. KILLEEN. That’s the acidification problem, yes. 
So,  the  overall  carbon  cycle  is  fairly  well  known.  I  would  say 
there  are  no  ‘‘gotchas’’  or  no  surprises  that  are  going  to  throw  our 
whole theory out of the window. But, we need to fine-tune that un-
derstanding,  particularly  on  the  sink  side.  The  emissions  side  is  a 
function  of  economic  development  and  the  kinds  of  issues  that  my 
colleagues  are  being—are  raising.  The  sink  side,  how  fast  you  can 
take  carbon  out  of  the  atmosphere,  is  a  function  of  our  under-
standing of ecosystem function and of oceanographic function. 

The CHAIRMAN. Doctor, thank you very much. 
Kay Bailey Hutchison. 
Senator HUTCHISON. Thank you. 
My  question  is  for  Dr.  Killeen.  If  anyone  else  wants  to  jump  in 

on this. 

My  area  of  interest,  and  actually,  for  the  last  two  Congresses,  I 
have  introduced  legislation  on  weather  modification  research.  I’m 
told  that  we  don’t  even  have  the  data,  for  instance,  where  there  is 
cloud-seeding  in  Colorado,  if  there  is  any  difference  in  rainfall  in 
Wyoming  or  Montana,  and  that  that  would  be  an  area  where,  at 
least  if  we  begin  to  track,  that  would  be  the  basis  of  research.  My 
original  intention  was  to  put  it  in  NOAA,  a  weather  modification 
research  opportunity  and  tracking  of  weather,  not  only  where  you 
might have modification efforts, in the surrounding areas, in track-
ing the wind currents and directions, but also, for the future, to see 
what  works  and  what  doesn’t.  We’re  just  seeing  so  much  more  of 
an intensity in our weather now than we have seen before. 

My  question  to  you  is,  do  you  agree  that  we  need  to  have  this 
kind of tracking and research? And where would you best place it? 
Is  NOAA  the  right  place?  Or  the  White  House  Office  of  Science? 
Where would you say we would have the best traction for this kind 
of research? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  Well,  let  me  first  fully  agree  with  you  that  this  is 
a  topic  that’s  worthy  of  a  research  effort.  As  the  planet  warms, 
there  are  greater  rates  of  evaporation  from  the  world’s  ocean, 
there’s more latent heat energy that is produced in the atmosphere, 
and  there  are  greater  levels  of  water  vapor.  So,  the  whole 
hydrological  cycle  is  intensified.  That  means  we  get  more  severe 
weather  at  times.  We  get  more  evaporation,  so  we  get  more 
drought.  It’s  paradoxic  that  we  get  more  drought  and  you  also  get 
more severe—episodes of severe rainfall. 

The  system  is  intensified,  and  it—but,  it’s  predictable,  at  some 
level.  And  I  think  today  we  don’t  know  quite  the  level  of  predict-
ability  of  rainfall  and  severe  weather  events  in  atmospheric  phe-
nomena. But, that’s coming. 

There  was  a  big  effort  30  years  ago,  as  you  know,  to  look  at 
weather  modification  studies.  And  in  some  ways,  that  was  pre-
mature,  because  we  didn’t  have  the  observational  tools  at  that 
time,  we  didn’t  have  the  polarimetric  radar  to  look  at  the  cloud 
condensation  nuclei  and  their  shapes,  and  to  determine  the  phys-
ical  processes  that  lead  to  precipitation  out  of  clouds,  the  types  of 
clouds. We now have those kind of capabilities—aircraft, radars, et 
cetera.  So,  we’re  much  better  positioned  now  than  we  were  30 
years  ago  to  really  investigate  the  physical  mechanistic  processes 
that drive to severe weather events. And I—so, I think it is a very 
important area. And, of course, it’s connected to climate because of 
this intensification of the hydrologic cycle that I alluded to. 

Where  it  should  be  in  the  government?  I  think  that  the  Federal 
agencies are interacting very well. There are experts in all of these 
Federal  agencies  who  can  appreciate  this  kind  of  project.  Within 
the  National  Science  Foundation,  we  have  a  place  to  go  for  re-
search  proposals  dealing  with  this,  and  they  will  be  effectively  re-
viewed and funded when they come in. 

I  think  what’s  needed  is  a  stimulus  to  the  scientific  community 
that opens the door to new and pioneering, transformative research 
in this area. 

So, I like the question. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  Do  you  think  that  the  National  Science 
Foundation  would  be  the  better  policeman  for  where  the  research 
would  go?  Or,  do  you  think  NOAA  should  be  that  agency?  How 
would  you,  if  you  were  advising  me  on  how  to  structure  where  it 
goes  and  if  there  is  some  added  involvement  by  one  or  the  other, 
where would you say? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  I  would  think  partnerships  are  the  right  ap-
proaches.  NOAA  has  more  operational  responsibilities  and  service 
responsibilities  for  stakeholders.  NSF  is  the  basic  research  organi-
zation,  where  our  investigators  can  look  at  the  nitty-gritty  aspects 
of what certain types of clouds do under certain circumstances, can 
model  the  paths  of  the  hurricanes,  and  so  forth.  So,  I  think  it’s  a 
research-to-operations transition, and both agencies have their nat-
ural roles in that. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  just  have  a  couple  of  seconds  left.  Let  me 
just ask you, if we start gathering the data, do you see a time when 
we could also do mitigation? If the science said a hurricane that is 
a level-2 in the Pacific, well, Atlantic, actually, off the coast of Flor-
ida,  and  when  tracking,  it  turns  into  a  4  when  it  gets  to  Florida 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

and  then  on  into  the  Gulf  of  Mexico,  that,  by  having  the  research, 
there is a time at which we might be able to mitigate it out in the 
Atlantic  Ocean  so  that  it  isn’t  a  4  when  it  gets  to  Florida  or  Ala-
bama  or  Louisiana  or  Texas.  Is  that  something  that  conceptually, 
that we might look forward to? 

Dr. KILLEEN. That’s beyond our reach today. It’s probably beyond 
our  reach  in  the  next  10  years.  But,  I  could—I  could  conceive  of 
such  kinds  of  things  in  the  long  term.  As  we  further  understand 
the  nonlinear  development  of  hurricanes—they  develop,  after  all, 
from  very  small  perturbations  off  the  coast  of  Africa,  often,  and 
they—some  of  them  grow,  and  some  of  them  diminish.  And  so,  I 
could imagine intervention—I could imagine it, intervention strate-
gies, but I wouldn’t want to even—— 

Senator HUTCHISON. I know. 
Dr. KILLEEN.—imply that—— 
Senator HUTCHISON. We don’t—— 
Dr. KILLEEN.—we’re anywhere—— 
Senator HUTCHISON.—have the research yet,—— 
Dr. KILLEEN.—close to that today. Yes. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  —but,  I  would  just  hope  that,  if  we  start 
with research, that eventually we’ll be able to go in that direction. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator Hutchison. 
Senator Begich. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK BEGICH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  BEGICH.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank 

you for holding this hearing. 

And  as  the  Senator  from  Alaska,  I  consider  our  State  ground 
zero  when  it  comes  to  climate  change,  as  well  as  Arctic  policy. 
There’s  a  combination  of  issues  in  Alaska.  And,  you  know,  we  see 
it  firsthand.  If  it’s  from  the  north,  with  the  Arctic  melting,  or  in 
interior Alaska, where the permafrost is melting, or when you look 
to  western  Alaska,  where  villages  have  lost  literally,  several,  sev-
eral  feet  of  land,  or  you  go  down  to  the  southeast  and  you  see  the 
fishing  area,  with  acidification  of  water.  So,  I  have  several  ques-
tions, but I’m going to—— 

Dr.—is  it  Killeen?  I  have  a  couple  of  questions.  But,  as  a  good 
doctor, I want you to keep it short, only because we get only a few 
minutes.  Because,  Dr.  Jacobs,  I  want  to  ask  you  some  questions, 
because  I’m  intrigued  by  your  testimony,  because  we,  as  policy-
makers,  sometimes  get  wrapped  around  the  research  and  the 
science,  and,  I  like  to  describe  myself  as  ‘‘a  mayor’’  which  I  have 
been,  as  ‘‘a  mayor  that  just  happens  to  be  a  Senator,’’  because,  as 
a mayor, you have to be practical. And so, your testimony was very 
interesting to me, in a sense of that next step. 

But, quickly, in your written testimony, you had some comments 
on  permafrost  in  Alaska;  80  percent  of  its  ground  is  permafrost, 
and  the  potential  of,  you  know,  the  massive  methane  gas  release, 
give  me  some  commentary  on  that,  if  you  can,  and  how  you  see 
that.  I  know  you  had  some  in  your  written  testimony,  but  if  you 
could verbalize that, I’d appreciate it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  Yes,  it’s  a  very  important  study  that  needs  to  be 
done, intensive study of the permafrost, because there’s a lot of, as 
you know, carbon contained in the permafrost. 

Senator BEGICH. Correct. 
Dr. KILLEEN. There’s deep permafrost, which will reside for many 
eons, I’m sure, and then there’s near-surface ground permafrost, on 
which  homes  are  built,  that  can  degrade  quickly,  and  is  degrading 
quickly. 

There  are  some  unknowns  there,  and  there’s  scientific  research 
that’s  needed  to  fully  understand  the  rate  at  which  permafrost  is 
becoming degraded, and the rationale—the reasons for that. 

And  if  you  look  back  at  ancient  climate  change,  there’s  evidence 
that,  in  fact,  temperature  increases  led  the  production  of  green-
house  gases,  which  would  be  a  positive  feedback  effect.  And  so, 
there  is  concern  that  we  need  to  fully  understand  the  role  of  per-
mafrost in the energy budget. 

I  would  say  the  IPCC  models  that  were  used  to  produce  the  as-
sessment did not include the effects of methane released in perma-
frost, so it’s one of these missing gaps that the Chairman—— 

Senator BEGICH. It’s another gap—— 
Dr. KILLEEN. Another gap. 
Senator BEGICH.—in the research and science. 
Dr.  KILLEEN.  Another  gap.  And—but,  it’s  a  very  significant  one 
that  needs—and  there  are  many  researchers  honing  in  that  prob-
lem right now. 

Senator  BEGICH.  Very  good.  And  one  last  question,  on  research, 
in  regards  to  acidification  of  the  waters.  And,  you  know,  Alaska 
produces  62  percent  of  the  natural  fish  stock  for  this  country,  and 
obviously we have about 25–30,000 people employed, directly or in-
directly,  in  this  industry.  Can  you  give  me  any  thoughts  of  where 
research gaps might be in regards to studying the impacts of acidi-
fication,  not  only  from  the  science,  but  also  from  the  job  compo-
nent? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  Yes,  I  think  that’s  another  very  important  area 
that  needs  much  more  work.  The  role  of  increased  acidification  on 
hard-shelled  corals  and  phytoplankton  is  fairly  well  known,  but 
what  that  means  for  the  web  of  life  in  the  oceans  and  the  degree 
to  which  individual  species  will  be  responding  over  the  decades  is 
a  big  question.  We  know  from  our  experience  that  some  manage-
ment  strategies  have  worked  for  some  fish  stocks  and  have  not 
worked for other fish stocks. And the scientific reasons for that dif-
ference are still to be determined. 

So,  I  think  there’s  an  important  area  of  oceanographic  biology, 
which includes the whole ecosystem response to changed chemistry 
in  the  ocean,  which  is  an  important  area  of  scientific  research,  as 
well. 

Senator BEGICH. Great. Thank you very much. 
Dr. KILLEEN. Were they short enough, Senator? 
Senator BEGICH. That was very good. 
Dr. KILLEEN. Thank you. 
Senator BEGICH. Thank you. We get limited time here. 
Dr. Jacobs, your testimony was interesting. And I did notice you 
smiled  a  little  bit  when  a  couple  of  folks  were  talking,  because, 
probably as you know, I’m trying to hone in, on how we deliver the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

message  to  the  average  individual  out  there,  the  voter,  to  under-
stand  the  economic  impacts,  is  how  I’ve  always  portrayed  it.  Your 
testimony,  written  testimony,  was  very  good.  Can  you  if  there  are 
one or two things that we could do, as policymakers, to better com-
municate  what  the  issue  of  climate  change  means  to  the  average 
person, what would those be, from your perspective? 

But, let me just say one thing, though, because I know most peo-
ple,  when  you  talk  about  emissions,  they  look  at  you  with  a  blank 
eye,  you  know,  they  stare,  they  don’t  have  any  clue  what  you’re 
talking  about,  anybody.  So,  give  me  your  one  or  two  hits  that  we 
would do. 

Ms.  JACOBS.  Well,  I  guess  I  could  start  with  an  anecdote,  which 
is a very brief one. You know, essentially, we were recently talking 
to  some  of  the  officials  from  the  City  of  Phoenix,  and  they  said, 
‘‘Well, our city council really does not care about or understand cli-
mate  change,  but  they  do  care  about  water-supply  reliability,  and 
it  keeps  them  up  at  night.’’  So,  clearly  the  issue  is  connecting  the 
science  to  the  things  that  people  really  care  about  and  the  things 
that  affect  their  livelihoods  and  their  hearts.  And  so,  clearly  the 
landscapes  they  care  about,  the  people  they  care  about,  and  their 
source  of—you  know,  their  economic  interests,  are  the  ways  to  get 
to  people.  And,  frankly,  it’s  remarkable  how  few  people  have  actu-
ally  picked  up  on  what’s  going  on,  given  that  it  is  happening  all 
around us and the evidence is there. 

Senator BEGICH. Yes, I’ll leave on this question. It’s one more for 
later, and I’ve run out of time. But, if you have not, or if you have, 
I’d  be  interested  in  maybe  later  letting  my  office  know  your  re-
sponse to. I know the U.S. Conference of Mayors has climate green 
page. Mayors have been very aggressive on this and kind of bring-
ing  it  down  to  the  street  level.  I’d  be  interested  in  what  you  see 
as good examples of how they have delivered the message. I know, 
as  a  mayor,  what  we’ve  done,  but  I’d  be  very  curious  in  your  com-
mentary on that. And not right now, but, you know, at a later time, 
because of time. 

Ms. JACOBS. Thank you. 
Senator BEGICH. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator Begich. 
Senator Kerry. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. Thank you for doing this 

hearing. It’s really important. 

Over  the  last  8  years,  the  emissions  have  grown  at  a  rate  four 
times faster than they did in the 1990s. And the fact is that every 
single  climate  change  model  that  predicted  what  is  going  to  hap-
pen,  from  the  IPCC,  the  U.N.  Panel,  is  now  being  exceeded.  There 
was a recent study by Fletcher, MIT Heinz Center, that shows that 
if  we  take  the  best  offering  of  every  country  in  the  world  that  has 
offered  to  do  something,  and  if  we  were,  in  fact,  to  complete  it,  we 
would  still  wind  up  at  about  550  parts  per  million,  600  parts  per 
million, by 2050, which is well above what scientists tell us is per-
missible. Correct? As well as at a temperature of about 4 degrees— 
that’s  by  2050—it  will  continue  up  to  6  to  9  degrees  by  the  end  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

the  century  if  we  don’t  make  changes.  Is  that  a  fair  statement  of 
sort of what the latest science is? 

Dr. KILLEEN. Yes, sir, I think it—that’s fair. There’s some debate 
about  what  level  is  actually  constituted  dangerous  interference 
with  the  climate,  but  there’s  a  rough  consensus  about  those  num-
bers that you quoted, 500—— 

Senator  KERRY.  And  previously,  the  science  said,  ‘‘Well,  we  can 
tolerate  550  parts  per  million.’’  Then  a  few  years  ago  they  moved 
to  450  parts  per  million.  And  now  the  science  is  telling  us  that’s 
wrong, we have to try to stay at 350 parts per million and hold the 
temperature increase to 2 degrees Centigrade. Is that accurate? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  I  think  most  scientists  would  say  lower  is  better. 
There are some practical issues with regard to where the stabiliza-
tion  point,  in  terms  of  parts  per  million  carbon  dioxide  in  the  at-
mosphere,  is.  And  I  think  that  debate,  which  you’re  discussing,  is 
raging.  Where—what  constitutes  dangerous  interference  is  the—— 
Senator KERRY. But, the problem is, if we get it wrong, it’s cata-
strophic.  If  they’re  wrong  and  we’ve  taken  action,  the  best  that 
we’ve  done  is  improved  health,  responded  to  the  environment,  cre-
ated  jobs,  improved  our  security  by  moving  off  of  dependence  on 
fossil  fuels,  and  so  forth.  I  mean,  it  seems—the  balance  in  judg-
ment  of  public  policy  falls  on  the  side  of  caution  and  precaution. 

Dr. KILLEEN. I would—if you’re asking me—— 
Senator KERRY. Yes. 
Dr.  KILLEEN.—Senator,  I  would  certainly  believe,  with  my  col-
leagues  here,  that  we’re  going  to  be  moving  to  a  low-carbon  econ-
omy,  we  should  do  it  easily,  readily,  quickly,  as  fast  as  we  could, 
to  avoid  the  most  severe  consequences  of  these  numbers.  I  should 
also say—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Let  me  follow  up  on  something  quickly,  if  I  can, 
and  I’m  sorry  to  interrupt  you,  but  I  wanted  to  follow  up  with 
something that Senator Rockefeller said, because I won’t have time 
to ask Mr. Alix a couple of questions. 

Just very quickly, the 30 years to 1,000 years Senator Rockefeller 
was  asking  about,  the  30  years,  the  variation  depends,  I  assume, 
on the type of greenhouse gas, because what I’m led to understand 
is that the CO2 that’s up there has a half-life of approximately 100 
years, 80 to 100 years or so. Is that correct? 

Dr. KILLEEN. Yes, that order of magnitude. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  that  means  that  whatever  we  put  up  there 

today is going to continue to do damage for the next 100 years. 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  And  a  small  component  of  it  will  continue  to  have 
interactions over the next 1,000 years, and that’s where the 1,000- 
year number comes from. 

Senator KERRY. The interaction—— 
Dr. KILLEEN. About 20 percent. 
Senator KERRY.—is over 1,000 years. 
Dr. KILLEEN. Yes. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  But,  the  half-life  of  the  gas,  of  the  CO2 itself  is 

about 100 years. 

Dr. KILLEEN. Yes. With—it’s a mix of processes. There’s a mix of 
sink processes. Some of them go faster than others, so you can—— 

Senator KERRY. Right. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Dr.  KILLEEN.—you  can  consider  it  as  not  a  simple  one-answer 

problem—— 

Senator KERRY. I gotcha. 
Dr. KILLEEN.—is what I’m saying. 
Senator KERRY. So it’s a variation based on the interaction of the 
gas,  but  there’s  no  question  but  that  it  does  that  damage  over  the 
continuing period of time? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  Carbon  dioxide  in  the  atmosphere  will  have  long- 

lived consequences of decades and hundreds of years. 

Senator  KERRY.  Now  coming  therefore  to  your  process,  Mr.  Alix, 
you’re  talking  exclusively  about  a  sequestration,  a  capture,  that 
would then be made enough only for geologic sequestration? 

Mr. ALIX. Primarily, yes. 
Senator KERRY. There are four companies now doing non-geologic 
processing,  taking  gas,  flue  gas  out  of  the  flue,  capturing  90  per-
cent,  as  you’ve  said,  but  transforming  it  into  a  calcium  carbonate 
substance  that  can  be  used  for  construction.  Are  you  familiar  with 
that? 

Mr. ALIX. Yes, I am. 
Senator KERRY. Would your capture process lend itself to a simi-
lar,  could  it  lend  itself  to  a  similar  transformational  non-geologic 
storage? 

Mr.  ALIX.  I  think  once  you  have  the  raw  pure  CO2,  there  are 
many  things  that  can  be  done.  In  general,  those  processes,  how-
ever,  are  limited  by  the  amount  of  basic  product  that  can  be  used 
and  also  locational  issues,  like  proximity  to  seawater,  issues  like 
that.  So  we  think  those  are  exciting  processes,  but,  in  general, 
when  you  look  at  where  coal  plants  are  and  the  magnitude  that 
needs  to  be  addressed,  sequestration,  we  believe,  is  probably  80+ 
percent of the answer. 

Senator  KERRY.  Mm-hmm.  And  the  sequestration,  you’re  talking 

about compressing that gas,—— 

Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator KERRY.—correct? 
Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  By  compressing  it,  does  it  stay  compressed 
through  the  transfer  process  and  into  the  sequestration  or  does  it 
re-expand in the sequestration? 

Mr. ALIX. It stays that pressure once it’s put under ground. 
Senator KERRY. It stays that pressure? 
Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. And how complicated is the transfer process into 

the sequestration? 

Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  my  understanding  is  basically  you  have  to  char-
acterize wells, you have to have pores, you have to know where it’s 
going, and then there are 3–D monitoring techniques to see it. 

Senator  KERRY.  How  do  you  propel  it?  Through  a  pipe?  How  do 

you transfer it? 

Mr. ALIX. Yes, absolutely, through a pipe. 
Senator KERRY. What sends it? Pressure? 
Mr.  ALIX.  Yes,  and  there  are  intermittent  pipes  for  long  pipe-
lines.  There  are  about  500–600  miles  of  pipelines  going  from  Colo-
rado to the Permian Basin for enhanced oil recovery. About 40 mil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

lion  tons  a  year  of  CO2 have  been  used  over  the  last  20  years.  So 
there’s a great deal of experience in both. 

Senator  KERRY.  This  is  the  same  process.  We  use  this,  I  think, 

in the Dakotas, don’t we? In North Dakota,—— 

Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator KERRY.—there’s a process similar? 
Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  We’ve  been  doing  the  enhanced  recovery  out  of 

that? 

Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. So this is built on that? 
Mr. ALIX. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  All  right.  My  time  is  up.  I  appreciate  it.  Thank 

you for the process and thanks for your testimony. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Kerry.  Senator  Lautenberg 
was  on  his  way  back  and  he  was  one  of  the  first  people  here,  so 
when he does come back, I will call on him. 

But now I go to Senator Snowe. Senator Klobuchar. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you  very  much  to  all  of  you.  You 
know,  I  come  from  Minnesota,  and  we  believe  in  science.  We 
brought  the  world  everything  from  the  pacemaker  to  the  post-it 
note  and  we’re  very  glad  that  in  our  state  that  science  is  upfront 
and center now again in the climate change debate. 

I  also  serve  on  the  Environmental  Committee,  so  we’ve  had  a 
number  of  hearings  with  scientists,  and  I  also  was  able  to  visit 
Greenland which many people call the ‘‘canary in the coal mine’’ for 
climate  change.  In  an  area  that  used  to  be  covered  in  ice,  people 
are  now  planting  potatoes.  Places  that  were  covered  in  ice,  we’re 
able  to  land  a  helicopter  on  rock.  So  I  saw  firsthand  the  effects  of 
climate change in one of our most poignant areas. 

I  also  was  seeing  when  scientists  squelched  what  happens  when 
the Center for Disease Control, the head of that, Julie Gerberding, 
her  testimony  was  redacted  in  front  of  our  Environmental  Com-
mittee,  and  a  lot  of  the  things  you  talked  about,  the  public  health 
effects,  Ms.  Jacobs,  were  not  able  to  come  to  light  until  a  whistle-
blower actually came out and made those things known. 

Again,  I  see  hope  in  that  we  finally  yesterday,  Senator  Snowe 
and I had a bill for a carbon registry, so that we can at least begin 
counting  greenhouse  gas  emissions  that  the  EPA  actually  just  did 
with  the  wave  of  their  wand  yesterday  that  this  is  now  beginning. 
My  question  actually  as  we  look  at  recently,  we’ve  heard,  Dr. 
Killeen,  about  the  potential  for  things,  as  Senator  Kerry  brought 
up,  about  things  being  worse  than  we  thought  and  part  of  this  is 
due  to  this  idea  of  methane  and  what’s  happening  with  that,  and 
I  wondered,  the  methane  gas  that’s  sequestered  in  the  Arctic  per-
mafrost and I know you mentioned this in your testimony and this 
is  one  of  the  reasons  given  that  things  might  actually  be  worse 
than we thought in terms of global warming. 

Could you expound on that a bit? 
Dr. KILLEEN. Well, there are several indications that the pace of 
change is happening stronger than anticipated and sooner than an-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

ticipated for reasons that relate to both emission rates which have 
gone  up  but  also  to  the  response  of  the  planet  and  there  are  some 
things that are surprising to scientists. 

For example, the Arctic sea ice in the Arctic Ocean has degraded 
much more quickly than the most sophisticated models would have 
predicted  and  so  there’s  intense  work  going  on  to  understand 
what’s happening to the ice regions. 

The  permafrost  area,  I  think,  is  one  that  really  does  require  in-
tense  new  work  to  measure  the  rates,  to  look  at  the  pathways,  et. 
cetera,  and  the  other  thing  about  potential  changes,  this  is  a  com-
plex  planet,  made  up  of  interacting  components,  and  science  is 
struggling to work the details of that as a system. 

It  has  many  components:  the  ice,  the  air,  the  ocean,  et.  cetera, 
and  we  may  have  some  surprises  in  store,  and  so  there’s  a  section 
of the scientific community that’s really focused now on thresholds 
and potentially tipping points, things that might change. 

If  you  look  at  the  ancient  record  of  climate,  there  have  been 
events  in  the  past,  ancient  past  where  rapid,  relatively  rapid 
change occurred, prehistorical times, and so there’s a lot of interest 
in what might actually tip things out of the balance. 

We’re dealing with a semi-chaotic system, not a fully-chaotic sys-
tem.  It  is—but  it’s  not  fully  deterministic  either  in  the  sense  that 
you  lay  out  the  equations  and  you  know  exactly  what’s  going  to 
happen.  So  dealing  with  that  kind  of  a  system  opens  the  question 
of how fast and what is the range of responses that might be likely. 
We don’t today know the number which is the climate sensitivity 
of  Planet  Earth.  If  you  doubled  CO2,  what  that  planet  would  actu-
ally  do.  We  know,  we’ve  got  a  good  handle  on  the  range  of  options 
and  everybody  looks  at  the  median  and  says,  well,  that’s  where  it 
is,  but  there  are  two  tales,  there’s  a  slow  tale  and  a  fast  tale,  and 
we  need  to  do  a  really  good  job  of  understanding  how  this  planet 
is going to respond to these forcing functions. 

So, yes, there’s uncertainty on all of those fronts, but it does ap-
pear that the system is changing at rates that exceed what was in 
the IPCC kind of assessments. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Exactly,  and  that’s  what  they  are  saying 
themselves, that we’re not going to have a new report when we go 
to  Copenhagen,  I  don’t  think,  from  IPCC.  We  just  know  that  it 
seems like it’s worse than it is. 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  There’s  a  wonderful  set  of  assessment  reports  that 
the  U.S.  Government  has  just  produced.  I  refer  to  them  in  my— 
and I have a copy—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. All right. Well, we’ll get that. 
Dr. KILLEEN.—of these reports. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Dr.  KILLEEN.  They  contain  the  current  cutting  edge  state-of-the- 

art on many of these areas. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Ms.  Jacobs,  I  just  wanted  to  ask  one  more 
thing and that was that, Dr. Jacobs, you talked about how less peo-
ple understand, and I guess I look at it a different way. 

When  I  first  started  talking  about  this  issue,  you  know,  it  was 
only kids with penguin buttons that would come up and talk to me 
and it has really changed as, you know, city councils in little towns, 
like  Lanesboro,  Minnesota,  are  changing  up  their  light  bulbs, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

snowmobilers  worried  about  it  because  they’ve  seen  the  effects, 
barge owners worried because the levels in Lake Superior are down 
for  the  most  part  at  lower  levels  than  they  were  in  the  past  80 
years. 

And  I  appreciated  Senator  Begich’s  question,  but  I  think  your 
survey  that  you  cited  indicates  that  only  30  percent  of  Americans 
considered  global  warming  a  priority.  When  you  think  about  the 
economy  and  the  way  it  is,  I  actually  do  think  that’s  not  that  bad 
of a number, and I know it’s frustrating for you, but I tell you there 
has been a transformation and part of it is having a President that 
is  putting  this  out  there  and  talking  about  it,  and  the  other  part 
of  it  is  talking  about  this  in  a  way  where  we  see  the  economic  op-
portunity  but  also  the  economic  safety  net  in  how  we  do  cap-and- 
trade  and  other  things  to  make  sure  that  it’s  done  the  right  way 
and  that  it  incorporates  all  of  our  energy  sources,  as  Mr.  Alix  was 
talking about. 

So  do  you  at  least  acknowledge  that  there  has  been  a  trans-
formation  in  that  more  people  are  aware  of  this  and  seeing  it  as 
a problem, even though it’s not quite where you want it? 

Ms.  JACOBS.  There’s  absolutely  no  question  that  we  are  in  the 
midst  of  a  transformation  in  terms  of  people’s  understanding,  but 
I’ve been working with water managers on this topic since the late 
1990s and though I think awareness is very much there, the ability 
to  actually  embrace  the  science  and  know  what  to  do  about  it  is 
not there. 

So  we  have  a  lot  of  people  very  motivated  to  try  to  respond  but 

many who really don’t know exactly how to. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Exactly. Well, very good. Thank you. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you.  As  I  indicated  earlier,  Senator  Lau-
tenberg  was  first  here  and  therefore  I  call  on  Senator  Lautenberg. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Thune, you will be next. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And I’m pleased that this hearing is being 
held.  The  fact  is  that  this  Committee,  and  I  think  you  said  it  very 
clearly, has a significant role to play in the climate change and cer-
tainly  our  interest  is  very  valuable  and  absolutely  the  right  thing 
to do. 

What we’ve seen thus far tells us a lot, so much about the threat 
that is imposed by global warming. I sit on the Environment Com-
mittee  and  also  they’re  pursuing  an  interest  in  what’s  happening 
and  what  we’ve  seen  is  the  Antarctica  getting  warmer.  I’ve  been 
there. I’ve been to the South Pole, been up to Greenland, and when 
we look at the volume of sea ice that has disappeared, over 40 per-
cent, it is frightening. 

As ice melts, the sea levels could rise as much as 20 to 80 inches 
by  the  end  of  this  century,  and  while  in  other  states,  Ms.  Jacobs, 
obviously  you’re  seeing  the  problems  with  water  there,  what  the 
climate change portends for Arizona and similar states, the crucial 
science of global warming, tracking ocean temperatures, reading at-
mospheric  data,  does  fit  significantly  in  the  hands  of  this  Com-
mittee. 

And  one—there’s  a  particular  focus  that  we  have  here  and  that 
is  that  one-third  of  the  greenhouse  gas  emissions  come  from  the 
transportation  sector  which  this  Committee  has  a  significant  role 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

in and rail travel will be one of those solutions, and we know that 
moving  travelers  and  goods  by  rail  uses  substantially  less  energy 
than  moving  them  by  cars  or  trucks.  For  example,  a  ton  of  freight 
can  be  moved  over  400  miles  on  a  single  gallon  of  gas.  Well,  what 
does  that  do  for  the  environment?  Enormous  things  because  it  re-
duces  some  of  the  truck  traffic  and  certainly  automobile  traffic  if 
we continue to do that. 

So  our  Committee’s  got  to  keep  working  to  make  passenger  and 
freight rail part of the solution for our ability to make a difference 
in greenhouse gas emissions. 

Now, Ms. Jacobs, what is the problem, as you see it, on the water 
side  in  your  state  and  neighboring  states,  the  challenge  that’s 
raised there? 

Ms. JACOBS. Well, we have multiple challenges. One of them has 
to do with just temperature increase alone. When you increase the 
temperature  that  increases  the  evaporative  rate.  You  lose  a  lot  of 
moisture  from  the  soil.  All  of  the  plants  take  more  water,  the  peo-
ple take more water. It takes more water for energy to cool houses 
and so forth. So we have both a supply side problem and a demand 
side problem with temperature alone. 

What  we’re  understanding  now  for  the  first  time  really  is  that 
there’s  an  emerging  consensus  that  we’ll  actually  see  reduced  pre-
cipitation  as  well  as  increased  temperatures  and  that  combination 
is actually scaring people quite a bit. 

We don’t necessarily expect to see that across the whole country, 
but there is an area in the Southwest and Northern Mexico where 
it  looks  like  most  of  the  climate  models  are  anticipating  reduced 
precipitation.  So  there’s  a  lot  to  be  concerned  about,  particularly 
with reliability of service water supplies. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I see the threat of global warming as simi-
lar  to  the  plagues  that  mankind  experienced  and  I  call  this  the 
11th  Plague  and  when  I  look  at  my  grandchildren  and  concerned 
about  their  lives,  they’re  very  young  now,  it  has  me  saying  why 
haven’t we not paid—raised a question about why have we not paid 
more attention to this at an earlier stage, but, nevertheless, we are 
where  we  are  and  the  question  is  are  the  goals  that  we  want  to 
attain realistic and typically those who argue the other side of this 
say,  well,  the  cost  of  jobs  is  an  unacceptable  cost,  but  there  is  a 
trade-off. 

The  fact  is  that  there  are  jobs  to  be  obtained  as  a  result  of  the 
transition  to  a  greener  society,  to  the  meeting  standards  that  sat-
isfy our need for work as well as our need for a better environment, 
and I ask, Dr. Killeen, at some point to the fact that regions, some 
regions  are  experiencing  cooler  weather  than  they  normally  have 
and as opposed to elements that were a sign that we are not really 
experiencing global warming. 

What about the science behind this and why cooler temperatures 

in some places prevail? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  If  I  can  respond,  I  think  that’s  related  to  the  fact 
that  2008  was  only  the  10th  warmest  year  on  record  rather  than 
the  first  or  second.  So  2008  was  relatively  cool  and  we’ve  been  in 
a relatively plateau in terms of the warming trend, but if you look 
at any of these 10-year cycles, you can find periods when you have 
relatively colder temperatures. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

The  2008  period  was  marked  by  La  Nin˜ a,  the  opposite  of  El 
Nin˜ o, which tends to cool the—so there’s nothing inconsistent with 
the recent temperature records and the global climate change theo-
ries  that  are  couched  in  the  IPCC  documents  and  certainly  the 
modern  models.  So  there’s  no  sense  that  the—actually,  in  fact,  ev-
erything that’s happened in the last 5 years has reinforced the un-
derstanding that was assessed in the IPCC. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  assume  we’ll  keep  the 

record open and that we’ll be able to—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  hope  to  have  a  second  round.  Thank  you, 

Senator. Senator Thune. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you  for 
holding the hearing. Thank you to our witnesses today for their in-
sightful  testimony.  This  is  a  complex  set  of  technical  and  practical 
challenges  that  we  have  to  face,  and  I  think  as  policymakers  we 
certainly  want  to  be  in  a  position  where  we’re  making  decisions 
that  are  based  upon  the  very  best  science  and  the  very  best  data. 
A  lot  of  proposals  to  cap  and/or  reduce  carbon  emissions  are 
going to have a significant cost to our economy and going to impact 
individuals’  lives  every  day  and  so  the  stakes  are  pretty  high  and 
it’s  important  that  we  get  as  accurate  information  about  climate 
change  and  its  potential  impact  on  our  country  and  around  the 
world as we possibly can. 

I’m  particularly  interested,  Mr.  Alix,  in  some  of  your  testimony 
and the technologies that you have developed that deal with carbon 
capture and sequestration and the role that those are going to play 
in  our  future  energy  supply,  and  I  would  be  curious  in  knowing 
perhaps if you could respond to this question: what are the primary 
regulatory  challenges  to  implementing  the  carbon  capture  and  se-
questration on a wide-scale basis? 

Mr.  ALIX.  I  think  we  have  the  classic  chicken-and-egg  problem 
where  technology  developers  say  that  it’s  commercially  available 
technology for CCS which means we’ll sell it with commercial guar-
antees,  but  plant  owners  cannot  point  to  any  commercial  installa-
tions that are operating. 

So  there’s  risk.  It’s  a  fair  statement  and  so  what  we  would  say 
is,  as  happened  previously  with  things  like  catalytic  converters  on 
our automobiles, the acid rain provisions in the Clean Air Act, you 
have to regulate and you have to have some faith in the technology 
providers  to  bring  this  forward,  commercialize  it  and  then  drive 
costs  down  because  no  doubt,  as  we  build  the  larger  units  and  get 
experience, costs will come down. 

The studies by engineering firms all suggest that we should have 
a high degree of success and one of the firms that operates in your 
neighborhood,  Basin  Electric  Power  Cooperative,  is  not  only  doing 
it  successfully  at  the  Great  Plains  Synfuels  Plant,  and  sending  its 
CO2 up  to  the  Weyburn  fields  but  is  looking  at  building  the 
NextGen plant in South Dakota and capturing CO2 and using it for 
enhanced oil recovery. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

So  there  are  a  number  of  sophisticated  owners  who  are  ready  to 
step forward and install this technology not only on existing plants 
but new plants. 

Senator  THUNE.  We  do  have  an  exciting  project  in  Selby,  South 
Dakota.  Basin  Electric  has  proposed  a  700-megawatt  pulverized 
coal  power  plant  with  post-combustion  carbon  capture  and  seques-
tration  and  Powerspan’s  technology  may  prove  instrumental  in 
making that project a reality. 

When  it  comes  to  the  issues  of  siting,  permitting,  and  other 
issues,  are  there  things  that  can  be  done  at  this  level  that  would 
help  expedite  those  types  of  projects,  and  are  there  significant  dif-
ferences  when  it  comes  to  transporting  CO2 from  natural  gas  or 
other  forms  of  pipelines,  if  you’re  going  to  get  it  to  some  place 
where  you  could  put  it  in  the  ground  and  store  it?  What  sorts  of 
issues  does  this  create?  What  kind  of  regulatory  certainty  is  it 
going to take for folks to invest in these technologies? 

Mr. ALIX. Well, clearly, a cap on CO2 emissions, some sort of new 
performance standard on coal plants gives the owners the idea that 
you  will  be  regulated  for  CO2 emissions  at  some  point.  So  those, 
I think, are important drivers. 

When  you  get  into  actual  implementation,  pipelines  that  carry 
CO2 for  enhanced  oil  recovery,  what  we  expect  to  use,  either  at  a 
gas  plant  or  coal  plant,  should  be  the  same  because  the  CO2 itself 
is  quite  pure,  quite  dry,  no  matter  where  it  comes  from.  So  it’s  a 
carbon steel pipeline. 

There’s  an  optimum  size  in  general  to  deploy  due  to  economies 
of scale and generally you’d like to put a big pipeline in the ground 
that  would  carry  CO2 from  multiple  plants  instead  of  each  plant 
having a smaller pipeline. So there are some issues there. 

In  general,  we  look  more  toward  enhanced  oil  recovery  because 
those  sites  will  pay  for  the  CO2 early  on.  They’re  well  character-
ized. The processes and rules are in place. The longer term, I think, 
a  set  of  standards  which  the  EPA  has  started  to  develop  in  their 
water  standards  for  sequestration,  some  measuring,  monitoring, 
verification  rules  that  are  broader  for  not  only  oil  fields  but  saline 
aquifers, coal seams, et cetera, those rules have to be promulgated 
by the Federal Government. 

They have to include enhanced oil recovery which they don’t cur-
rently and while that’s in process, I think the fact that those aren’t 
in place and that there’s no clear long-term liability, I think, deter-
mination  who  will  take  ownership  in  the  decades  and  millennium 
to  come,  I  think  those  are  some  of  the  issues  that  also  have  to  be 
resolved. 

So  in  the  near  term,  we  think  enhanced  oil  recovery  is  the  way 
to go. The rules are there. But long term, there are standards that 
have  been  developed  by  some  states,  like  Texas  and  Illinois,  that 
on the Federal level would be helpful. 

Senator  THUNE.  OK.  And  to  get  those  on  the  Federal  level,  the 
agencies  have  that  authority.  Is  that  something  that  Congress 
would have to direct them to do? 

Mr.  ALIX.  I  understand  today  agencies  have  the  authority  on  re-
quirements to put CO2 in the ground. In terms of liability, I under-
stand that would have to be handled by Congress. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Senator  THUNE.  Right.  OK.  That  would  be  a  role  that  we  could 
play,  Mr.  Chairman,  in  this  process.  I  see  my  time  has  expired.  I 
have  some  other  questions  but  perhaps  I’ll  submit  those  for  the 
record. 

Thank you all very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Stay around. Thank you. Senator Udall. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TOM UDALL, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW MEXICO 

Senator UDALL. Thank you, Senator Rockefeller. Thank you very 
much  for  holding  this  hearing.  These  witnesses  have  been  very, 
very helpful and I look forward to a lively exchange with them. 

When Senator Begich asked the question, you know, how do you 
talk  to  the  average  citizen  about  this  issue.  I’m  from  New  Mexico. 
You  mentioned  in  your  testimony  that  we’re  going  to  see  less  pre-
cipitation, at least that’s what the models show, and I’ve taken that 
less  precipitation,  changing  our  water,  those  kinds  of  things  and 
tried to talk specifically about that, and one of the ways to do that 
is they have these models of where your particular state would re-
side in terms of the climate and it’s very simple. 

You  can  click  on  your  state  and  for  the  case  of  New  Mexico,  you 
would  drag  New  Mexico,  imagine  your  mouse  and  clicking  on  New 
Mexico and drag it 300 miles to the south which would put us way 
down  in  Chihuahua,  Mexico,  and  if  any  of  you  have  been  to  Santa 
Fe,  New  Mexico,  and  then  Chihuahua,  you  know  there  is  a  huge 
difference  in  terms  of  climate  and  it  shows  the  dramatic  change 
that would occur with our snow pack, for example. 

The  snow  pack  for  the  City  of  Santa  Fe  provides  40  percent  of 
the water out of reservoirs and the outflow from the mountains. So 
if  you  change  that  dramatically  where  you  don’t  even—you  don’t 
have  that  outflow  or  if  it’s  significantly  reduced,  you  then  have  to 
find  the  water  some  place  else.  We’re  mining  our  aquifers.  We’re 
not  doing  that  on  a  sustainable  basis  and  so  we  run  into  a  very, 
very difficult water situation. 

On  top  of  that,  you  have  the  forests,  which  the  trees  get  drier 
when  you  have  less  precipitation  and  you  have  more  forest  fires 
and these are the kinds of things that I think resonate with people 
and  I  wanted  to,  first  of  all,  ask  you  the  question  of  how  reliable 
are these models and what I’m talking about in terms of mid-term 
because  there’s  a  question  I  want  to  follow  up  with,  but  just  your 
general sense of how reliable are these models of what I’m talking 
about  because  I’m  saying  is  the  middle-term  or  the  mid-area  in 
terms  of  the  model,  and  my  understanding  is  the  science  is  saying 
we’re  accelerating,  we’re  going  beyond  the  middle  conservative  in-
crease we expect in temperature and we’re going well beyond that. 

So could you all comment on that, any of you that care to? 
Dr. KILLEEN. Yes, Senator. I think the models that we have, the 
state-of-the-art climate models that we have today do not have the 
fidelity  and  the  credibility  at  the  regional  or  at  the  decadal  level 
to really take those numbers to the bank. 

On  the  other  hand,  the  global-scale  predictions  are  robust  and 
credibility,  and  I  think  in  my  testimony,  I  was  trying  to  make  the 
point  that  we  are  poised  now  to  move  into  this  new  era  where,  in-
deed, we can generate the kinds of models that will be meaningful 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

to dam providers, to agricultural, to city planners, et cetera, in ex-
actly  the  kind  of  issue  you’re  talking  about  with  detail  and  with 
probabilistic  distributions  that  you  can  actually  make  decisions  on 
the basis of, and I think that’s the exciting new scientific era that’s 
dawning  right  now  and  is  going  to  be  driven  by  human  capital,  by 
interdisciplinary expertise, by computational and by a focus on the 
regional aspects of global climate change which then brings in this 
interface between science and the stakeholder community. 

So  we’re  on  the  verge,  I  think  within  a  decade,  of  being  able  to 

do the kinds of things that you’re talking about. 

Senator  UDALL.  The  time-frame  you’re  talking  about  is  a  decade 

for these next generation predictive models to be able to be—— 

Dr. KILLEEN. Yes, sir. 
Senator UDALL.—more reliable in terms of regional effects? 
Dr. KILLEEN. You’re seeing the infant, the first blush capabilities 
that have some capability and are clearly consistent with the global 
perspective,  but  the  next  level  is  going  to  be  more  detailed  and 
much higher fidelity. 

Senator UDALL. Thank you. 
Mr.  DILWEG.  Senator,  if  I  could  follow  up,  as  the  insurers  look 
at  it,  they  are  about  10  years  away.  I  think  the  issue  for  them  is 
they have these 50-year, 100-year looks and what insurers look for 
is  more  of  a  25-year  mortgage,  30-year  mortgage  to  really  shrink 
it down and identify it. 

When  you  look  at  the  wildfire  modeling  in  California,  that’s  al-
most  there.  That’s  probably  going  to  translate  on  where  you  put 
your brush, where you put plants next to a home, things like that, 
but it is what you’re seeing. 

I  mean,  the  concern  is  if  you  get  a  drought  like  what  China  is 
seeing,  in  your  state,  I  mean  that’s  catastrophic,  and  what  we  see 
in our region, it’s not only the coastal areas, but it’s—you know, in 
Wisconsin and Iowa, we’ve had the most rainfall in over, you know, 
500-year floodplains. So it’s these extreme swings that the insurers 
are trying to get a handle on and record tornadoes last year. 

So I think I would agree on the commercial side that we’re look-

ing at about 10 years from now. 

Senator UDALL. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. Senator Warner. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK WARNER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator WARNER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I’m still trying 
to  master  how  you’re  in  three  places  at  one  time,  and  I  apologize 
if some of my questions may have been asked, but I’m particularly 
interested in following up with Mr. Alix. 

I  have  a  state  like  the  Chairman’s  and  I  understand  Senator 
Thune asked some questions on this subject, as well. I’m very, very 
interested in the possibilities around sequestration technology and, 
Mr. Alix, interested in what you’re doing with Powerspan. 

I would note that, like the Chairman, our states are very similar 
in  terms  of  coal-producing  and  I  would  add  very  quickly  that  Vir-
ginia  Tech  has  some  of  the  most  advanced  sequestration  research 
going  on  and  it  might  be  a  place  that  you  might  want  to  visit,  as 
well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

I am interested in your technology. If you have looked and costed 
out  how  much  it  would  cost  to  put  in  your  technology  and  can  it 
be put into an existing pulverized coal plant and if you were to put 
in  the  technology,  what  type  of  output  reductions  would  you  see? 
I  understand  we  clearly  would  get  cleaner  emissions,  but  what  is 
not only the front-end price but what is the ongoing price in terms 
of decreased production? 

Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  as  you  point  out,  there’s  a  difference  between  a 
new  coal  plant  and  a  retrofit.  We  have  looked  at  several  retrofits 
and when we’ve looked at retrofits, we’re typically looking at some-
thing  on  the  order  of  baseload  500–600  megawatts,  relatively  new 
maybe  mid-1980s  on.  So  it  has  useful  life  remaining  to  amortize 
the  investment,  and  we  see  costs  of  roughly  $30  to  $35  a  ton  for 
CO2 capture and compression. 

Typically,  one  would  add  another  $5  to  $10  per  ton  CO2 for  se-
questration,  unless  it  was  sold  for  enhanced  oil  recovery,  at  which 
point  you  would  have  a  decrease  in  that  cost.  So  we  think  it  can 
be  installed  and  retrofitted.  We  think  the  costs  would  add  on  the 
order of maybe three to four cents a kilowatt hour in a retrofit situ-
ation, so it’s not insignificant by any means. 

In terms of the question—I’m sorry. 
Senator WARNER. In terms of the retrofit and in terms of the new 
build, you know, whole in versus electrical production out with the 
technology,  what  decreased  amount  of—in  fact,  productivity,  elec-
trical  productivity  are  we—what  is  the  second  half  of  the  cost  in 
terms of productivity? 

Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  these  numbers  take  into  account  that  cost,  of 
course,  but  for  a  new  plant,  we  see  15  to  20  percent  reduction  in 
net output and for a retrofit, it would be more like 20 to 25. Again, 
there  would  be  efficiency-related  losses  and  the  cost  of  adapting  it 
to a retrofit would be greater than a new plant. 

Senator WARNER. Which is always less efficient. So it’s quite sig-
nificant,  the  reduction  in  net  output  for  adding  CCS,  and  I  under-
stand that Senator Thune asked a couple questions. 

I was looking at it in terms of what can we do to speed develop-
ment  of  this  technology,  Number  1,  yours  and  other  competitors, 
and I understand that the answers revolved around EPA standards 
and then dealing with some other liabilities. 

Can you talk a little bit about some of the liability issues? 
Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  you  know,  I’m  not  extremely  well  versed  on  the 
liability  issues  because  they’re  principally  involved  with  putting 
CO2 underground  and  maintaining  it  in  place  and  not  having  any 
leaking  or  even  sometimes  earthquake  potential  if  you  put  it  near 
a fault. So there are people who are more well versed in that. 

But  in  terms  of  how  we  get  technology  moving,  soon  because  I 
think  there’s  consensus  we  need  to.  There  have  been  incentives 
proposed,  both  in  the  House  and  Senate  as  part  of  most  climate 
packages,  things  like  bonus  allowances,  that  get  CCS  moving 
ahead of a CO2 price that would pay for it, and we’re a big advocate 
of  that  because  we  think  that  type  of  regime  is  needed  to  get  10 
to  20  commercial  scale  units  deployed  in  the  U.S.  and  show  that 
this is a viable response for mitigation to keep our coal plants run-
ning and to keep that low-cost electricity source viable. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

Senator  WARNER.  The  Administration—there  has  been  a  lot  of 
controversy  in  the  last  few  days  about  some  of  the  numbers  that 
might  have  been  slightly  cooked  on  the  Future  Gen  project  in  Illi-
nois  and,  you  know,  I’d  like  you  to  comment  generally  about  the 
approach  we’re  taking  which  seems  to  be  still  putting  a  lot  of  the 
eggs in that single beta site example rather than trying to support 
a  series  of  beta  sites  around  the  country.  Any  comments  anybody 
else  on  the  panel  wants  to  comment  on  the  approach  being  taken? 
Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  clearly,  there  need  to  be  a  lot  of  different  solu-
tions, but the problem is existing coal plants in the U.S. and China 
which  are  pulverized  coal  plants.  So  I  think  that  is  the  pressing 
need,  both  in  the  short  term  and  the  long  term,  clearly  because 
these plants have oftentimes 50- or 60-year lives. 

Beyond  that,  a  new  generation  of  technologies,  such  as  Oxyfuel 
or  gasification  with  CO2 capture,  is  also  promising  for  the  decades 
beyond  now  and  so  at  least  one  demonstration  or  two  of  each  of 
those  is  critical  for  us  to  understand  what  the  real  costs  are.  So 
how one juggles those priorities, you know, I think is up to you all, 
but  I  would  say  that  type  of  demonstration  is  important  as  is 
Oxyfuel,  as  is  many  of  the  post-combustion  technologies  of  which 
we are only one. 

But  the  big  problem  clearly  is  existing  pulverized  coal  plants, 
both in the U.S., China, India, Europe, and Australia. That’s where 
the emissions are and they’re not going away any time soon. 

Senator  WARNER.  Well,  before  I  ask  the  panel  if  they  want  to 
comment,  I  know  my  time  has  expired,  but  I  would  simply  add, 
putting  the  parochial  hat  on  again,  that  we’re  about  to  build  a 
next-generation  plan  in  Southwest  Virginia  that  has  got,  in  effect, 
the land and the ability to do a sequestration demonstration project 
that  I  would  strongly  urge—and  I  for  one  think  in  the  area  of  Ap-
palachia  that  basically  developed  coal,  that  powered  our  economy 
in  the  th  20th  Century,  sure  would  be  great  if  we  had  a  couple  of 
demonstration  projects  on  how  we’re  to  be  able  to  use  coal  in  the 
21st Century actually taking place back in our home region. 

So  I  would  urge  you  to  consider  that  and  again  I  know  my  time 
expired,  but  if  anybody  else  wants  to  add  a  comment  in  terms  of 
the approach the Administration is taking on this. 
The CHAIRMAN. It’s more than expired, Senator. 
Senator WARNER. On that note, thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Warner.  Senator  Cantwell. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for 

this important hearing. 

I’d  like  to  ask  Ms.  Jacobs  and  Dr.  Killeen  about  adaptation  in 
general.  Washington  State  and  Seattle  and  King  County,  all  three 
entities  have  done  regional  climate  analysis  for  adaptation.  So  I 
think  they’re  really  kind  of  leaders  in  the  country  in  doing  that, 
and we really don’t have the large-scale models. 

Part  of  the  issue  of  doing  climate  adaptation  is  that  the  models 
and  data  for  the  large-scale  are  so  important  to  then  give  to  the 
local  entities  so  that  they  can  make  regional  plans  from  them.  We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

did  pass  an  adaptation  bill  out  of  this  committee  and  unlikely  to 
reintroduce  it  again  this  year  because  I  think  it’s  important  that 
we  have  the  impetus  and  Federal  agencies  are  doing  their  part  in 
planning, particularly when it comes to incorporating climate mod-
els and infrastructure and decisionmaking. 

My question is what models are needed for the local governments 
and regional governments to appropriately plan, and why aren’t we 
doing  that  right  now?  What  do  you  think  is  standing  in  the  way 
of  why  we’re  not—why  we  haven’t  achieved  that  goal  yet  on  adap-
tation? 

Ms. JACOBS. I’ll start and then I’ll pass it on. It isn’t only because 
we don’t have the models that local people are relatively frustrated. 
I mean, it’s partly because it’s very difficult to know how much un-
certainty  there  really  is  and  I  think  that  if  you  explain  clearly  to 
people  that,  you  know,  it’s  true,  we  don’t  know  exactly  how  much 
a plant’s going to warm, we don’t know how much sea level is going 
to  rise,  and  we  don’t  know  exactly  what’s  going  to  happen  in  the 
climate system, however, we know it will be warmer, we know that 
sea  level  will  be  higher,  and  we  expect  longer  droughts  and  more 
extreme events. 

Well, if you say that, then you know you need to, you know, real-
ly beef up your infrastructure, you need to be concerned about res-
ervoir capacity, et cetera. There are a number of really distinct and 
sort  of  obvious  responses  to  the  higher  temperature,  the  more  ex-
tremes, et cetera. So a lot of people are getting wound up about not 
having  the  down-scaled  information  available  to  them  and  they 
really want it, and I understand that. 

My  research  group  is  working  on  a  down-scaling  project  right 
now,  but  I  also  am  concerned  that  people  want  definitive  answers 
and  those  definitive  answers  are  not  going  to  be  available  fast 
enough to suit them. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  But  shouldn’t  we  have  Federal  agencies  re-
quire  taking  into  consideration  these  factors  into  their  decision-
making? 

Ms. JACOBS. Sure. Absolutely. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  We’ve  added  Washington  State  to  100-year 
floods  back  to  back.  So  people  are  saying  hmm.  They’re  not  really 
100-year floods if they’re back to back. 

Ms.  JACOBS.  Yes.  There’s—absolutely.  We  need  to  be  paying  far 
more attention to adaptation and I don’t mean by the fact that we 
don’t need to have perfect information that we shouldn’t be making 
decisions and we shouldn’t be concerned. 

We need to be concerned and we need to make decisions and we 
need  the  Federal  agencies  to  be  helping  with  that,  both  with  pro-
ducing  the  science  and  with  doing  those  adaptation  things  them-
selves. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  putting  that  in  the  statute  would  help. 
Ms. JACOBS. Yes. 
Dr. KILLEEN. May I add to your question on the model—— 
Senator CANTWELL. Yes. 
Dr. KILLEEN.—state of readiness? The models of the 1970s could 
barely  have  a  stable  planet  to  do  any  climate  analyses.  By  the 
1980s,  you  had  the  atmosphere  and  the  oceans  circulating  and 
interacting.  In  the  1990s,  you  added  things  like  carbon,  et  cetera. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

The  state-of-the-art  model  today  has  many  of  these  interacting 
components  but  as  a  resolution  element,  there’s  a  grid  point  like 
every  50  kilometers.  So  what  you’re  looking  for  is  not  resolved  in 
the current state-of-the-art models. 

The  next  generation  state-of-the-art  model  opens  that  door.  You 
suddenly  are  able  to  look  at  one  to  two  kilometer  resolution.  You 
can resolve large estuaries. You can resolve specifics about regional 
issues  and  those  models  will  be  running  on  super  computers  and 
they will have the methane and the ice shelves and all the missing 
ingredients that we’ve been talking about in this hearing and they 
will  also  have  a  family  of  adjacent  models  that  are  called,  ‘‘inte-
grated  assessment  models,’’  that  will  be  stakeholder-tuned  to  ex-
actly do what you’re referring to. 

So we’re on this threshold of really being able to do the kinds of 
integrated assessments and then interact with statutes and policy-
makers in the next few years. 

Senator CANTWELL. And that information probably would be bet-
ter  than  just  saying  it’s  a  100-year  flood,  correct?  I  mean,  it  will 
be  based  on  more  science,  more  data,  more  information  than  just 
looking at one piece of the puzzle which is history on climate? 

Dr. KILLEEN. Yes, that information—we won’t just be redoing the 
tables  of  the  100-year  floods  but  you’ll  be  getting  probabilistic  dis-
tributions  of  likely  outcomes  by  parameter,  by  region,  by  economic 
sector,  and  this  is  going  to  be  of  incredible  use  to  the  way  society 
is managed. 

Senator CANTWELL. I know my time is up, Mr. Chairman, but I’d 
like to submit a question to the panel about what research level we 
need  on  ocean  acidification  because  that’s  another  model  that  we 
need  right  away.  Our  shellfish  industry  is  having  unbelievable 
problems  on  feeding  this  year  just  because  of  the  climate  change. 
They need information. They need an understanding of what’s hap-
pening,  and  I  think  people—the  oceans  are  just  at  a  much  more 
rapid impact on the CO2 than I think people realize. 

I know the Chairman understands this issue. So I thank him for 

his patience and indulgence on it. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator Cantwell. I’m going to make 
an  effort  here  to  have  a  second  round  and  I  want  to  pick  on  you 
three. 

Commissioner  Dilweg,  you  talked  about  last  century  and  what 
you  had  to  do  with  wooden  houses  having  fire  engines  every  five 
blocks. That’s what the insurance industry said had to be done and 
it  happened.  So  now  you’ve  got  a  new  situation  and  so,  in  effect, 
I’m just drawn to ask you what kind of new kinds of insurance poli-
cies  are  you  seeing  or  do  you  foresee  being  issued,  promulgated  or 
whatever to deal with our current situation? 

Mr.  DILWEG.  I  think  the  issue  that  we  run  into  as  regulators  is, 
as the companies are innovative in their products, are they pricing 
it  correctly?  Are  they  taking  into  account  climate  change  and  then 
are they charging too much or not charging enough? 

We  don’t  right  now  have  the  tools  to  kind  of  check  the  industry 
on  that,  but  I  think  some  of  the  industry  innovations  surrounding 
miles  traveled  in  an  automobile,  getting  a  discount  for  miles  trav-
eled,  getting  a  discount  for  a  hybrid,  giving  incentives,  you  have 
companies that are giving incentives to have leads-built and green- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

built  as  you  rebuild  Galveston  or  Katrina,  so  those  types  of  things 
are  occurring  and  you’re  getting  consumers  willing  to  pay  a  little 
bit  more  and  so  the  area  that  I  see  most  recently  the  interaction 
of  the  insurance  industry  in  two  areas  drove  how  we  viewed  the 
Y2K problem. 

We started asking questions, and this is really the question, can 
the  insurance  industry  drive  the  paper  company  or  the  coal  plant 
to  change,  and  in  the  Y2K  situation  it  was  the  insurance  industry 
and the SEC, for example, saying, all right, this is going to happen, 
what  are  you  doing?  Is  your  system  going  to  shut  down?  Am  I 
going to have to be paying business interruption insurance? 

You  know,  Y2K  was  a  very  specific  example  where  they  chimed 
in, and then you look at safety in automobiles that has been a long- 
term process of—I mean, when I was a kid in the 1970s you didn’t 
wear  a  seatbelt.  I  mean,  you  know,  the  windows  went  up  on  your 
head. You know, the automobile was a pretty scary place for a kid. 
Now,  you’re  locked  in  a  five-point  harness.  You’ve  got  air  bags. 
You’ve got everything running at you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I’ve  got  to  cut  you  off  and  let  the  other  two  in. 
Dr. Jacobs, can you give me an example of how you take science 

and then make decisions from it? 

Ms.  JACOBS.  Well,  that’s  a  great  question.  I’ll  give  you  an  exam-

ple from my own research. 

I’ve been working on the Colorado River and helping the Bureau 
of  Reclamation  with  the  decisions  they  make  to  operate  the  dams 
on  the  river  system  and  helping  them  to  incorporate  both  current 
ocean  temperature  information  that  has  predictive  capacity  and 
think  about  the  future  in  terms  of  the  very  long  term  what  does 
climate  change  mean  to  the  operations  of  the  Colorado  River  and 
to the stakeholders that are dependent on it. So that’s one example. 
But the Arizona Water Institute that I have been running for the 
last  3  years  exists  entirely  to  connect  the  university  system  to  the 
people  who  make  decisions.  So  it’s  about  mobilizing  that  informa-
tion  for  people  to  use  and  so  we  focus  on  the  stakeholders  in  the 
State  of  Arizona,  answering  water  quality  questions,  salinity,  en-
ergy and water, those kinds of issues. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you.  Mr.  Alix,  we  had  this  thing  called 
Lieberman-Warner,  last  year.  It  was  a  big  environmental  amend-
ment  and  it  said  that  by  the  year  2050,  carbon  dioxide  had  to  be 
down  to  30  percent,  and  in  you  walk  and  start  talking  about  10 
percent  and,  I  mean,  this  is  stunning  because  I  think  if  you  went 
to  100  percent,  it’s  totally  cost  ineffective.  That’s  the  question  I’d 
like to ask you but don’t have time to ask you. 

If  you  could  go  to  10  percent  or  8  percent  or  whatever  it  is  and 
you  suggested  actually  9  percent,  why  aren’t  others  interested? 
Why  are  some  of  the  largest  energy  companies  that  do  this,  why 
are  they  sort  of  taking  off  on  their  own  track  which  is  much  less 
effective? 

Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  I  think,  first,  my  comment  was  coal-fired  power 
plant  emissions  could  be  reduced  from  about  36  percent  to  four  to 
five. 

The CHAIRMAN. Four to five? 
Mr. ALIX. Four to five. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Good.  That’s  good,  because  that’s  what  Dr. 

Holdren said. 

Mr.  ALIX.  That’s  great.  I’m  in  good  company  then.  Certainly 
transportation  could  be  reduced,  and  then  you  look  at  homes  and 
other uses and industries. 

Overall, you know, the overall goal, I do think, you know, 80 per-
cent  reduction  that  the  President  has  recently  proposed  is  achiev-
able  by  2050  from  my  view.  Why  others  are  not  quick  to  grasp  it, 
it’s difficult and it’s costly and there’s risk. 

These  are  very  large  capital  investments,  you  know,  for  carbon 
capture  and  storage  on  a  baseload  power  plant,  $500  million  or 
more.  It’s  going  to  increase  the  cost  to  ratepayers  two-three-four 
cents  a  kilowatt  hour  which  for  industries  that  depend  on  low-cost 
electricity  in  West  Virginia  and  other  places  is  a  very  significant 
hit. 

The CHAIRMAN. The government could help pay. 
Mr. ALIX. I think if the government subsidizes early units, which 
is part of the bonus allowance structure in Lieberman-Warner and 
Dingell-Boucher, I think it’s a huge, huge reason for the coal indus-
try  to  embrace  it,  and  I  think  you’re  seeing  certain  folks  in  U.S. 
CAP and other places saying, you know, if the trade-off is the gov-
ernment pays for some of these early installations to show the tech-
nology’s commercial and not disadvantage our low-cost plants, then 
we can get onboard. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, let the world take note of you, and now I’m 
going  to  infuriate  the  Governor,  former  Governor  of  Virginia  if  I 
continue, so I have to stop and ask Senator Hutchison. 

Senator HUTCHISON. I just want to ask one question again of Dr. 

Killeen, if you know. 

I  have  seen  hurricane-tracking  since,  basically  1900s,  maybe 
even  a  little  before,  but  with  the  levels  attached  to  it.  So  we  have 
seen  really  an  ebb  and  flow.  It  hasn’t  been  just  a  continuation  of 
a  build-up  through  the  years,  but  what  I  haven’t  seen,  and  I  won-
der  if  you  have  any  knowledge  of  this  or  if  there  is  tracking,  is 
what seems to me to be a relatively new phenomenon which is the 
surges. 

Katrina  didn’t  hit  New  Orleans.  It  was  the  surge  that  really  did 
the  damage  to  New  Orleans  and  Ike,  the  surge  was  something  we 
have  never  seen.  How  hard  but  also  how  far  in  the  coast  it  came. 
I  grew  up  in  Galveston  County,  so  I’m  speaking  anecdotally,  but  I 
can’t remember, after the sea wall was built, which is 12 or 13 feet, 
I  don’t  remember  that  it  was  ever  breached,  but  it  was  as  if  you 
could  go  and  jump  in  a  swimming  pool  when  I  was  down  there 
right after Ike. It was right there. 

My question is do we have a record of that, and do you see a pat-

tern there on the surge as opposed to the intensity of the wind? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  This  is  a  very  active  and,  I  would  say,  not  con-
troversial but dynamic scientific discussion on how hurricanes have 
changed  over  time,  and  there’s  now  literature  on  the  relationship 
of  the  track,  the  intensity,  and  the  storm  surge  consequences  of 
hurricanes, and there’s a group of scientists who are publishing re-
sults that look—that suggest that intensities of hurricanes have in-
creased,  not  numbers  of  hurricanes  because  they’re  limited  by  the 
number of easterly waves that come off Africa. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

So  you  have  kind  of  a  total  number  that  we  could  never  predict 
but the intensities of hurricanes and, of course, that relates directly 
to  storm  surge.  So  the  pressure  in  the  middle  of  the  hurricane  is 
what, when it hits landfall, is going to be the principal driving fac-
tor  behind  the  storm  surge.  Also  angles  and  things  like  that.  But 
that’s an active area of inquiry. 

I  would  say  where  we  have  seen  real  progress  is  on  hurricane 
track  estimation.  We’re  getting  better  predictions  of  where  hurri-
canes are going to go further upstream than before. We’re getting— 
we’re  making  some  inroads  on  intensity,  as  well,  although  that’s  a 
much  tougher  problem  because  you  have  to  deal  with  wind  shear 
in  the  atmosphere  and  other  things,  but  if  you  fly  aircraft  in,  you 
drop sounds, they’re actually improving, too. 

So  we’re  getting  better,  and  I  would  say  that  there’s—the  jury’s 
out on exactly the relationship of hurricane prevalence and climate 
change,  although  there’s  a  body  of  work  that  suggests  that  almost 
the  intuitive  thing  is  happening  which  means  that  you  have  more 
evaporation, you have greater energy in the system, and the hurri-
canes  are  going  to  be  stronger.  So  there  is  evidence  that  has  been 
published and there are people who argue against that, also. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Well,  I  have  seen  the  tracking  be  so  much 
more  accurate  in  the  last  few  years.  They  have  predicted  exactly 
where these go and, of course, it helps in saving people’s lives, but 
then  the  surge  was  not  expected  to  do  the  damage  that  it  did  and 
did  not  really  give  the  notice  in  Katrina  and  really  they  were  not 
prepared  for  it  in  Galveston  either  and  along  the  Gulf  Coast  for 
Ike. 

As  we  are  working  toward  the  legislation  that  I’m  hoping  to  in-
troduce,  I  really  want  to  make  sure  that  I  put  everything  in  that 
we ought to be focusing on and I would look forward to having your 
help. 

Dr. KILLEEN. I would be delighted to. 
Senator  HUTCHISON.  All  right.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr. 

Chairman, for the second round. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. Senator Warner. 
Senator WARNER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I’ll try to be a little 

more observant of my time. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  No,  don’t,  because  I’ve  got  a  question  after  you. 
Senator  WARNER.  I  think  you  raised  a  very  valid  point  with  Mr. 
Alix, which is if we’re on the cusp of an influction point, why don’t 
the  traditional  incumbent  industries  get  it?  And  making  one  anal-
ogy  from  an  industry  I’m  a  little  more  familiar  with  and  that  was 
the  wireless  industry,  the  cell  phone  industry,  you  know,  I  was  in 
that for a long time, co-founder of Nextel and I will always remem-
ber  back  in  the  mid-1980s,  cell  phones  were  just  starting  to  de-
velop,  every  bit  of  smart  money,  all  of  Wall  Street  and  all  of  the 
telephone companies all had a common consensus. It would take 30 
to  35  years  to  build  out  a  wireless  network  in  America  and  at  the 
end of that 30 to 35 years, 3 percent of Americans would have cell 
phones. 

Well, they totally got it wrong because we hit an influction point, 
I  think  around  energy  and  with  the  push  of  climate  change,  if  we 
do  it  right,  we  are  close  to  hitting  that  influction  point,  and  my 
question,  probably  directly  to  Mr.  Dilweg,  but  again  with  the  3:48 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

I’ve  got,  anybody  who  wants  to  add  on,  is  are  there  things,  other 
than  government  incentives,  and  are  there  things,  for  example, 
that the insurance industry could do to accelerate this? 

For  example,  I  believe  that  until  very  recently  people  have  be-
come  concerned  about  climate  change,  the  American  consumer  has 
been basically told two options, you know, turn out the lights or go 
buy  a  Prius,  and  not  much  in  between,  and  in  the  last  year  or  so, 
we’re starting to see movement with the development and perhaps 
more  acceptance  of  EnergyStar  and  we’ve  seen  specific  industries 
meet certifications. 

But I tend to believe that we’re still lacking across industry con-
sumer branding Good Housekeeping seal of approval that might be 
EnergyStar on steroids so that consumers in all of their daily pur-
chases  have  a  trusted  and  more  environmentally-sensitive  climate 
change-sensitive  purchase  option  versus  a  traditional  which  might 
again help us move in how consumers making better choices about 
how they get their power generation. 

I  guess  I’d  just  be  interested  in  seeing  any  comments  from  any 
of  the  panel  beyond  simply  what  we  can  do  with  governmental  in-
centives,  what  we  can  do  to  move  consumer  choices,  and  are  there 
things the insurance industry can do to help? 

Mr. DILWEG. I think in the insurance industry, the main partici-
pants in this have been the reinsurers because when a primary in-
surer,  you  know,  like  a  Liberty  Mutual,  blows  through  its  limits, 
it’s the reinsurer that picks it up. It’s the reinsurers that are more 
adventuresome in Europe. They have to actually cover flood in Eu-
rope.  Here,  flood  is  covered  by  the  Federal  Government.  So,  you 
know,  it’s  that—that’s  where  I’ve  seen  the  most,  the  embracing  of 
climate change because they’re on the hook financially. 

As  far  as  the  kind  of  branding  and  getting  into  the  products, 
that’s slowly evolving. The ties are there. The consumers are start-
ing  to  drive  it.  Some  companies  are  doing  it  just  to  get  the  con-
sumer  approval,  but  it’s  not  a  cross  industry  type  of  thing  at  this 
point. 

Senator WARNER. Dr. Killeen? 
Dr.  KILLEEN.  Senator  Warner,  I’m  not  an  expert  on  consumer 
preferences  or  anything  like  that,  but  I  think  part  of  the  debate 
about  climate  science  has  been  because  the  signal  of  humankind- 
induced changes has been masked to some extent by natural varia-
bility. That’s now changed. 

The signal for human-induced change has come out of the wood-
work,  if  you  like.  Ten  years  from  now,  it’ll  be  really  out  of  the 
woodwork  and  so  that’s  going  to  affect  people’s  perceptions  in  sub-
stantial ways. So my daughter’s generation and my daughter wants 
to  occupy  one  of  these  seats,  incidentally,  but  is  already  very  pas-
sionate  about  it.  The  next  one  after  that  is  going  to  be  even  more 
aware  and  so  forth.  So  there  will  be  the  public  attention  is  going 
to be really riveted by this story as it unfolds. 

Senator WARNER. Well, I agree with that, and I think that there 
has  been,  while  well-intentioned  things  like  EnergyStar  and  lead 
certification,  but  the  thinking  has  not  been  broad  enough,  expan-
sive  enough,  and  in  many  ways  our  challenges  would  be  easier  if 
we  could  really  engage  the  American  consumers  in  this  debate  in 
a bigger way. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  in  a  more  creative  way.  We  obviously  have 

to be so much more aggressive in putting—— 

Senator  WARNER.  Aggressive  and  more  creative.  We  need  some-
thing  to  make  this  user-friendly.  Again,  my  daughters  are  in  the 
same  circumstance.  They  may  not  want  to  sit  here  but  they  want 
to  be  part  of  the  solution  set  and  we  don’t—every  consumer  choice 
this  decision—this  can  be  built  in  and  there  has  not  been  a  cross- 
brand, you know, really professionally-driven non-governmental ap-
proach to this and I think it’s a wonderful opportunity. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator Warner. Two questions. 
First  is,  Dr.  Killeen,  my  understanding  is  that  we  talked  earlier 
about  permafrost,  Siberia,  Alaska,  other  places,  under  permafrost, 
and  I  don’t  know  how  much  is  there  of  it,  is  methane.  Methane, 
I’m told, is about 30 to 35 times worse than carbon dioxide. 

So  my  question  to  you  is,  just  give  me  an  answer  on  it,  please, 
if  you  take  all  the  permafrost  in  this  world,  how  much  of  it  is 
underlain by methane? 

Dr.  KILLEEN.  If  you  took  all  the  permafrost  in  the  world,  there 
would  be  so  much  methane  that  we  would  be  an  unrecognizable 
planet.  There  is  huge  quantities  of  methane  in  the  deep  perma-
frost. 

The CHAIRMAN. Huge. Is any escaping at this point? 
Dr.  KILLEEN.  There  are  measurements—I’m  talking  about  the 
new  surface  permafrost.  It’s  important  to—there’s  a  deep  reservoir 
and there is new surface reservoir. 

The  deep  reservoir  is  huge.  The  new  surface  reservoir  is  more 
modest,  but  it’s  clearly  dynamically  changing.  There  are—we  can 
see  in  the  ocean  bubbles  of  methane  coming  out  of  methane  hy-
drate  formations  in  the  Arctic  Ocean,  for  example.  We  can  see  the 
decomposition  of  new  surface  permafrost  in  places  like  Alaska 
where, you know, buildings can slip because of the—so there’s evi-
dence  that’s  some  of  the  new  surface  permafrost  is  degrading  and 
there are bore hole observations, as well, that show a change in the 
temperature  distribution  of  the  new  surface  permafrost  in  Alaska 
that  have  now  systematically  been  done  for  10–15  years  and  that 
show that the thermal balance is changing in that permafrost. 

But  this  is  a  joker  in  the  pack  of  our  understanding  of  climate 
change because the IPCC models didn’t have methane in there. The 
next  round  of  models  will  have  methane  in  them  with  some  as-
sumptions about sources in flux, et cetera, and—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Dr. KILLEEN. Thank you. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Alix,  I  was  talking  with  the  Chairman  of 
Cisco  about  you  and  your  project  and  he  said  that  when  he  plants 
a  tree,  what  he  likes  to  do  is  put  out  about  six  seeds,  assuming 
that  through  the  process  of  development,  one  will  work  and  the 
others won’t. 

Now,  I  go  right  back  to  why  aren’t  more  people  latching  on  to 
what  you’re  doing.  I  mean,  this  is  a  closed  community.  Everybody 
knows everything about what everybody else is doing. But the vari-
ety of solutions is just staggering in their effectiveness. You’re talk-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

ing 5 percent. That’s right dead center on nuclear, which is consid-
ered clean, and I don’t understand. 

I’ve already asked you the question, but I want you to talk more 
about it. Why aren’t people doing more of what you’re doing or are 
there  other  iterations  of  what  you’re  doing  that  people  could  be 
doing?  Are  you  restricted  or  are  others  restricted  because  they’re 
not working in the territory that you’re working in? 

Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  I  think  there  is  an  overall  constraint  which  I 
mentioned earlier which is purely financial, which is it’s a massive 
investment  in  capital  and  operating  costs.  As  Mr.  Warner  men-
tioned, it’s a 15 to 25 percent reduction in electrical output. So this 
is a bill for an average plant of $20 to $50 million a year per power 
plant. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We’re  talking  huge  companies,  Mr.  Alix,  huge 

companies. 

Mr.  ALIX.  Well,  I  think  you’d  have  to  ask  those  CEOs.  My  belief 
is they will not—there’s only one CEO I know in this United States 
that’s  prepared  with  his  shareholders  and  owners  to  spend  money 
in  advance  of  government  incentives  and  a  requirement  and  that’s 
Ron Harper in Basin Electric and I think they’re a shining example 
and  the  reason  they’re  doing  it  is  because  they  get  96  percent  of 
their  electricity  from  coal  and  their  average  price  to  their  con-
sumers  is  around  five  cents  a  kilowatt  hour  and  they’re  worried 
under climate legislation that goes away. So he’s stepping out. He’s 
spending  his  members’  money,  about  $250–300  million,  to  prove 
this technology. 

I have not seen one other CEO in the United States who’s willing 

to make that investment without government backing. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  All  right.  So  then  that’s  their  attitude.  So  you 

say fine, then we’ll tax carbon. 

Mr. ALIX. I think certainly if you put a limit on CO2 and you put 
a price on it, that’s the beginning of a lot of action and I would sup-
port such actions. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  So  you  think  then  the  incentives  become  a  little 

less necessary and the action becomes a little more active? 

Mr. ALIX. Yes. I think so. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  OK.  I  like  that.  Thank  you  all  extremely  much. 
You’ve  been  a  terrific  panel.  I  have  to  say  one  official  thing  here: 
we’re going to keep the th record open for Committee members till 
March 20 of this year, Friday, for any additional questions or state-
ments. I would like to thank each one of you. 

This  is  such  a  huge  subject  and  what’s  fascinating,  and  unfortu-
nate  in  some  ways,  is  that  we  have  at  least  four  committees  who 
feel  that  they  can  do  it  and  the  question  is,  how  we  are  going  to 
meld  this  together.  I  think  the  answer  is  what’s  happening  in  the 
world,  even  with  gaps  in  knowledge,  is  going  to  drive  us  to  do  it 
and with that, this hearing is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 12:15 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

DR. TIM KILLEEN 

Question  1.  The  National  Research  Council  in  2003  recommended  the  establish-
ment  of  a  coordinated  Federal  program  of  weather  modification  research  designed 
to  reduce  scientific  uncertainties.  The  program  should  consist  of  a  sustained  re-
search  effort  that  uses  a  balanced  approach  of  modeling,  laboratory  studies,  and 
field  measurements.  Instead  of  focusing  on  near-term  operational  applications  of 
weather modification, the NRC Stated the program should address fundamental re-
search questions. Do you agree with the NRC’s recommendation? Do you believe the 
Federal Government has made any progress on this? 

Answer. The NRC report recommended fundamental studies in areas of cloud and 
precipitation  processes,  and  cloud  dynamics.  The  NSF  agrees  that  these  are  impor-
tant  areas  of  research  and  efforts  are  supported  on  these  topics  including  field  re-
search,  laboratory  studies,  theoretical  and  numerical  modeling  studies.  In  NSF’s 
view  focusing  on  the  fundamental  properties  of  precipitation  production  and  cloud 
dynamics  is  the  correct  approach.  Scientists  have  developed  credible  modification 
hypotheses  for  some,  although  not  all,  weather  systems.  Before  we  can  fully  test 
these  hypotheses,  we  need  to  better  understand  the  potential  evolution  paths  that 
natural systems could follow to be able to identify when changes to the natural sys-
tem have been effected. 

It  should  be  noted  that  field  research  that  directly  involves  cloud  seeding  of  any 
sort  engenders  many  legal  and  social  issues.  Therefore,  while  much  of  NSF  sup-
ported  research  directly  contributes  to  the  knowledge  based  needed  to  advance  the 
science of weather modification, actual field research involving seeding agents is not 
currently  supported  by  NSF.  NSF,  however,  does  consider  proposals  that  involve 
laboratory experiments or numerical simulations of seeding. 

The  Federal  Agencies  have  a  long  history  of  cooperation  across  the  broad  spec-
trum of climate and weather research and there has been progress in understanding 
precipitation  processes,  precipitation  systems  and  severe  weather.  Recent  examples 
of multi agency programs include the North American Monsoon Experiment (http:// 
www.eol.ucar.edu/projects/name/),  The  International  Water  Vapor  Project  (http:// 
www.eol.ucar.edu/dirloff/projects/2002/IHOP.html), and the Hurricane Rainband 
and Intensity Experiment (http://orca.rsmas.miami.edu/rainex/). 

Question  2.  You  identified  several  inadequacies  in  your  written  testimony  con-
cerning  the  U.S.  science  program’s  modeling  and  observing  capabilities.  Does  the 
Federal  Government  have  a  firm  plan  to  address  these  inadequacies?  Would  the 
funding provided in the economic stimulus legislation be used to address these con-
cerns? 

Answer.  We  will  address  the  question  about  modeling  first.  The  straightforward 
answer  is  that  the  Federal  agencies,  including  several  interagency  groups  dealing 
with climate models of different types, have recognized the importance of improving 
current  modeling  capabilities.  Some  problems  stem  from  constrained  computational 
resources; some from inadequate understanding of fundamental processes and/or the 
capability to couple the relevant components of the earth system into a single model. 
Global  climate  change  models  are  one  component,  albeit  a  very  substantial  one,  of 
a  knowledge  system  of  the  global  integrated  Earth  system  that  includes  sustained 
high  accuracy,  well-calibrated  global  observations  with  high-spatial-  and  high-tem-
poral-resolution and process experiments. 

There  are  many  excellent  global  climate  change  models  in  the  world,  including 
three from the United States. The Community Climate System Model (CCSM), a co-
operative  effort  between  NSF  and  DOE  is  one.  The  others  were  developed  at  the 
NOAA Geophysical Fluid Dynamics Laboratory (GFDL) and the NASA Goddard In-
stitute for Space Studies (GISS). All three global climate change models were incor-
porated  in  the  IPCC  Climate  Change  2007  Assessment  Report.  The  NSF/DOE 
model,  CCSM,  is  a  ‘‘community  model’’,  developed  collaboratively  by  the  scientific 

(59) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

community and openly available as a research and development tool while the GISS 
and GFDL models are internally developed and available upon request. 

All global climate models have shown recent tremendous progress in their ability 
to reliably and accurately simulate large-scale features of Earth’s climate system in 
its rich complexity. Two examples are the accurate representation of El Nino cycles 
and the incorporation of the global carbon cycle. 

Current  limitations  on  global  climate  models  are  spatial  resolution,  that  is,  the 
smallest scale phenomenon they can represent, and complexity, where processes are 
left  out  for  lack  of  knowledge  or  for  computational  expediency.  Global  climate  mod-
els  are  striving  to  achieve  the  same  level  of  success  at  geographical  scales  equiva-
lent  to  the  size  of  Illinois  as  they  do  for  large-scale  phenomena  like  El  Nino.  An 
example  of  a  resolution  constraint  is  the  fact  that  global  models  cannot  presently 
resolve hurricanes in more than a schematic way. As for complexity, current models 
drastically  simplify  the  behavior  of  many  critical  phenomena—ice  shelf  dynamics, 
land-surface interactions, role of mega-cities, ecosystem dynamics and evolution, so-
cial and economics processes. 

Addressing  these  issues  requires  a  committed  and  coordinated  effort  across  the 
agencies  to:  (1)  develop  a  cadre  of  computational  geoscientists,  that  is,  people 
trained  in  computationally  intense  modeling  as  well  as  the  sciences  relevant  to  cli-
mate, (2) engage a broader community of interdisciplinary scientists who would use 
and critically evaluate regional climate model results, and (3) prioritize investments 
to  ensure  adequate  infrastructure,  including  hardware  and  software  system  frame-
works,  software  engineers,  and  the  computational  resources  necessary  to  run  com-
prehensive  models  at  the  resolutions  that  are  relevant  to  society  and  to  allow  for 
multiple (ensemble) model runs in order to assess the uncertainty in model results. 
The  importance  of  having  an  observational  system  capable  of  monitoring  climate 
change  as  well  as  providing  the  detailed  climate  information  required  to  test  the 
ability  of  models  to  capture  critical  climate  processes  cannot  be  understated.  The 
intergovernmental  GEO  activities  serve  as  a  worldwide  framework  to  define  the 
kind of international system of observing systems that are required. The complexity 
of  the  global  integrated  Earth  system  is  vast  and  requires  international  coordina-
tion. NASA and NSF play somewhat unique roles relative to many operational agen-
cies in that NASA and NSF are not responsible for climate monitoring per se; rath-
er,  NASA  and  NSF  observing  systems  complement  and  supplement  the  operational 
observing  systems.  They  are  designed  to  unearth  new  insights  into  key  physical 
and/or biological processes and can serve as test beds for state-of-the-art sensors or 
sensor network configurations. Further, all of the Federal agencies recognize the im-
portance  of  ensuring  access  to  data  and  the  tools  for  exploiting  such  data  Accel-
erating  successful  research-to-operations  transitions  of  new  measurement  capabili-
ties  will  help  to  improve  understanding  of  global  and  regional  climate  change  and 
to provide critically important information for adaptation to climate change. 

NSF  cannot  speak  for  other  agencies  regarding  funding  they  received  under  the 
American  Recovery  and  Reinvestment  Act.  NSF’s  Recovery  funds  will  allow  us  to 
support  a  number  of  important  climate  modeling  and  observational  activities  this 
year. Given the high priority that NSF accords such modeling and observational ac-
tivities, we are committed to ensuring sustained support of these and other new ca-
pabilities into the future. 

Question  3.  You  mentioned  in  your  written  testimony  that,  ‘‘The  relationship  be-
tween  the  Earth’s  ability  to  function  as  a  set  of  interconnected  ecosystems  and  the 
biodiversity  within  and  among  those  interacting  systems  is  an  area  of  incomplete 
knowledge  and  critical  importance.’’  Given  that,  do  you  feel  we  are  in  a  position  to 
begin to finalize adaptation plans in response to the impacts of climate change? 

Answer.  Adaptation  planning  requires  that  managers  and  policy-makers  account 
for  the  potential  and  likely  outcomes  of  climate  change.  In  the  adaptive  manage-
ment  framework,  implementation  cannot  be  considered  ‘‘final.’’  Decisions  will  need 
to be made based upon best available data and with knowledge of uncertainty about 
future  climate  change.  Adaptation  plans  will  need  to  be  periodically  evaluated  and 
adjusted in light of new scientific findings and changing conditions. NSF sees oppor-
tunities  to  begin  developing  smart  adaptation  strategies  through  efforts  that  will 
combine natural science and social science. The process of developing and evaluating 
adaptation (and mitigation) strategies must be evolutionary, and strategies modified 
as new insights are gained. Ecosystem services and biodiversity are two areas where 
great scientific questions remain. 

Given the significant uncertainties in how the natural, biological systems interact 
with  the  physical  system,  one  major  set  of  questions  concerns  how  the  living  world 
adapts  to  and  transforms  Earth’s  climate.  Current  models  of  biotic  change  in  re-
sponse  to  climate  change  indicate  that  a  large  fraction  of  Earth’s  biota  will  need  to 
genetically  adapt,  migrate,  or  suffer  extinction.  Estimates  of  the  fraction  of  species 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

so  affected  vary.  For  example,  Thomas  et  al.  (Nature,  2004)  used  severak  different 
climate change scenarios to estimate a range of 15–37 percent of species committed 
to  extinction.  One  recent  study  suggested  that  50  percent  or  more  of  lowland  trop-
ical species could decline in abundance or go extinct due to climate change (Colwell 
et  al.,  Science,  2008).  We  know  enough  to  expect  large  changes  but  we  do  not  yet 
know enough to provide managers with specific guidance about alternative manage-
ment scenarios. 

At the same time, a large fraction of Earth’s biodiversity is still undescribed. Per-
haps  10  percent  of  species  on  Earth  are  named  (May  and  Beverton,  Philosophical 
Transactions:  Biological  Sciences,  1990).  Classical  approaches  to  biodiversity  dis-
covery  are  too  slow  to  make  rapid  progress  given  the  impending  climate-related  bi-
otic responses. Major developments in genomic technology put within reach the pos-
sibility of determining the unknown dimensions of biodiversity within a decade. 

Next  generation  climate  models  necessary  to  evaluate  critical  adaptation  strate-
gies  will  need  better  information  about  biological  mechanisms  involved  in  carbon, 
water and nutrient cycles and need to more tightly integrate across biophysical and 
social science disciplines. We can anticipate these next generation models will be im-
portant  tools  to  policymakers  just  as  current  generation  models  have  played  such 
a large role in the IPCC. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DR. TIM KILLEEN 

Question  1.  NSF  is  considering  as  part  of  its  Major  Research  Equipment  and  Fa-
cilities Construction (MREFC) an ocean observing system part of which is a regional 
cabled observatory with immense power and bandwidth. This is a unique capability 
with  which  to  observe  biological,  fishery  changes  as  well  as  water  movements.  As 
climate  change  shows  up  in  the  fisheries  altering  patterns  of  fish  migration,  how 
does  NSF  intend  to  ensure  that  the  Ocean  Observing  Initiative  is  making  good 
measurements  of  migrating  species?  What  are  their  plans  to  ensure  the  network  is 
of  significant  scale  to  monitor  these  changes  on  the  west  coast  in  conjunction  with 
Canada which has already installed a smaller cabled network? 

Answer.  The  mission  of  fisheries  resource  management  belongs  to  NOAA,  but 
many  of  the  data  and  research  results  supported  by  NSF  are  useful  to  NOAA  sci-
entists  in  carrying  out  that  mission.  In  the  case  of  NSF’s  planned  Ocean  Observ-
atories Initiative (OOI), sensors are included that measure the state of, and changes 
in,  the  ocean’s  general  conditions  and  health  (for  example,  temperature,  pH,  light 
penetration,  dissolved  oxygen  content,  turbidity,  nutrient  levels)  as  well  as  sensors 
that examine the base of the food web (for example, chlorophyll-derived productivity 
estimates of phytoplankton). These measurements provide the foundation for under-
standing impacts on migrating fisheries species. For NSF, using data from the OOI 
and its Canadian counterpart to understand the larval, juvenile and adult lifecycles 
of  fishery  species,  and  other  marine  animals  is  a  high  priority  for  scientists  posing 
fundamental  research  questions.  This  information  will  inform  our  knowledge  of  the 
dynamics  of  fish  populations  and  the  behavior  (e.g.,  migration)  of  target  species  in 
the NE Pacific and the Mid-Atlantic regions, as researchers propose to use the infra-
structure  of  OOI  for  deploying  advanced  technology  to  observe  population  and  be-
havioral studies of targeted species. 

Question  2.  How  is  NSF  working  with  NOAA  to  ensure  that  the  regional  cabled 
observatory and the coastal moorings off the Washington and Oregon coast can pro-
vide information that is useful for storm forecasting, and how is NSF working with 
USGS  to  ensure  that  the  regional  cabled  observatory  off  Washington  and  Oregon 
are  providing  seismic  information  useful  for  earthquake,  tsunami  and  hazard  mod-
eling? 

Answer.  NOAA  chairs  (and  NSF  serves  as  Vice-Chair)  an  Interagency  Working 
Group  on  Ocean  Observations,  which  meets  monthly  to  ensure  informed  planning 
of  ocean  observing  assets  across  the  agencies.  More  specifically,  program  staff  from 
NSF  and  the  IOOS  Program  Office  at  NOAA  are  working  together  to  develop  data 
management systems for the two systems that converge and will provide universal, 
free,  and  streamlined  data  access  to  all  observing  data  (including  surface  waves, 
mean  currents  and  turbulent  velocities,  water  column  pressure).  Within  the  Geo-
sciences Directorate, the Divisions of Earth Science and Ocean Sciences are working 
together  to  combine  resources  from  EarthScope,  OOI  and  core  programs  for  studies 
of  tectonic  and  seismic  processes  off  the  Pacific  Northwest.  Long-standing  partner-
ships between the Division of Earth Sciences and the USGS on research and moni-
toring of global seismic activity will enhance this research. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Question  3.  Ocean  acidification  is  a  major  concern  to  me,  and  I’ve  worked  with 
Senator  Lautenberg  to  pass  legislation  to  make  sure  our  government  conducts  re-
search  on  this  important  topic.  I’m  concerned,  though,  how  often  major  climate  re-
ports,  assessments  and  programs  ignore  or  omit  the  topic  of  ocean  acidification.  If 
we  create  a  Federal  Climate  Service,  should  that  service  also  be  responsible  for 
ocean acidification? Shouldn’t ocean acidification be given more attention in the cli-
mate  conversation  and  forums  like  the  International  Panel  on  Climate  Change  and 
the major climate change study being conducted by the National Research Council? 
Answer.  The  research  community  is  concerned  that  increasing  ocean  acidification 
will  have  a  significant  impact  on  ocean  ecosystems  and  food  webs,  natural  ocean 
carbon sequestration and broader ocean chemistry; based on science done within the 
last several years. In fact, beginning in 2007, NSF established dedicated new budget 
lines for ocean acidification research. 

A  number  of  activities  are  ensuring  that  ocean  acidification  will  be  appropriately 
recognized  in  other  arenas.  The  Ocean  Studies  Board  has  commenced  a  study  on 
the  ‘‘Development  of  an  Integrated  Science  Strategy  for  Ocean  Acidification  Moni-
toring,  Research  and  Impacts  Assessment,’’  supported  by  NOAA,  along  with  NSF 
and  other  agencies.  The  Omnibus  Public  Land  Management  Act  of  2009,  signed  by 
President Obama on March 30, includes legislation on ocean acidification (FORAM). 
The legislation includes authorization levels for research at NSF and other agencies, 
and also for a coordinated inter-agency approach to coordinating research across the 
agencies,  integrating  research  with  adaptation  and  mitigation  strategies,  and  pro-
viding information for policymakers. 

Question  4.  Particularly  in  the  field  of  renewable  energy,  new  companies  are 
emerging  that  want  to  provide  climate  data  services  for  the  private  sector.  For  ex-
ample, a company in my home state of Washington called 3TIER has set out to pro-
vide climate and weather data for wind, solar, and hydropower energy providers. In 
your opinion, where should the line be drawn between the climate services the Fed-
eral  Government  should  provide  and  the  services  the  private  sector  should  be  pro-
viding?  As  we  move  forward  with  more  sophisticated  government  climate  services 
in  the  future,  what  steps  should  we  take  to  make  sure  we  area  not  unnecessarily 
expanding into areas that are most appropriate for the private sector? 

Answer.  There  is  a  long  standing  and  successful  public—private  partnership  for 
weather  and  climate  services.  I  expect  that  to  continue  and  serve  as  a  model  for 
the future roles of the private and public sectors. The challenge lies in the new em-
phasis  on  climate  rather  than  weather  products  and  the  fact  that  climate  can  no 
longer be treated as stationary. Robust predictions will depend on the results of in-
tense modeling efforts and operational observations, the effort and expense of which 
will most likely continue to be borne by government agencies. 

Within  the  Nation  there  is  significant  demand  for  information  about  climate,  but 
a lack of appreciation about the uncertainties in today’s climate projections that will 
serve as the basis for developing region-specific products. The public—private enter-
prise will be in ‘‘new territory’’ in the next decade as we learn to deal with a chang-
ing  climate,  but  the  basic  public-private  relationship  is  unlikely  to  change  much. 
The government recognizes that it can provide information that is more immediately 
useful  to  users  (including  the  private  sector)  as  well  as  new  decision  support  tools, 
but  it  will  be  the  private  sector  that  can  best  meet  specific  needs  for  the  majority 
of end-users. 

Traditionally,  the  private  sector  has  played  an  important  role  in  providing  both 
weather and climate services to the Nation. The private sector is well positioned to 
provide  value-added  climate  products  tailored  to  meet  the  specific  needs  of  a  range 
of customers. The need for ‘‘tailored’’ information comes about because the many dif-
ferent  users  of  climate  information  have  distinct  and  varying  needs  depending  on 
the sector, the activities involved, the size of the operation, the time-frame for which 
information  is  relevant  to  the  enterprise,  etc.  The  private  sector  can  serve  as  the 
‘‘translator’’  of  climate  information—assessing  users’  needs  and  developing  value- 
added products that meet those needs—and updating those products as new under-
standing about the climate system emerges. 

The public sector has traditionally maintained the observing systems and related 
data bases as well as supported the development of the sophisticated, complex, and 
computationally demanding, weather and climate models that serve as the basis for 
weather  and  climate  information.  For  the  most  part,  these  are  operational  and  cer-
tainly  resource-intensive  activities.  Further,  the  government  has  provided  the  sup-
port  for  long-term  research  and  observational  system  investments  that  will  ulti-
mately lead to improved understanding of climate and provide for the basis for new 
and better products, products that are still many years from being commercially via-
ble. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Question 5. While climate mitigation is essential, I think there needs to be a much 
more  serious  discussion  on  our  Nation’s  plan  to  adapt  to  climate  change.  In  your 
opinion,  what  are  some  of  the  most  common  and  likely  mistakes  our  communities 
and government will make in the coming years if we don’t have the climate informa-
tion  and  adaptation  measures  needed  to  avoid  poor  long-term  decisionmaking? 
Aren’t  climate  adaptation  measures  necessary  to  avoid  making  poor  decisions  on 
long-term  infrastructure—poor  decisions  that  can  be  both  costly  and  dangerous? 
Without  climate  adaptation,  don’t  we  risk  building  a  legacy  of  poor  infrastructure 
decisions? 

Answer. The best way to answer your question might be to point out that climate 
adaptation  will  be  a  process  rather  than  a  one-time  fix.  The  actual  state  of  the  cli-
mate  will  be  a  moving  target  that  will  be  the  result  of  the  policy  choices  that  are 
made regarding mitigation and the resulting levels of greenhouse gas concentrations 
in  the  atmosphere  over  the  coming  decades.  In  that  sense,  adaptation  choices  are 
not  truly  independent  of  our  mitigation  choices.  Depending  on  greenhouse  gas  con-
centrations, the temperature and precipitation patterns likely will change gradually 
with  time,  with  occasional  periods  of  more  rapid  change  being  possible.  At  this 
point,  we  are  fairly  confident  about  the  broad  outlines  of  how  climate  will  change, 
but  we  don’t  know  the  details.  There  much  we  need  to  learn.  Various  sectors  will 
need to respond at quite different timescales, so for example, planning for water re-
sources infrastructure generally is longer than for some decisions that will be made 
in the agricultural and forestry sectors. 

The most likely mistake that could be made by both communities and the govern-
ment would be to adopt a ‘‘one size fits all’’ approach to climate adaptation. As noted 
above,  there  are  a  wide  range  of  needs.  Ideally,  adaptation  choices  will  have  been 
made  based  on  a  regional,  not  just  local,  basis.  Further,  the  strategies  that  are 
adopted  must  consider  that  the  knowledge  of  climate  is  imperfect  and  so  a  range 
of  climate  scenarios  should  be  considered.  An  equally  likely  and  costly  mistake 
might  be  to  assume  that  that  there  will  be  no  unintended  consequences  from  our 
adaptation  actions.  Given  these  considerations,  it  is  imperative  that  we  continue  to 
develop both a better understanding of climate processes and a set of tools that can 
comprehensively assess the likelihood of the outcomes for our adaptation (and miti-
gation)  choices.  Developing  the  kind  of  high  resolution,  complex  climate  prediction 
models  and  decision  support  tools  that  would  allow  us  to  assess  the  choices  ade-
quately  is  within  the  realm  of  possibility,  but  not  yet  in  our  grasp.  That  capability 
will require investment in further research. 

With  regard  to  major  infrastructure  planning,  there  are  many  factors  that  must 
be  taken  into  account.  Human  success  is  in  part  due  to  our  ability  to  adapt  to 
changing  circumstances,  and  as  we  plan  for  long-term  infrastructure  investments, 
making sure our infrastructure is designed not only for today but the future is crit-
ical.  Infrastructure  choices  are,  in  fact,  part  of  adaptation,  but  the  decisions  should 
always  be  informed  by  the  best  science  possible.  As  noted  in  my  testimony,  we  are 
at  a  point  where  that  science  must  include  both  the  natural  and  social  sciences.  In 
addition,  NSF  supports  research  in  the  science  of  decision-making  under  conditions 
of  uncertainty.  Decision-makers  normally  must  make  choices  with  either  imperfect 
or inadequate knowledge. This scientific research area seeks to identify ways to re-
duce  risk  in  decisionmaking  and  improve  potential  outcomes.  We  see  this  as  a  key 
decision  support  tool.  Certainly  anything  that  can  be  done  to  better  inform  infra-
structure  decisions—both  having  better  estimates  of  the  likely  evolution  of  the  cli-
mate  (and  other  factors)  as  well  as  procedures  for  reducing  risks—will  reduce  the 
possibility of making poor choices. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

KATHARINE JACOBS 

Question  1.  Particularly  in  the  field  of  renewable  energy,  new  companies  are 
emerging  that  want  to  provide  climate  data  services  for  the  private  sector.  For  ex-
ample, a company in my home state of Washington called 3TIER has set out to pro-
vide  climate  and  weather  data  for  wind,  solar,  and  hydro  power  energy  providers. 
In  your  opinion,  where  should  the  line  be  drawn  between  the  climate  services  the 
Federal  Government  should  provide  and  the  services  that  the  private  sector  should 
be  providing?  As  we  move  forward  with  more  sophisticated  government  climate 
services in the future, what steps should we take to make sure that we are not un-
necessarily  expanding  into  areas  that  are  most  appropriate  for  the  private  sector? 
Answer.  I  am  familiar  with  3TIER,  two  of  my  colleagues  are  in  that  group,  and 
they  are  very  talented.  In  my  opinion,  the  Federal  Government  should  provide  cli-
mate information for a broad range of audiences. If particular industries want infor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

mation  that  is  more  tailored  to  their  location  or  their  specific  decision  processes, 
that  is  an  appropriate  place  for  the  private  sector  to  step  in.  There  are  many  rea-
sons why the government should engage in providing climate services. One is to pro-
vide  equitable  access  to  information.  If  all  of  these  services  were  only  available  if 
paid  for,  then  those  who  may  need  it  most,  the  economically  disadvantaged,  may 
have the least access to it. A second reason is that provision of climate information 
is  directly  related  to  health  and  welfare.  If  this  information  is  only  available 
through  the  private  sector,  then  the  profit  motive  controls  information  that  could 
be  of  critical  importance  to  saving  lives  and  property.  In  addition,  much  of  the  cli-
mate  observing  system  was  paid  for  with  taxpayer  dollars.  They  have  a  right  to 
some sort of return from that investment. 

I  believe  that  we  can  use  considerations  such  as  equity,  national  security,  health 
and welfare, and return on investment as guidance in determining whether the Fed-
eral Government should engage in providing services. 

Question 2. While climate mitigation is essential, I think there needs to be a much 
more  serious  discussion  on  our  Nation’s  plan  to  adapt  to  climate  change.  In  your 
opinion,  what  are  some  of  the  most  common  and  likely  mistakes  our  communities 
and government will make in the coming years if we don’t have the climate informa-
tion  and  adaptation  measures  needed  to  avoid  poor  long-term  decisionmaking? 
Aren’t  climate  adaptation  measures  necessary  to  avoid  making  poor  decisions  on 
long-term  infrastructure—poor  decisions  that  can  be  both  costly  and  dangerous? 
Without  climate  adaptation,  don’t  we  risk  building  a  legacy  of  poor  infrastructure 
decisions? 

Answer.  There  is  much  more  information  needed  for  good  adaptation  decisions, 
particularly  in  designing  infrastructure  that  will  be  robust  in  the  context  of  more 
extreme events, both flood and drought. In the short term, it is the capacity to deal 
with  extreme  events  that  is  lacking,  especially  in  light  of  the  very  poor  condition 
of all infrastructure in this country—water and wastewater infrastructure, transpor-
tation, etc. I would anticipate the greatest danger in the short term comes from poor 
management of floodplains and from coastal storm surges. Climate adaptation does 
require  that  we  re-examine  the  engineering  standards  that  are  used  in  designing 
infrastructure. Especially in light of the stimulus package, it is important that these 
standards be revised quickly to avoid maladaptive investments. We do risk building 
a  legacy  of  poor  infrastructure  that  may  last  50  years  or  more  if  we  do  not  take 
changing climate conditions into account. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK WARNER TO 

FRANK ALIX 

Question  1.  Carbon  sequestration  holds  promise  and  we  are  gaining  certainty, 
through  demonstration  projects  like  yours,  about  how  to  control  the  risks  involved 
with  the  process.  Can  you  briefly  tell  us  the  genesis  of  your  ECO2 capture  process 
and how it will lessen risks when transferring from smaller projects to a commercial 
scale capture and sequestration plant? 

Answer.  Our  ECO2 capture  process  was  initially  developed  in  conjunction  with 
U.S.  DOE’s  National  Energy  Technology  Laboratory  (NETL),  which  had  performed 
some of the pioneering research on CO2 capture with ammonia. We jointly developed 
ECO2 with  NETL  under  a  cooperative  research  and  development  agreement 
(CRADA). 

In  order  to  reduce  risks  associated  with  commercial-scale  CCS  projects,  we  de-
signed our ECO2 pilot test facility using the same type of equipment we plan to use 
in larger, commercial-scale systems. This eliminates most of the risk associated with 
building commercial scale systems, as all of the equipment needed for these systems 
has been demonstrated on our pilot unit and is already commercially proven at scale 
(the innovation in ECO2 is in its process chemistry). 

Question  2.  Many  power  companies  use  coal  to  generate  electricity  because  it  is 
less  expensive  than  natural  gas.  How  will  the  additional  cost  of  carbon  sequestra-
tion impact the economics of coal as a competitor to natural gas? 

Answer.  CCS  would  add  significant  costs  to  coal-fired  electricity  generation,  on 
the  order  of  3  to  4  cents  per  kWh.  This  would  make  coal-fired  generation  less  com-
petitive  with  gas.  However,  assuming  the  price  of  CO2 emission  allowances  rises  to 
$30–40 per ton, there would also be a cost impact on gas-fired generation as it emits 
about half as much CO2 as a coal plant (therefore the equivalent cost impact on gas- 
fired  generation  would  be  1.5  to  2  cents  per  kWh).  In  this  scenario,  based  on  pro-
jected  future  prices  for  coal  and  natural  gas,  coal  would  remain  the  low  cost  elec-
tricity source when compared to gas. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

Question 2a. What types of coal have been used in your carbon sequestration proc-

ess? How do various coal types impact the economics of your process? 

Answer. Our carbon capture process has been tested on a blend of bituminous and 
subituminous coals. However, we do not expect the type of coal to have any impact 
on  our  CO2 capture  performance.  ECO2 should  perform  equally  as  well  for  all  coal 
types. The two factors that will affect CO2 capture costs are plant efficiency (higher 
efficiency  yields  less  CO2 per  kWh,  means  reduced  costs)  and  new  versus  retrofit 
(retrofit costs will be higher than new plants). 

Question  3.  How  clean  and  energy  efficient  is  your  ECO2 process?  Would  you  de-
scribe  how  your  process  affects  the  amount  and  sanitation  of  the  water  used,  and 
how much energy is saved or spent overall using your technology? 

Answer.  Our  CO2 capture  process  does  not  consume  water  except  as  needed  for 
cooling,  and  processes  exist  which  can  provide  the  necessary  cooling  without  water 
use  (i.e.,  air  coolers).  If  cooling  water  is  used,  its  quality  should  remain  unaffected 
as cooling water would be contained in a closed system and not come in contact with 
process gas or liquids. 

Our  ECO2 process  is  expected  to  require  15–20  percent  of  the  net  power  output 
from a new, supercritical coal-fired power plant to capture and compress 90 percent 
of  its  CO2.  For  retrofit  of  an  existing  coal-fired  power  plant,  the  energy  cost  is  ex-
pected to be 20–25 percent. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:49 Apr 21, 2010 Jkt 052159 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\52159.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

